Sneakers, jackets, boots, casual clothing, and more will still be needed.

There is no clear consensus as to the benefits of school uniforms.

Over the course of two semesters of theoretical practicum, students will explore the periods between the mid-second millennium BCE through the classical periods.

This will be done through the study of archaeological finds, the Biblical text and ancient near eastern scripts that illuminate the economic and social structures, diplomatic and political relations and religious practices of the inhabitants of ancient Israel.

official transcripts for any transferred credits. 

10,500 USD fee, payable to the TAU International office, which includes two tutorial semesters, 8-10 field trips to archaeological sites, student union membership, library access and student fees to the university and 4 weeks excavation during the summer semester. Accommodation and medical insurance are not included in the tuition.

In case of restrictions connected to the COVID-19 situation, please note that the program has put in place an alternative of long-distance learning. 

If physical presence is not possible, you will be able to participate in your courses remotely and once permitted, resume them in person without this affecting your ability to complete the program.  

Ministry of Foreign Affairs: Cultural and Scientific Relations Division

The Government of Israel is pleased to offer scholarships to foreign students, as agreed in the Cultural Agreements between Israel and the following countries and regions:

Argentina, Austria, Belarus, Bulgaria, Canada (Quebec Province), China, Colombia, Croatia, Cyprus, Czech Republic, Estonia, Georgia, Greece, Hungary, Italy, Korea, Lithuania, Latvia, Mexico, Paraguay, Poland, Portugal, Romania, Republic of Serbia, Slovak Republic, Slovenia, Spain, Taiwan and Turkey.

The following countries have a special scholarship arrangement:
Belgium, Denmark, Germany, India, Great Britain, Finland, France, Japan, Norway, the Netherlands, Switzerland, and Russia.

Different types of scholarships are offered (not available for veterinary and medicine studies): 
1. Summer language courses (Ulpan)
2. One academic year (October to June) for a maximum of eight months (M.A., Ph.D. Post Doctorate or research studies).

Basic Requirements:

The applicant should hold a BA or BSc degree (or higher) and have a good record of academic achievement.
The applicant should be a citizen of the country where he/she applies for the scholarship and be under the age of 35 (at the beginning of the academic year). Israeli citizens are not eligible to submit an application for this scholarship. Recipients of the scholarship must receive a student visa (A2), issued by the Israeli embassy to which their application was submitted.
Proof of English or Hebrew language proficiency. 
The applicant should meet the academic requirements of the Israeli University to which he/she applies. A scholarship will be granted only after the required Institute approves the acceptance of the candidate.

Terms and Conditions: 

Terms and conditions of the scholarship may change from year to year according to the annual budget.
The scholarship can be granted only once (either for a Summer Language course or for an Academic Year)

The one academic year scholarship includes:

Partial tuition fees - if applied (50% up to a maximum of $ 6,000 for tuition fees of $ 12,000 and higher)
Monthly allowance for one academic year (8 months only, October until June)
Basic health insurance*

The partial one academic year scholarship includes:

Monthly allowance for one academic year (8 months only, October until June)
Basic health insurance*


The Summer Language Course Includes:
1.   Full tuition fees
2.   Dormitories
3.   3 weeks’ allowance
4.   Basic health insurance*

*According to the bilateral agreements between Israel, Poland and the Czech Republic, health insurance is not included.

Accommodation, transportation and travel arrangements to and from Israel are the applicant's responsibility.
Scholarships will be granted only for studies in universities and programs approved by the Israeli Council for Higher Education. 
Scholarships for Ulpan language studies will be granted in the Ulpan chosen by the Ministry of Foreign Affairs.

In order to start the application process, please contact your local Israeli embassy to verify the exact date for submitting applications and to receive more detailed information concerning the process of choosing candidates for scholarship from your country.

Submission of Application

Before downloading and filling out the application forms, please carefully read these important instructions.

Applications should include: 

Completed application form - Download application forms  
Detailed letter describing the field the applicant intends to study in Israel, specifying the University he/she wishes to attend 
Curriculum Vitae 
Copies of letters exchanged with Israeli universities, or in the case of a research or post doctorate – the relevant Israeli supervisor. Not required for Ulpan Scholarship.
Official original academic records (or notarized copies) of all relevant studies and test scores, diplomas attesting the completion of an academic degree, including a transcript of the student's records 
At least two (2) letters of recommendation from lecturers/professors who taught the candidate 
Three (3) photographs 
Certificate of health


All of the above should be printed in English and submitted in three (3) copies to the Israeli embassy in the applicant's country (in the Netherlands, please follow instructions on website).
The final date for the submission of application forms is no later than March 19. 
Final decision regarding the granting of a scholarship will be made around July of each year. 
The MFA will notify the candidate of his/her acceptance to the scholarship program.
For more details, please write to the following e-mail address: scholarship@mfa.gov.il ​

In fact the algorithm designers know that it’s better to do this than over-estimate capacity and have the battery run out unexpectedly, so the tendency is to err on the pessimistic side, any unexpected capacity then being a bonus.

Often you can help improve the estimate at least temporarily by allowing the phone to recalibrate the algorithm using a full discharge/recharge cycle.

They’re pocket-sized, battery powered personal computers with wireless network peripherals. 

The last vestiges of “phone” technology is perhaps the circuit-switched voice connection, which ended with 3G cellular radio, a technology that’s end-of-lifed by most network providers, with sunsetting maybe starting soon. 

pessimist

relativist

Yet Nokia had prototypes of smartphones in its boxes.

In fact, the opposite destiny of Apple and Nokia since 2007 reminds us of a fundamental truth in the business world: Evolve or Be Extinct.

These two manufacturers who dominated the market at the time then fell irretrievably.

Unfortunately we won’t be able to give you credits for a M.Div degree.
give someone credit for（尤指犹豫地或惊讶地）称赞某人；肯定某人（的品质或成就） 
please give me credit for some sense.
请给我应有的肯定。give someone credit for（尤指犹豫地或惊讶地）称赞某人；肯定某人（的品质或成就） 
If you send your BA transcript from your Computer Science degree as we accept students with any BA degree that are from official university.
真好。主啊，我现在竟然有选择了。嗯。是去拿着这个M.Div读M.th呢？还是去用之前的CS去读M.A呢？ 
If you have any questions please feel free to contact me.
不过神可能（可能？？？）知道我的自卑吧，让人不断的安慰我。If you have any questions, Please!!! fell free to contact me. 



The age-old adage says that practice makes perfect.

Playing a game, especially a long, enduring game like Mahjong is a bonding experience.

Games are great for bonding with other people.

The advantage of adolescents picking their own courses is that people should be able to start exploring their aptitudes at a young age.

Adolescents should be able to hone in on their likes and dislikes at a young age, as this will give them a better understanding of where their aptitude lies.

There should definitely be a required curriculum, but it should leave room for students to take selectives that they are truly interested in.

Moreover, it is better to be the leader of a group than a member because the leader is able to wield the power.

The most overlooked in general though it might be, the bathroom is a room which demands attention as much as possible.

I have a very spacious and bright bathroom in my house.

these type of products tend to have consistent quality.

These include some types of steel, laminates, and enamel finishes.

there is one problem that I have found prevalent through all of my years of education.

It is a very fortunate occurrence when a school receives a sizable grant.

the most utilitarian decision.

As computers are the future, it is important for students to become adept users early in life.

thus continuing a cycle of social immobility.

many of these games have similar attributes.

Having a charismatic personality will take a person far in any field.

Almost all games have socialization aspect deeply ingrained in them.

Of course in the business world being a "team player" has become a buzzword in most offices.

Team sports are full of challenges and obstacles that a team must overcome together.

In sports etiquette it would be incredibly uncouth to start crying or throw a tantrum if one were to lose a game.

Likewise if one wins a game and gloats excessively in the face of their adversary, it is equally looked down upon.

One must learn the subtleties of defeat and victory and learn to minimize their outward emotions.

trees, flowers, and greenery in general.

any people commute to the city for work, and find that the stress of their jobs, combined with the intensity of urban life, is very tiring.

If one could walk through a park on one's lunch break, she/he would go back to work feeling refreshed and rejuvenated.

it would create a community focal point.

I would also be inclined to include badminton nets, table tennis facilities and a football field for the more athletically inclined.

By doing this, one creates a location where community, serenity, and the interests of the environment are all taken care of.

A show that a person watched when they were a child could possibly have been a catalyst for choosing a career.

It has been proven that if children watch violence on television when they are young, they become desensitized to it, and sometimes end up becoming violent adults.

Children can desensitize themselves to the world around them, and become antisocial, violent adults.

Animals have the power to be iconic symbols for a country.

For example, Americans have enlisted the eagle as their national animal.

to represent peace, love, unity and respect between the two neighbors.

Thus, the giant, black and white panda is the national symbol of China.

they protect streams from debris and silt.

Forested area is also the main habitat for a plethora of animal species.

.

.

.

.

.

.








New York is 3 hours ahead of California, but it does not make California slow.

Someone graduated at the age of 22, but waited 5 years before securing a good job!

Someone became a CEO at 25, and died at 50.

While another became a CEO at 50, and lived to 90 years.

Someone is still single, while someone else got married.

Obama retires at 55, but Trump starts at 70.

Absolutely everyone in this world works based on their Time Zone.

People around you might seem to go ahead of you, some might seem to be behind you.

But everyone is running their own RACE, in their own TIME.

Don’t envy them or mock them.

They are in their TIME ZONE, and you are in yours!

Life is about waiting for the right moment to act.

So, RELAX.

You’re not LATE.

You’re not EARLY.

You are very much ON TIME, and in your TIME ZONE Destiny set up for you.








Don’t get me wrong - it’s almost unbelievable that these are paintings, and they’d need an insane amount of talent to produce, but to me, they just seem unnecessary.

I mean, if you’re going to paint hyper-realistic corks which are literally indistinguishable from actual corks, why is that any better than just taking a nice photo of some corks?


I think this is brilliant - realistic, yes, but it’s stylised, and obviously a painting, which is what makes it great!

Where’s the charm in a photo of some corks? There isn’t any, similarly to how there isn’t any in a painting of a photo of some corks.

I’ve got to be honest - I’ve never really expressed this opinion before, and I’m not sure how, if at all, unpopular it is, but I just feel as though if you’re that talented, you’re wasting your abilities in replicating photos to the point at which they’re indistinguishable from the real thing.


Which literary device is used here for the word “burned” and “dry”, “Summer burned the canals dry.”?
It’s a very simple metaphor. The writer could have said “The summer SUN burned the canals dry” and the sentence would not be metaphoric. Saying that summer is LIKE the sun makes this a metaphor. It’s comparing summer to the sun without saying it.


People who understand sarcasm well are often good at reading people minds.
Those who sit upright are much happier than those who slouch.
Being silent is the best way to get someone to confess something, as they get uncomfortable and desire to talk.
Think of being with your loved ones before posting for a camera, this shall bring a natural smile to your face.
Cuddling releases natural painkillers, oxytocin. It decreases headaches significantly.
Your mind can sense someone staring at you even while sleep.
Study[1] found that for men, the physical attractiveness of women is most important; while women are relatively more interested in the social status of a potential partner. I'd recommend this application with high quality single members --tap to download
The reason we feel confident to sing in the shower is partly that the shower reverb of the shower boosts the voice, adds more bass and sounds more powerful, thus boosting the singer’s confidence to sing.
The more you talk about someone, the more you are likely to fall in love with that person.
We tend to miss moments and how they made us feel over the person themselves.
Attractive people are not always sincere. People tend to favour those who are charming but looks can be deceiving.
Most people type faster when there's someone they like.
You appear more attractive to a person when you make them laugh or smile.
80% of women choose silence to express pain. You should know she is truly hurt when she chooses to ignore you






a pine tree and a deciduous tree—like, a maple, or an oak tree
Native American people were all adept at running, running very fast over the snow in these uh these birch-branch snowshoes
Critics are also skeptical about the accuracy of the conversations
This response is in the medium writing proficiency range. 
However, the writer does not clearly explain that they were unable to escape through bribery.
The errors in the use of language are fairly frequent in this response and obscure the meaning of several ideas. 
The second piece critics would like to disclaim as true is the count of all conversations with Voltaire which he recorded with accuracy in his memoir which was penned down years later.
The professor puts forward the fact that the Chevalier would dutifuly make a note of the entire length of the conversation every night after meeting with Voltaire.
In response to the reading argument that the Chevalier de Seingalt exaggerated his wealth because we know he was forced to borrow money
In fact, the writer is very skilled in using sophisticated and accurate paraphrasing to convey the content from the lecture and the passage. 
he would indulge in extravaganzas like parties and gambling
His pronunciation is generally good and he uses intonation effectively to express meaning. 
Overall, this is a mostly coherent and accurate synthesis of the reading and listening material.





I shall share some mind-blowing facts with you.[1]

There are five calories in a teaspoon of semen.
The average sexual experience lasts 40 minutes.
Ginger stimulates the feeling of euphoria associated with sex.
A kiss stimulates 29 muscles and chemicals that cause relaxation. Women like light and frequent kisses while men like more strenuous kisses.
A woman blink nearly twice as often as a man.
Tear contains a natural pain killer called enkephalin, which reduces pain and improves your mood.
Your stomach's digestive juice hydrochloric acid can dissolve metals.
Your eyes can distinguish upto 7.5 million different colours.
Your skin’s outer layer epidermis sheds every 2-4 weeks, amounting to roughly 0.7 kg of dead skin in a year.
Your body is made up of 0.2 kgs of bacteria, and upto 1 billion bacteria can grow on each tooth.
If you were to spread out all the wrinkles in your brain, it would be about the size of a pillowcase.
If all the DNA in your body were uncoiled and stretched, it would stretch out to about 10 billion miles, which is from Earth to Pluto and back.
Grapes explode when you put them in the microwave.
Blueberries will not ripen until they are picked.
Coconut water can be used as blood plasma.
A hard boiled egg will spin, but a soft boiled egg will not.
Honey is the only food which never spoils.
Chewing gum burns about eleven calories per hour.
On an average, a person waits for atleast six months in traffic jams.
At any time atleast one percent of the world’s population is drunk.



1 to 3 eggs per clutch, and 2 to 3 clutches each year (for the most prolific species). The male incubates them (in most cases — in some the pair share incubation duties).

Most female kiwis only lay one egg at a time. Those that lay an additional egg will lay it about 25 days after the first one is laid. Laying a third egg is rare.

Eggs hatch in 70 to 80 days.



Females of some species of kiwi share incubation duties. Neither one parents anything. The male will allow the chicks to follow him around and remain in his territory until they are mature. They take care of themselves. Kiwis don’t engage in parental care.

Upvote
·
199

Reply



Teresa Gemellaro



What are some unwritten social rules everyone should know?
1. Don't talk to a person who is wearing headphones. You are basically wasting your time.




2. Don't talk while chewing or eating.

3. Don't upload your pictures on social media when you have given a leave application regarding your bad health.

4. Don't use “ k , hmm” in your conversation. It sounds as if you are least interested.




5. If a girl’s strap is out. Don't stare at it. It gives same feeling “when you guys forget to close the pant's zip”.

6. If anyone has given you a chocolate. Share it with him/her.

7. Let people exit before you enter.




8. Don't give advice to people unless you are asked.

9. Follow the queue.




8. Don't give advice to people unless you are asked.

9. Follow the queue.




10. Give the same respect to waiters and staff which you give to your boss.
793.3K viewsView UpvotersView Sharers

34.3K


190

59


59 comments from Anuja Tripathi and more


Capital Com SV Investments Limited
Sponsored



10. Give the same respect to waiters and staff which you give to your boss.
793.3K viewsView UpvotersView Sharers

34.3K


190

59


59 comments from Anuja Tripathi and more


Capital Com SV Investments Limited
Sponsored



✓ Never watch women’s tennis like my boyfriend

Last week my boyfriend was alone in his room.

A suggested youtube video appeared and he pressed the play button.

His father was shaving his beard.

Suddenly.

Ahhhh…Ohhh…Yeahhh… Hahhh… Yess

“Sahil, what are you watching ?” His father asked with suspicion.

“No, nothing dad” he answered fearfully.

“Sahil, You have a sister at home"

“What have I done, Dad? “

“Are you sure its not an adult video?” His father fired a bullet from his mouth.

“Damn, I am watching tennis, dad.” He almost cried. Lol

His father scratched his bald head and went away.

You can imagine the level of embarrassment that my Sahil experienced. Haha.

The screams that women tennis players make while hitting the shots are funny.

It could seriously raise the brows of the people around you.

So make sure that people around you are also fully aware that you are actually watching tennis.

You know what I mean. Lol.



✓ Never fall for this optician trick if you feel eye strain on Mobile or Laptop

So you work for long hours in front of laptop or mobile phone.

One day you decide to buy a pair of blue light blocking eyeglasses and visit an optician.

He shows you lens test experiment with a laser torch which emits blue light.

He points blue laser beam on the lenses and you see that the laser beam can’t pass through the clear lenses.

You become happy and buy those lenses.

But wait.

You are completely unaware that clear lenses do not block much blue light.

Then what about the laser test that optician did?

Such laser pens actually emit Violet light and not blue light

Clear lenses can never block much blue light.

Why do people get tricked with laser test on clear lenses ?



Blue and Violet colors are somewhat similar in appearance. People usually do not notice the difference (in the absence of comparison like above).

Then how to block the harsh screen light ?

As per the scientific research[1] only amber lenses can block real blue light and is beneficial for computer & mobile users.

The shade of amber lenses is a blend of yellow-orange.

Edit, Folks, Please don’t send personal message to ask about which brand of computer glasses to buy.

In my opinion there are 2 good brands. Gunnar (in usa) and Zebriana (in India). They both follow amber technology in computer glasses.

Do your own research before buying and alert others about laser trick.

✓ Never cheat laborers like Bhagat baba




Bhagat baba is a 60 years old laborer.

He is asthamatic, has no kids and wife got expired 10 years back. Very honest person as per my own experience also.

My neighbor recently had to move his stuff to a different apartment in the same locality.

It was a task of 1 day.

Neighbor contacted Bhagat ji.

Bhagat ji worked continuously throughout the day without even having lunch.

In the evening, at the time of payment the house owner drove away (XUV car) and asked the Bhagat ji to come next day.

Next day when Bhagat ji came collect his payment. Unfortunately my neighbour's wife simply refused to pay as the work was done without her consent.

After a week Bhagat ji came again at my neighbors door.

Coincidently my neighbor was sitting with his friends.

“Sahab ab to mere paise dedo. Hafta ho gaya. Dawai bhi kaise lu?". (English translation , Sir, its been seven days now. Please pay my money. I have to buy medicines.")

It became a matter of major embarrassment for my neighbour.

So out of anger he grabbed the collar of the labor Bhagat baba and said,

“Abey buddhey !! Khud ko mera baap samajh raha hai? Ab to kuch nahi milega”. (translation, You old man. You think you are my father ? You won’t get a rupee now)

Bhagat ji does not say anything. He wipes his tears and moves away.

Can you imagine what happened to my neighbor on Jaipur highway while he was travelling just after the 2 days of this incidence ?

Some might say the incident on highway was just a co-incident but all I want to convey is never cheat a poor laborer.
Footnotes



What is the saddest truth about life?
1. You will not necessarily succeed if you try, but you will not succeed if you do not try.

2. The world is never fair.

And the difference between people and people is greater than even the difference between people and dogs.

3. Appearance is power.

Good-looking people always have access to more facilities and benefits.

4. All roads lead to Rome, but some people are born in Rome.

Family conditions are a very important factor in any decision you make at a young age. We fight tooth and nail to live what (in some people's eyes) is an ordinary life.



5. Discrimination is really everywhere.

Gender, race, religion, province, even the color of the skin (nationality). People are born with the attribute of rejecting the other, cultivated people will restrain, but sometimes deep-seated prejudice, it is really difficult to avoid.

6. The people who will feel happy for your happiness and sadness for your sadness are very few. And others, regardless of affinity, are more willing to see you living wrose than they are.

7. The people who value relationship over interests are rare, but there are still some, if you are lucky enough to encounter them, cherish them.

8. Sometimes two people are each other's Plan B, but also pretend that the other one is their only beloved person in the wedding.

9. The cruel truth is that everyone knows the truth, but they have to join together to whitewash it.

10. There is a cool side of life, but also a warm side. And some other things are actually very neutral, not good or bad.

Your life only belongs to you. It is what you think it is. We should learn to discover more of the sunshine in life.




Welcome to the real world. It sucks. You're gonna love it!"



Hello and thank you, use your concious mind, whoever is reading this,

The mind can get stuck, follow what feels easy to you, like your happiness.

What is the happiest? Your own answer is the key to that happiness.

The saddest is we can fall into patterns, they are easy to get out of if we think with our concious mind.

Upvote

Reply




The Legacy Report
Sponsored



I was really shocked that electricity could be explained like this.

The yellow girl (Potential difference (volt)) is pushing the green one (Current (ampere) and the Red girl (resistance) is tending to stop them.

No physics books can explain electricity like this.

There’s no limit to people’s creativity!
1.3M viewsView UpvotersView Sharers

14K


115

346


346 comments from Kris Rosvold and more


Simple App
Sponsored



I was scrolling the instagram and suddenly i saw a picture posted by one of the science pages i have followed.




When teaching Basic Electronics to new recruits I used the analogy of water in a pipe where,

The pipe = Conductor

Pressure = Voltage

Flow Rate = Amperage

Valve = Resistor

Diaphragm Pressure Can = Capacitance

I never was able to come up with an accurate and effective analogy for inductance though, but even with that lack it was a very effective teaching tool for the core basics of electricity (and for safety issues).

We all know almost intuitively that a 9 to 12 psig water jet isn't a problem but a 120 or 240 psig hose absolutely is a problem.



This is a Skorpion submachinegun, it fires .32 ACP, meaning the bullets are .32 inches in diameter. That’s about the size of a 12-gauge 00 buckshot pellet.

There are eight of those in a shell.

So getting blasted by a shotgun at close range is like taking a simultaneous, very tight eight-round burst from a Skorpion. Except shotgun pellets tend to be going faster than most .32 ACP rounds too.



What is something that needs to be said?
It randomly came into my mind that there are two situation-

SITUATION 1

Rich people wear torn clothes due to fashion trend, spend more money on these dresses.




SITUATION 2

Poor people wear torn clothes due lack of money .




In SITUATION 1 it looks cool to wear torn clothes but in SITUATION 2 it looks gloomy, the difference is created due to availability or lack of money.

In this era money creates huge differences among similar things.

Thanks



A little background,I was born and raised in South Africa. We have the wealthy, rich, comfortable, working class, the broke, the poor and worse off. In my community there was the working class, broke and poor. As kids we all mixed up and played. Tirn clothes were a norm.

We were broke. Could buy food monthly, new clothes were a luxury, clothes were usually second hand or family hand me downs. I remember feeling so proud that I got to wear the pyjamas that belonged to my eldest brother, passed down to my older brother then finally i got them. If I got too tall, my grandmother converted my dresses into skirts.

When this torn look came in I didn't feel comfortable with it. People around me wear it but it feels like such a waste. Why ruin brand new fabric for the sake of fashion? Old worn out torn clothes cannot look fashionable and I always imagine how it feels like to walk past someone with old clothes and you are wearing fashionable rags?



Meanwhile, the woman in the first picture looks like she is scolding selena for being on her phone too much.

Upvote
·
23

Reply




View More Comments


The Legacy Report
Sponsored



What psychological knowledge could save a life?
If someone gets aggressively violent and wants to start a fight . . . raise your hands, back away and leave if possible.

Being a “ tough guy “ and trying to prove yourself is the stupidest thing you could possibly do in that situation.

I’ve worked with Nepalese Gurkhas . . . the toughest, most effective fighters in the world and I’ve seen them in a bar where fights broke out. They just kept their seats and continued drinking their beers while tables and chairs flew through the air.

They did absolutely nothing until someone tried to hit them . . . then it took all of five seconds for them to “ neutralize the threat “.

Consider this cheetah to be a Ghurka ,




Despite the loss of her forward ballast tanks, the San Francisco was able to surface and travel 360 nautical miles under her own power. Her bow was replaced with the bow of the newly decommissioned USS Honolulu and she remained in active service until 2016, when she was converted to a training ship.

I think that it is not too much of a stretch to say that a whale would not have survived that collision. As to if the collision would have been enough to cause injuries or fatalities on the sub, I hope we never have the opportunity to find out. Fortunately, whales are pretty good about getting out of the way when necessary.



You never know what kind of battle someone is having, and you might never know the entire story behind someone’s actions. Try to understand before judging.



They made who you are, they supported you financially for many years, and gave you emotional support when you needed it. Parents deserve the utmost respect and praise, forever.



If I say my name, what you will remember ?

Nothing right.

So all these great people are connected with their work.

People are known only by their work. Otherwise no one will look at you.

It’s a 100 % fact.

In fact there is no direct secret that can change life. Because it’s life.



must be something wrong with my brain
i dont think of people when i see these brands
1. microsoft - windows
2. facebook - social networking
3. amazon - bad working conditions
4. alibaba - poorly made cheap shit
5. berkshire hathaway - this is literally the first time ive heard of this, so i have no thoughts
6. apple - poorly made expensive shit
7. tesla - this is the exception, as this is literally someone's name, nikola tesla. its really sad if the first person you think of is elon musk when you hear “tesla”



What are some signs of being mentally weak?



You care too much what other people think of you. Everyday, there’s a number of people who wake up, with the sole goal of becoming offended by you. Don’t dissappoint them.
You can’t keep promises. I’m not even talking ’bout promises to others, but to yourself. Best example is working out, You told yourself you’d get into shape, but as soon as you tired from work or school, you won’t even go to the gym.
You get overwhelmed with the smallest problems and immediately throw your hands up and surrender. Nothing worthwile in life comes easy or without failure, rejection and sacrifice. Don’t expect that everything is handed to you on a silver platter! I failed two businesses before I started one that did “okay”. I failed two relationships, before I met my dream wife. I failed at getting lean and muscular numerous times, before I got the “hang” of it….
You’ve been FAT for years but you’re doing NOTHING to fix it. Look, there’s nothing wrong with being fat. If that’s what you really want, then you do you. But…if deep down inside, you’d love to be lean, healthy and confident in your own skin, then why don’t you change?
You’re inauthentic. Contrary to what you might think, I wasn’t always as harsh and straight forward as I’m now. In fact, I was a shy, timid, spineless idiot. I never spoke my truth and always agreed and smiled. Needless to say, my life was a mess. I was being used, manipulated and treated like a doormat. That was entirely my fault. I let it happen to me, because I couldn’t say “No.”
You’re a DDD (Dopamine Dependent Dreamer) and watch porn and play video games - Do you struggle with motivation? Do you struggle with being productive or keeping promises to yourself? Do you struggle to do hard things, like writing, reading “dry” texts, buidling a website, working out….? This might very well be, because you’re jackin’ off to porn or playing endless sessions of “League of Legends”. You see, our brains crave dopamine. Everytime you engage in a behaviour that’s fun, entertaining and engaging, your brain releases dopamin, which feels incredibly good to us and prompts us to repeat that behavior (pleasure and pain principle at work). Here’s the problem…You can train your brain to release dopamin to unhealthy and unproductive behaviours! Porn for example, feels incredibly good to us. It might even rival crack for that matter. The problem is, when you “spend” all your dopamin on porn, the hard things, the valuable task such as learning, reading, creating feel even MORE boring because there’s no immediate dopamine rush. It’s not exciting. It’s not highly stimulating. So, you won’t do it and thus..become mentally weaker and weaker.
You always WAIT for Motivation to Strike - This one is related to #6, but deserves to be a standalone. You’re always waiting to feel motivated to change your life, but because you never “feel” the motivation, you don’t do the hard stuff that’s necessary. Motivation will always be a fickle beast and you can’t rely on it to show up when you need it. That’s the bad news. The good news is, you can create motivation by ACTING as if you’re motivated. Motion beats meditation.
14K viewsView UpvotersView Sharers

140


2

4


4 comments from Bryan Michaels and more


UK Immigration Consultants
Sponsored



这种问题的本质就是“这两颗菜哪颗更能卖上价钱？”

所以，对于这种问题，我只想说：“知乎运营，我能说脏话吗？不能？那我没话说了。”

OK，既然确定了提问者是真人，而不是知乎运营，那我就多说几句。

第一，不要进入“那些人”的话语体系和价值判断标准下。

第二，更不要试图在“那些人”的价值判断体系下被“当盘菜”。

因为你越想被“他们”“当盘菜”，他们越不把你“当盘菜”。只有你不再试图被“当盘菜”而是试图成为一个完整而自我实现的“人”的时候，他们反倒有可能把你“当盘菜”。

第三，成为强者。越是事实上弱势的时候，越是要心理上成为强者。

第四，这个问题最好的回答是：不要去问这种问题。



您听听，它振振有词的，您听清楚它说的理由了吗？永远都是“我我我……”：“你养我？”、“我这样会方便我……”，总之嘴一张离不开我我我…………

至于别人会怎么样、大众会怎么样？对不起，它们是压根不会关心的！

哪怕你不小心撞上了它们，它们也只会骂你是个傻逼，绝不会认为错在它们。

如果你还以为可以跟它们谈人伦常理，相信我，你真是实在太天真了！




主啊谢谢你保守我脱离那些乱七八糟的疾病。嗯，正常功能是设计好的，bug是无尽的，真好，感谢上帝保守我到现在没有遇见那些乱七八糟的疾病。无论是生理，心理，灵魂。



野生食肉动物都喜欢吃脂肪，只吃肉是顶不住的。看了《荒野独居》的六七两季，里面的求生大佬们只吃野兔这种精瘦肉的根本顶不住，至少都要去捕鱼补充脂肪，不然即使吃瘦肉依然浑身无力头发晕。有一个外号兔姐的选手，一直吃兔子，后来因为BMI过低被节目组强制退赛了。然后有大佬可以捕杀到牛或者鹿的，夜里狼獾来偷他们的肉，都是把脂肪偷光，瘦肉都不吃，把大佬气死[飙泪笑]



自然界脂肪和糖都是最好的东西，当然人类这玩意儿不能吃太多。



人类嫌胖和少吃脂肪是近30年的事情



有的婆婆真是没事找事要给小两口制造矛盾。我哥没结婚之前我家吃饺子纯肉放几根葱，我嫂子不吃肉，结了婚我妈包饺子永远一荤一素两种馅，哪怕包饺子冻冰箱，也是分开冻好。小两口有矛盾自己又没好处，就算不为媳妇，也为了自己儿子好。



我妈也是，我有两个哥哥，大嫂爱吃韭菜水饺，二嫂韭菜过敏，我家都是包两种馅的水饺，两锅分开下水饺，韭菜比较容易破皮，一破皮，整个锅就韭菜味，都是两个锅子分着



有个小建议，凡是遇到欧美白人说中国人如何如何的，你只要不爱听，一律都可以回答“我认为你这是种族歧视”。然后看他风中凌乱就好。
​76
​回复
​踩
​举报

包祭璃月回复马跃欢乐多02-26
好家伙(●°u°●)​ 」，直接用魔法对抗魔法
​20
​回复
​踩
​举报

马跃欢乐多回复包祭璃月昨天 22,16
然后剩下的时间就是讨论他倒是是否是种族歧视，他赢了就为了自己洗白了，他输了就坐实了。至于是什么醉虾，早就不重要了。



真正让你流连忘返的，不过是一种“被人喜欢”的感觉罢了。



一女生，因为老公一时找不到伴郎她帮忙找，居然找了自己的前任；前任就前任吧，还是那种感情有点的前任……婚礼后俩人一喝多直接在酒店的客房里续起了旧爱，被某亲戚抓了个正着……事后女生解释说喝多了被他强上了，还打起了官司



接亲的时候不知道女方家哪来的习俗，让新郎爬树拿东西，小伙笨手笨脚一不小心摔了个脑震荡，婚礼直接取消，后来小伙住院工作也丢了



韩国想白嫖伊朗的石油，听了它漂亮爹的话，把伊朗的70亿救命钱给扣押了。

更过分的是，韩国还要对伊朗的钱收保管费，从70亿美元里一天一天地扣。（真TM不要脸）




事呢，是解决了，伊朗要求韩国返还给扣押的钱。并且，要还这段时间被扣押时那笔钱产生的利息……貌似是92亿美元。



他提问她，她向上看着，娇笑着，他便看向别处，问下大家意思下。不受诱惑的人，不接受诱惑。2021年03月02日10,36,37，上课，教授提问麻姑娘事件。



By looking at this man, what might you assume?

I see a classically handsome guy with a strong jawline, fine features and sincere, brown eyes. He is well-dressed. His hair, trimmed and combed neatly, along with his clean-shaven face tells me he takes pride in his appearance.

That’s my first impression. I would have probably done a double take if I had seen him somewhere. I see nothing that would make me assume he was anything but a kind, decent and very attractive man.

His name was Joseph and he was born in Leicester, England in 1862. He had a normal childhood, attended school and had a doting mother who dearly loved him.

He was very creative. His interests included drawing and model building and he treasured the time he got to spend cultivating those skills.

Around age five, he began to show signs that something wasn’t quite right. Dry, grey patches began to form on his skin followed by fleshy tumors on his body.

He needed more care as his condition worsened, which his mother, Mary Jane, lovingly provided. His mother also taught Joseph to read and write and passed down a passion for reading that lasted his entire lifetime.

When Joseph was 11 years old, what he described as the “greatest sadness in my life” happened. His mother passed away from pneumonia. He would also later say the only two people who showed him real love was the Lord and his mother.

His father remarried less than a year later and the cruel treatment at the hands of his stepmother caused Joseph to leave home to find work and make a living for himself.

At age 13, he found a job rolling cigars in a factory but within two years, he lost the use of his right hand. No longer able to do the work, he was forced to leave.

His father owned a haberdashery and sent his son out in the streets to sell his shop’s wares. By this point, however, Joseph’s deformities were so extreme, and his speech so impaired, that he frightened people.

One day his father beat him severely for not earning enough money, so Joseph went to live with an uncle briefly before becoming a resident at a workhouse at age 17.

He found life in the workhouse intolerable, but unable to find any other means of supporting himself, he was forced to stay.

It was said that Joseph "was a man of very strong character and beliefs - anxious to earn his own living and be independent of charity.” Only wanting to be “free and independent,” he eventually found the means to earn a decent living.

Though it was considered immoral, his only rational financial choice was to be put on public display with a traveling 'freakshow' exhibition.

He made a very decent living for himself and was able to set aside money for his dream of buying a small house where he might live quietly.

Those he worked with said of Joseph that “he was a most interesting man—he would talk on subjects you would never think a man in his condition would talk about. Very upstage subjects, you know, and he was a bit on the religious side, too.” Another said, “they could not admire his appearance, none could doubt his spirit.”

At the end of the shows, many of the ‘freaks’ would pass a hat around to collect charity. Joseph refused to do this however, quoted as saying he was not a beggar.

In 1884, the show was shut down by the police. He attempted to continue his career touring Europe but in June 1886, Joseph woke to find his employer had robbed him of his entire savings and abandoned him in Brussels.

For an average person, being left penniless in a country where you had no connections and didn’t speak the language would have been bad enough. For Joseph, it was catastrophic.

By pawning what few possessions he had left, he was able to make his way back to London. He arrived completely destitute, his will gone, his demoralization complete.

Due to his disfigurement, crowds gathered around him like prison walls everywhere he went. There were instances where the police had to intervene to free him from the hordes of gawkers. Women would sometimes scream at the sight of him. The kindest treatment he could hope for was to simply be stared at in horror and disgust.

In the same year, Joseph was admitted to the London Hospital under the care of Dr. Frederick Treves. Considered an incurable and unable to support himself anymore, it was obvious Joseph needed a permanent situation.

Dr. Treves made a public plea in a letter published in The Times newspaper for donations to fund Joseph’s care and accommodations at the hospital. In the letter Treves wrote,

“Terrible though his appearance is, so terrible indeed that women and nervous persons fly in terror from the sight of him, and that he is debarred from seeking to earn his livelihood in an ordinary way, yet he is superior in intelligence, can read and write, is quiet, gentle, not to say even refined in his mind. He occupies his time in the hospital by making with his one available hand little cardboard models, which he sends to the matron, doctor, and those who have been kind to him. Through all the miserable vicissitudes of his life he has carried about a painting of his mother to show that she was a decent and presentable person, and as a memorial of the only one who was kind to him in life until he came under the kind care of the nursing staff of the London Hospital and the surgeon who has befriended him.”

The generosity from the public was unexpected and overwhelming and more than covered the expenses for the remaining years of Joseph’s life. The very few years.

On April 11, 1890, just 27 years old, Joseph was found dead in his hospital bed.

Due to the weight of his head, Joseph could not lie down to sleep. To do so would have caused asphyxiation or his neck to break so he was forced to sleep sitting upright with his legs gathered up and his head resting on his knees.

It is unclear if his death was accidental or not. Joseph knew to lay down like “normal people” would be fatal. He was also found in the middle of the afternoon, a time which to go to bed was not at all usual for him.

His doctor argued that his death resulted from his "pathetic but hopeless desire" to sleep "like other people.” Others who knew him agreed with this, and asserted that he knew that to fulfill that desire would cost him his life.

That’s all he ever wanted. To just be normal.

Who was Joseph?

He was an artist. With only one functioning hand, he created this paper model of Mainz Cathedral.



What technology fact made you think "no wait, really"?
MRI Scanners. When I read how they work I literally put my tea down and sloshed it everywhere and said “it does what?!” out loud.

I long thought Magnetic Resonance Imaging scanners worked along similar lines to X-Rays or CT scans and used projected radiation.

Nuh-uh. (standby for some layman-speak)

We human meatbags are about 70% water. It’s a substrate in all our tissues.

Water is Hydrogen and Oxygen. Two atoms of the first and one the latter. Our Hydrogen atoms are one proton and one electron. We’re not so interested in those.

Our body’s hydrogen protons are usually all buzzing around like a classroom full of unruly kids with a timid supply teacher.

Their magnetic fields are all over the place and thus we, as humans, are generally not magnetic.

* Enter enormous electromagnetic stargate-bed *




Inside that thing is, among other things, a series of immensely powerful electromagnets.

The primary magnet, literally makes all of our body's hydrogen protons sit up, pay attention, and align themselves with the magnetic field.

It wraps you up in a forcefield and plays with the very atoms of your being.

The “kids” (protons) now sit round and face teacher, fidgeting in their seats in anticipation, and you are now magnetic.

The magnetic field direction is “longitudinal”, or from your feet to your head.

…Except for a few protons. Some are at higher energy states and resist aligning themselves to the field, and face the opposite direction (or what is called, being “anti-parallel”)

What happens next is a radio frequency generator sends a radio pulse that exactly matches the spin frequency of the protons, or resonance.

This gives a little energy boost to the protons that are aligned in the direction of the magnetic field, until 50 percent of the protons are flipped with the magnetic field, and 50 percent aren't. The magnetic fields cancel each other out.

The protons themselves also now spin together at the same pace and are all at the same points in their orbit or are in phase




(protons actually spin around an axis a little like a spinning top, which is known as precession. Imagine our protons are the tip of this spinning top and the line of the magnetic field is the bottom point on which it spins around)


As the protons are all spinning in a common direction, this creates another magnetic field, and in turn this movement generates a small electrical current in antennae which can be measured.

The RF frequency is then shut off. The protons return to their previous state, i.e. half facing their respective directions in the magnetic field, and now following their own points of orbit, no longer in phase.

The protons “relax” back into this state, and the difference between them switching from one state back to the first is what is measured.

Different tissues, like muscle or fat, have different water densities and electrical resistance, so the time taken for the protons to shift will differ, so we can contrast different tissues very clearly.

The signatures picked up by the machine of all this magnetic jiggery-pokery are calculated into images by some algorithmic magic, and is astonishingly detailed.



MRIs use the above process in contrast to the absorption of radiation such as in X-Rays and CT scans, and as such produce more detailed images of soft tissues and bodily structures in general.

In my mind it may as well be straight out of Star Trek.

***I've been without sensible Internet for a bit, 16k upvotes, wtf?! Humble thanks! ***



Do you ever doodle on your homework, or on tables, or just anywhere? If you did, give me an upvote, cause I like attention!

Just kidding. ,)

Well anyways, next time you do, take a close look at them! They can tell all about you!

Did you know that your doodles can determine your personality? Yeah, pretty cool, right?

Let's take a look at some of the most common things people doodle….

FLOWERS

If y’all love to draw flowers, it can show that you're a friendly person. You're also probably a more feminine person. Pointed petals show that you're a nice person though you may tend to act a bit cold. Rounded petals show that your family is important to you, and you’re openly friendly. A bunch of flowers show you have an extroverted side.



HEARTS

You love the idea of love, and you’re romantic. Bigger the heart, bigger the love!



LADDERS, ARROWS, & STAIRS

You’re ambitious, and you work hard to reach your goals. (You would never catch me drawing this, cause I’m way too airy, and I love to procrastinate. lol. )



YOUR NAME OR SIGNATURE

If this is something you draw pretty often, you lovelovelovelooveee attention, and maybe you’re self-centered. If you do this, you’re probably like, “I’m not self centered!!!” I just feel it in my fucking bones that you thought that to yourself.

Or you’re probably just practicing your signature.




PEOPLE

You have your life in order, you know what you’re doing, and you know what your emotions are doing. You’re in control of your life.




ANIMALS

Which animal do you draw most often? Well, you represent that animal, or at least you want to. Like drawing lions? You’re bold, or fierce. Like butterflies? You like your freedom. Like drawing snakes? You’re probably a backstabbing, unloyal bitch. Just kidding. ;)



FLAT SIDED SHAPES

You’re structured. You voice your opinions and you know what you’re doing, and you’re logical.




SWIRLIES

You like thinking. Your head is full of ideas, and imaginations.



SUN, MOON, STARS, ETC.

You’re a dreamer! You like fantasy and your head is in the clouds.



DRAWING EYES

Drawing eyes shows you’re cautious, and careful, and you may have a big personality!



This could go on forever, but I’ll stop. Hope y’all learned more about you or other people!!!

Sources,

What Do Your Doodles Say About You?

The meaning of doodles, when a squiggle isn't just a squiggle

All images drawn are mine. I’m sorry if some of them suck shit, but I don’t like drawing with pen, so excUSEE mE.



金教授说去那边如果没有帮助就去农场打工。嗯。可以尝试一下了，我觉得得尝试一下了。因为耶稣的许多比喻关于葡萄园和田地。还有，我必然要有这么一个过程在我的人生中，因为耶稣都有。



【可6,3】这不是那木匠吗？不是马利亚的儿子雅各、约西、犹大、西门的长兄吗？他妹妹们不也是在我们这里吗？”他们就厌弃他（“厌弃他”原文作“因他跌倒”）。



【代下19,2】先见哈拿尼的儿子耶户出来迎接约沙法王，对他说：“你岂当帮助恶人，爱那恨恶耶和华的人呢？因此，耶和华的忿怒临到你。



说是学越南同学，来了就把护照扔了。嗯。可以考虑。但，被以色列逐出，实在尴尬不是嘛？正常找吧。神有怜悯



会长那么厉害，那么爱主，那么研究的人，在韩国找神学读，刚来就是夜班的工作，每周一天也是，饭都是问题的他，啊，神的仆人，苦难满满，但，神与他同在，他为神而活。他为耶稣而活。不惧世人。



金教授作为副牧师，被主任牧师嫉妒，去腓律宾学神学，带着妻子和两个孩子，那么大的教会，一毛钱都不给，韩国一般都给几十万每月，但那个主任牧师一毛钱不给，他穷死的，如此的中文。四人在一单宿舍，厕所作厨房，这样的苦难。各样的苦难。



会长也一样。带着妻子孩子来韩国读神学，吃饭都成问题刚开始。啊。



计划，去以色列，刚开始的极其艰难，没有任何帮助的时候，我才能改变。所以，去了后不和任何人联系。免得我心有人依靠变得软弱。加油。全心依靠神。



只要人给个进入的机会，就是，第一学期学费和车费，ok。祷告是唯一的通话。



人啊，都是逼出来的。金教授和会长大人，都是完全没办法的，所以，去以色列，没有办法，才有了神的恩典。没有食物，才有的吗哪。有了食物，吗哪就停止了。人还抱怨。。。唉。。。任我饥饿的时候呢。苦炼我，任我饥饿，我方能知道。出发，离开，去到我主的国。话说，忽然想到路得了，捡麦子的，嗯。加油



我要去以色列，我要去橄榄山，我要在那里搭个帐篷等耶稣来。



每天用英语写日记，你可以查词，练习运用，考试的时候就查不了了，新词突然学会运用的还熟练的吗？



在你责备别人前，先想一想别人没有你那样的条件和待遇。2021年03月03日12,53,06，和t兄中午聊天，他韩语看不懂听不懂，气的我不行，让他好好学习，已经来韩国3年了的说，然后才知道，他原来一直生病，又得打工挣钱做手术，没法好好学习。唉。。。我为我的责备不爽而感到羞愧。而且，就算外界条件一样，还有神给每个人的不同基因呢。啊。真是，宽容，我还是需要操练多多啊，我以为我够忍耐了呢，一试就发现了，真是不行。，。得努力啊。



他做事很谨慎，买书，看到了也是又找助教和教授确认，找人问确认。真好。他很不容易，但做事很谨慎，很稳。我也应该学习，申请学校时，找工作时，都要重复和人确认下，问清楚相关的事情，需要的材料，以及相应的奖学金，并且，不要怕和人交流，如果不对，看看下一个。谨慎，稳，不怕人烦，不怕和人交流，实在的，人。我感觉就是机器的附属可不行。。。



我把刀交在他手里了。如果他要是能除去我的罪就太好了。如果有人能除去我的罪，我愿意献上我的全部家产，饿死也行。2021年03月04日，09,10,23，想到我的认罪信。想到不就是现在吗，我的耶稣能。那还想啥别的，已经满足。饿死也是满足。因已认识耶稣，信了耶稣。





Sent from my iPad




Some people are scapegoated by their families for no reasons of their own. So many years and tears are wasted trying to “resolve” differences which have nothing to do with what the scapegoat has done. He/she hasn’t “done” anything. They are victims of an unwinnable lottery. If you are a scapegoat in your family nothing you say or do can change that. You cannot “work out your differences,” “lay out your heart,” and have it change anything. In fact, they will use your vulnerabilities against you. There is only one way out—get out and don’t look back.
scapegoat替罪羔羊, 替人顶罪者, 替身winnable能赢得的lottery.奖券, 彩票, 运气lay out 摆开, 展示, 布置, 安排, 投资vulnerability易受伤, 易受责难, 易受伤部位
As a parent with three children you see the enormous power of genetics. Parents help nurture their children, but 80% of who we are is the product of the random combination of genes. My fraternal twins might as well be from different planets—looks, height, intelligence, hair color, and interests—all radically different.[1] Studies of identical twins reared apart show the huge influence of genes on several aspects of our personality, intelligence, height, preferences, etc.[2]

One man’s heaven is another man’s hell.

Trust your gut. It usually ends up being right, and you realize this after you ignore it and give ______ suspicious person your trust.

Everything is politics—even your family. Next, you can be the most competent person in the world, but if you aren’t political, you will be passed over, bullied, or ignored.

The strongest form of violence is mass quiet assent.

Update,

#5 does not mean every family scapegoats. Most don’t. But for those that do, sometimes the only resolution is leaving. Next, many family conflicts are caused by misunderstandings that can be resolved. I am referring here to those which cannot be resolved by “talking it out.”

#8 Trusting your gut doesn’t mean all people are bad. Nor does it mean that your gut is always right. Some people have poor instincts related to people so their “guts” are not very good guides. I am referring to your average person.

#9 means the interaction between people. Politics is “us,” not just what happens in Washington DC or London. It is the dynamics of human interaction.

#10 Mass quiet assent is what enables the few or many to conduct acts of violence. It was the neighbors of Jews in Eastern Europe calling on their Jewish neighbors to be arrested and taken to concentration camps. It was the silence of the German people. It is the silence of American citizens (and the outright support) of children being separated from their parents at the Southern border.



If a good looking man compliments a women, he's polite. If a bad looking man compliments a woman, he's a creep.



If a skinny girl dresses like this, she's comfy and cute, but if a more heavy set girl wears that kind of outfit, she's lazy and doesn't care about her appearance.



Male super heroes wear full body outfits while female super heroes dress like a freaking underwear model.
When girls wear make up, they “don't need it” when they don't, they look sick.



Men can walk around with their lits like a literal wild animal, but if women so much as miss a leg hair shaving its apparently disgusting.










meme, Etymology, Coined by British biologist Richard Dawkins in 1976 in his book The Selfish Gene. Shortened (after gene) from mimeme, 
verb 创造（新词，短语），杜撰 
meme(plural memes), Any unit of cultural information, such as a practice or idea, that is transmitted verbally or by repeated action from one mind to another in a comparable way to the transmission of genes. (Internet, slang) Something, usually humorous, which is copied and circulated online with slight adaptations, including quizzes, basic pictures, video templates etc.
slang俚语   adaptation适合,适应,顺应 改造,改装,改建; 改编 quiz noun (pl. quizzes)知识测验；智力竞赛，问答比赛 
(Internet slang) A myth circulating as truth; something ineffective presented as effective, or similar.
myth神话 （普遍持有的）错误见解（或想法） ineffective不起作用的；无效的 

Why aren't people talking about 3D printing anymore?
A2A, Because it failed to live up to the hype.

The hype was “Buy this thing! Make more things! Make anything you like!”

The reality was “Buy this thing! It’s cranky and fiddly and sometimes fails in really spectacular ways. It makes rough things, sorta, when it works. The software that runs it is ugly and fiddly and fussy, and requires vast amounts of faffing to get right. It can make some things, as long as there are no significant undercuts or arches, but it’s really slow even when it does work. Oh, and 3D modeling software has an enormous learning curve.”

It has quite a few genuine uses, but they tend to be niche cases. The more breathless predictions—“don’t buy anything any more, just download plans and make things yourself!”—aren’t even close to true.

I use my 3D printer heavily, because I’ve found one of those niche uses; I use it to 3D print molds for silicone sex toys.




But for everyday use? Well, there’s a reason if you look on sites that distribute models for 3D printers, a fair wedge of what they have on offer is…parts for 3D printers. That’s a sure sign of a device still searching for its killer app.



First and foremost, you need to have the right frame of mind or mindset in order to attain English mastery.

This is a harsh reality, by virtue of the fact that English is our global lingua franca today.

As a matter of fact, it's the Language of the 21st Century!

Putting this mindset into tactical terms, this means that you have got to integrate your learning of English into your everyday lifestyle.

Do not approach your learning from the standpoint of ESL or EFL. [ESL=English as Second Language; EFL=English as Foreign Language].

ENGLISH IS A LIFE SKILL!

In other words, you must not confine your learning of English to the spending of prescribed hours you are studying or learning in a classroom, within four walls in a school.

It is important for you to understand that English mastery also involves the acquisition of five critical skills sets,

1) Reading;
2)Thinking;
3) Listening;
4) Speaking;
5) Writing;

as applied in your everyday life experiences of the real world.

Like the five spokes of a wheel held all together by the rim with the tyre revolving around the hub, each of these areas need to be strong in order for the wheel to run smoothly on the road, just as you need the five skill sets in order for you to attain English mastery.

Seek every opportunity in your daily events and activities to learn - and master - English.

Initially, you can segregate them as follows, in tandem with the foregoing skill sets,

1) Reading;

- Perusing an English story book, preferably written for children as it may be easier for you to follow at the beginning, at least regularly, or the daily local English newspaper, but don't forget to reflect on the key ideas like the genre, plot, theme, setting, characters, critical events (climax), interesting phrases/words, personal impressions or feelings about the story, lessons learned, in the case of the story, or current issues of the day, as reported in the newspaper;

[If you are interested, you can explore the use of storyboards and storygrids to help you further in this particular area.]

- use Index Card Strategy for your vocabulary building and generation;
- if you are interested, you can explore/apply SQ5R in your reading pursuit [Just Google for it on the net];

2) Thinking;

- Finding one daily news article in your native language, and translating it into English; this is absolutely good practice to perfect your thinking and writing in English;
- Make it a daily habit to simply think of a problem or a challenge or an issue from your daily observations or reflections, and explore various ideas to resolve them, and then, pretend you are giving an oral presentation of your solutions to an audience;

3) Listening;

- Watching an English movie without subtitles, and paying particular attention to interesting dialogues and memorable quotes; don't forget to jot them down for review;
- Listening to pod-casts in English or the English news broadcasts; don't forget to jot down the salient points for review or self-talk;
- Watching YouTube video clips in English, and pausing in between to repeat what you have just heard; this is to practise your listening skills;

4) Speaking;

- Using FaceTime or Skype to converse with international friends, who speak English;
- Striking up casual conversations with Caucasian folks in the queue, say at any Starbucks or in any supermarket;
- Calling up customer service of MNC's and pretending to put forward your complaint;
- Dropping by a large hotel reception and pretending to check up the hotel for a forthcoming party of international friends, to seek opportunities to speak English.
- Singing in the shower with English songs, to practise your pronunciation;

5) Writing;

- Writing letters to international English-speaking pen-pals;
- Selecting interesting topics from your daily events or activities to write up a daily account, at least 250-500 words;

Others,

- Using your smartphone, loaded with "learning English" applications, for daily, spaced and distributed practice;
- you can also join a local chapter of the international Toastmasters' Club to perfect your public speaking. I am sure there is one in your city;

I am just scratching the surface, and am sure you can think of more ideas to help yourself in having a systematic way to master the English Language.

Meanwhile, I like to recommend you to carry a pocket notebook with you at all times.

Whenever you are on the streets, pay attention to the wall posters, billboards, window displays, bulletin boards or even signboards. If you come across new words, jot them down in your pocket notebook for reviewing at home with the aid of a dictionary.

Then, use your Index Card Strategy to master these new words.

Make it a habit to learn at least ten new words a day. In a year, you would have learned more than 3,500 words!

Look around you. Can you identify all the places or landmarks in English. If not, jot them down for reviewing at home.

Likewise, in the supermarket, ask yourself, can you identify all the items on display, in English? If not, you can start learning to read the labels.

Take note of casual conversations around you. Go home and review them. Better still, do a simulated conversation on your own, aloud, and in front of a mirror. You can record and review, too.

Upon reading a story book, or listening to a news broadcast, or watching a movie, spend a few minutes to recap the key ideas or salient issues of the day or the key plot of the movie, but more importantly for you, the lessons you have learned.

You can use the famed 6W1H questioning toolkit often used by journalists to spur your questions and expand your thinking.

Then, grab a sheet of blank paper and start writing down your answers as you think. In reality, these initiatives offer great opportunities - and practices - for you to think and write in English.

Frankly, the world out there is full of possibilities and opportunities when it comes to learning English. It's an invisible university!

One last point before I sign off, You can develop a system to learn and master English, but the fire test comes only from your consistent and massive following-up and following-through.

Godspeed to you!



The best way to improve anything is to start doing it. If you want to cook better, you need to start cooking. If you want better grades, you need to start studying. Similarly the only way to improve your English speaking skills is to start conversing in English. Many people feel bogged down or humiliated due to a certain inability to converse better in a foreign language. They start blaming their 'Hindi medium' background or how they were brought up in a town, but all this is of no use. Start forming groups with your friends and decide to converse with them only in English. You could also have certain sessions every week with your friends and family where every participant would be required to give a speech or organize an extempore event. This would not only improve your English skills but also remove the fear of speaking before an audience i.e. the so-called 'stage fear' would be conquered.
But as a dish is incomplete without all its ingredients, learning new words is a must if one desires to command a language. For that, I would suggest 'Word Power Made Easy' by Norman Lewis which covers hundreds of words in separate chapters and makes the entire learning process very simple through elaborate and comprehensive exercises. It is available at a very nominal price and is according to me the best book to improve English vocabulary.
But the most important thing is to get rid of those inhibitions that we all have and the desire to learn something new which you clearly possess. So best of luck and I'm sure that you would improve you vocab & speaking skills in English.



Trying to learn a language the same way a baby does is a silly idea, and I wish language-learning programs would stop putting it in people's heads. For one, it's impossible. Babies are acquiring their first language when they are learning, but an adult has already acquired a language. It's impossible to re-create that effect on the brain. Secondly, think about how well Chinese children speak when they are 4 or 5 years old. That's after 4 or 5 years of nothing but Chinese language immersion, with two permanent live-in Chinese teachers named 'Mom' and 'Dad'. Monolingual English-speaking children speak English poorly, even though they have spoken no other language for their entire lives. I'd much rather hire someone who had studied English (or Chinese) for 5 years over someone who spoke English (or Chinese) like a 5-year-old.

As an adult, you have much more life experience than a baby. You are capable of studying, taking notes, making connections and practicing in ways that small children simply cannot. You can learn faster and better than they can. The reason language learning is 'easier for kids' is because they're fearless--there is no social risk if they make a mistake. The reason language learning is 'easier for adults' is because they've already learned a language before, and probably many other very complicated skills, too--they have prior experience in learning difficult systems, and have an existing system to compare and contrast to. Adults have abstract thinking abilities that children don't. Adults also have something called 'metalinguistic awareness', which means you can think about language and understand things like metaphor, allusion, jokes, wordplay, how situation and tone of voice changes meaning, etc. and you have a greater ability to manipulate language than a child does. This is a big advantage for adult language learners.

Now, as for your question about learning like a child...

I'm currently an English language teacher abroad, and with the 3-6 year olds I teach, we only learn 3 words a day. Trust me, as a 23-year-old person, repeating 'I'm hungry! I'm hungry! I'm hungry! I'm hungry!' over and over again would be embarrassing and a waste of time--as would going back and chanting 'I'm hungry! I'm hungry! I'm hungry!' again five minutes later to make sure you haven't forgotten it. For a 3 or 4-year-old child, you have to do this because they will forget (or will refuse to participate the first time), and they have a hard time retaining 9 or 10 new phrases in the target language, when they spend 23 hours out of the day in a monolingual environment. But you're an adult--you CAN retain more information, and you can choose to practice more throughout the day in various ways that a 3-year-old can't. My low-level adult students have classes that are the same length as the children's classes, but by the end of the lesson, they are able to converse with one another using the target grammar for the day with a variety of new vocabulary terms. And we hardly ever sing The Alphabet Song with the grown-ups, which is always a plus when it comes to dignity.

That being said, American children start out learning to listen and speak before learning how to read. Writing is often the last skill they learn, because fine motor skills don't begin to develop until between the ages of 4-6. That's why children's handwriting looks so bad. They physically can't control the pencil very well. Again, you're an adult, so you can. You've also got a head start, in that you are able to read and write English at a pretty decent level (I didn't have any trouble comprehending what you wrote--the one thing I would suggest right now is that you put a space after all punctuation marks). What you probably need is a conversation tutor, to improve your verbal and aural skills.

Nobody starts out life learning IPA--many adults can't read IPA, and very few things are written in IPA anyway. We simply sound out words based on past experience with the language and learn the correct pronunciations through trial and error, or through having them modeled by another speaker. Many English words are mispronounced every day by native English speakers.



They can only be paired up in particular ways. It's okay to say "this evening" or "yesterday evening" but not "this night" or "yesterday night." But, "tomorrow night" and "tomorrow evening" are both okay. "Yesterday afternoon" is okay, but "last afternoon" is not. "Last evening" is not okay.

THIS MAKES ABSOLUTELY NO SENSE. (Unless a linguist wants to chime in here?)



No, they are generally unsuitable materials for learning English. They have the same built-in defects that you described Chinese songs have.

Songs are songs, and while they have a lot of the language in 'normal' form, the whole thing doesn't reflect everyday usage.

It's like trying to learn the everyday textures and operations of English from studying Shakespeare -- English speakers simply don't speak Shakespearean anymore. Same difference with songs.



What are some good websites and tutorials for learning English?

Anonymous
November 20, 2015
Originally Answered, Which are the websites to learn English?
Which skills do you want to learn in English?
For speaking, the best way is to speak as much as possible. If you dont have anyone to practice with, so you can record your speaking and practice yourself. I always watch some popular sitcom like "How I met your mother", "Friends" and repeat after them. You will be used to with their accents.

For reading, the only way is to read. Reading books, newspaper, ... It might be difficult at first because there are a lot of new words. But don't be worried. Install the dictionary to your device and read. Look up the word you dont know but dont try to remember it or write down anything. Keep reading. It will help you understand the writing styles, how grammar used in the sentences.

For writing, try to write as much as you can. Start with the easy thing like how your day is, your feelings, ... And even try to think in English. It is important to have good grammar. Then after that, you can find the structure of how to write different kinds of esssay. If it is possible, ask some friends who good at writing to help you fix yours.

For listening, try to listen whenever you can. When you play sports, go shopping. Do not pay attention to it. Just hearing, dont try to translate. Listen English audio, songs, anything from the easy level.

Best



I would recommend that you watch movies that you've already watched in your own native language. That way you already know the story, and can concentrate on listening to the English. Therefore, the film should be in English without any subtitles. Watch it once all the way through paying close attention to it. Then, watch it again concentrating on different scenes and repeating them as many times as needed until you understand them completely. Then, watch the movie again taking notes of the things you've learned. Finally, watch it again just for fun and whenever possible try to say the lines of the characters with them.

Have fun!



Although love looks like a test anybody can pass without special skills, very few people would have bet on Carmen's chances to find love in the arms of a man.



Indeed Carmen is a 29 year-old-Brazilian girl who suffers from a genetic disorder called xeroderma pigmentosum. Those who have this condition must not be exposed to sun or UV lights. Such exposures for a few minutes cause them severe sunburn and freckles. In addition to these restrictions, Carmen lost one lip, her left ear, she partly lost her nose due to a cancer of nose. Doctors tried to rebuild it through surgery, but it was unsuccessful.

All in all, Carmen has undergone about 120 repair surgeries. She also has a blind eye. She never went to school, only learning at home. Getting a job is another thing for her. But this tough life didn’t stop Edmilson to love and share Carmen’s life.

People came accross their story when she launched a fundraising for help to hold her wedding party with her fiancé. She also needed to renovate her house. People reacted with money and support and their wedding party took place on july 31, 2020. She could also have a decent house. Since then, Carmen share her daily life with her husband on Instagram with about 247k followers.




Being bound to someone's soul, beyond physical appearance is the best love and the best proof of love.



What is the most effective way to see a person's true personality?
This question is actually a good one. The answer I have is actually 100% effective to understand what a persons about. I don’t care if it’s a friend, or a girlfriend/boyfriend, you wanna see all deep dark corners of someone’s true personality?

Live with them..




If you want to see you’re 100% compatible with your boyfriend or girlfriend? Live with them for at least 3 months. Do you want to lose a fiend? Live with them. If you want to know what anyone’s personality is about, good or bad, share a space with them, you’ll get a pretty good idea of what they’re about.



In the West we generally think sitting on flushable toilets is superior, modern, and sanitary. It’s also terrible for your body!



Actually squatting is bio-mechanically more efficient, so you have to push and strain less. Which means less anal tearing, crapping, and general slowness.



Squatting can be a problem for the elderly and handicapped people, but for younger and generally healthy people it is a far superior way to use the restroom.

How to do this with a Western toilet,




What is a life hack that you think everybody should know?
Keep your phone out of sight. I’ll say that again, very slowly, because it might not make sense at first.

Keep. Your phone. Out. Of. Sight.



…is an increase in your productivity with a magnitude of at least 5x-10x.

A study at the University of California, Irvine, found that “the typical office worker is interrupted or switches tasks, on average, every three minutes and five seconds.”

3 minutes and 5 seconds. That’s 185 seconds in total between one interruption and the next.

What’s more, “it takes an average of 23 minutes and 15 seconds to get back to the task.”

23 minutes! That’s over 7 times as long as it takes for you to be interrupted again.



What does that tell us? The average worker never even gets close to the zone of deep work, where complex tasks are accomplished with good results.

As if that wasn’t enough - your phone is only one of many sources of distractions, after all - we keep our biggest nemesis right in front of us.

Not only will we look at it every time it vibrates or makes a noise, when our phone is within arm’s reach, we’ll naturally pick it up every couple minutes, just because we can. You know “just in case.”

Don’t give me that look. I know you do it too. We’re all weak.

Well, Justin, you can stay in your case from now on (pun alert), because we won’t be playing your game any more.

Out of sight, out of mind.

Put your phone…

into your desk drawer,
behind your laptop,
slip it under a couch cushion,
leave it in your bag,
store it in your locker
…or keep it in another room altogether.

The level of peace, relaxation and productivity you’ll face will be unprecedented. Stop being average. Start being awesome.

It can begin with something as small as moving your phone a few centimeters. That’s the life hack I’d like everyone to know.








Nah, I don’t trust it. As much as I would like to believe companies would stand by their mission statement, they really don’t. This is a PR stunt and frankly, even if their technology is good, it being leashed to the CCP is a hard no. I don’t know if I’m just giving too much of a nationalistic view against China, but knowing how they consistently force their companies into submitting to them or using their products to keep Chinese citizens subjugated, I dont want to buy their technlology.
Nah(非标准)。 同 no，
Xiaomi knows this is great for PR, people would love to buy from a people oriented company, but they know very well that they can’t ensure customer privacy or keep you, the user from getting their data used by the CCP. If a company wants to operate in China, they need to follow the CCP’s rules, and I would not trust any company which is essentially forced into giving its customers’ data to a hostile foreign power.



Hello there, Israel is the best option in terms of scholarship for master’s program. You don’t have to pay anything from your pocket. It is free education with a decent fellowship, that covers your living expenses (no need to mention the great research facilities and environment). However, only one problem in Israel is that not all the courses are offered in English. But the situation is changing. (Weizmann Institute offers everything in English). Look for universities in Israel.



That depends on what your source of funding is.

If, like me, you’re lucky enough to work with someone who has funding for PhD students, then you’ll work out your salary with them. Worth noting that in most cases this will probably be in the form of a scholarship, which doesn’t count as a salary—you probably won’t have to pay income tax or national insurance on it, but you won’t get any benefits (including paying into a pension fund, which is worth a lot) either.

Again, I was lucky here, and have a supervisor who actually pays me a wage. This is pretty rare, and you’ll need to find someone generous and with a very good source of funding.

There are scholarship programs, and you can get up to a full scholarship in this way, but the details will depend on the program.

At the Hebrew University, where I am, the maximal scholarship for a stage 1 (i.e. hasn’t yet handed in a proposal) PhD student is 250% of tuition, which is currently in the region of 7500 NIS (about $2000) a month. Not all scholarship programs give you a full (i.e. maximal) scholarship. The exact amounts will depend on your institution.



I checked my pockets and I had exactly $102.00.

Me, “May I have 2 hot apple pies please?”

Very young cashier, “Sure. That’ll be $1.06 with tax.

I handed her my money.

VYC, “What’s this?”

Me, “What’s wrong?”

VYC, Is this real?”

Me, “Is what real?”

VYC, “This bill. Is this a joke?”

Me, “I don’t understand.”

VYC, (Calling her manager) “Hey Ralph! We have a problem!”

Ralph (Also very young), “What’s wrong?”

VYC,” This guy is passing a phony bill.”

Me, “This isn’t fake, it’s real money.

Ralph, “Do you have a different form of payment sir?”

Me, “Just a hundred-dollar bill.”

Ralph, “We don’t accept bills over $50.”

Me, “I don’t have anything else. Why can’t you take my $2.00?”

Ralph, “Because this isn’t money.”

Me, “Of course it’s real money.”

At this time, a mall security cop about my age shows up behind me.

Mall cop, “Is there a problem here?”

Ralph, “This guy’s trying to pass a phony bill.”

Mall cop, “May I see the bill, please?”

They showed it to him.




Mall cop, “So what’s the problem again?”

VYC, “It’s obviously a phony bill.”

Mall cop, “What else did he have?”

Ralph, “A hundred-dollar bill.”

Mall cop, “Did he try to pass it as fake?”

VYC, “No, he never offered to pay with it. We don’t take anything over $50 anyway.”

The mall cop straightened out the cashier and the manager, assuring them the bill was legit.

The manager apologized and offered me a free soda along with the apple pies. The very young cashier was still holding the bill, staring at it with her mouth agape in wonder. She took 2 one-dollar bills out of her own pocket to put in the cash drawer and kept the two-dollar bill for herself.

She and the manager were still staring at it when I left.




Now here’s where things begin to get screwy.

The US Mint wanted to reintroduce the $2 back in 1976 when the United States was celebrating its Bicentennial. It was one of those things that seemed like a good idea at the time, but it turned out to be a boondoggle.

Many people erroneously believed that the 1976 series note with its unusual reverse design was a special, limited issue note, produced for the United States Bicentennial; this, combined with the earlier discontinuation of the denomination, gave the impression these notes might be valuable as collector's items and contributed to hoarding.

Today, the general public is still largely unfamiliar with the notes because they are not widely circulated and continue to be frequently hoarded.

The printing of a two-dollar bill costs the same as printing a one-dollar bill. It was estimated that if two-dollar notes replaced approximately half of the one-dollar notes in circulation, the federal government would be able to save about $26 million in 1976 dollars ($117 million adjusted for inflation today) over the period from 1976 to 1981, due to reduced production, storage, and shipping costs. So the US Mint thought of it as cost-effective but the public has not circulated them as widely. So it's no wonder people didn't recognize them today.


Tips to Improve Your Reading Skills
Learn how to improve your English reading skills with these tips to help you prepare for the TOEFL iBT® test and university study.

Read in English as much and as often as you can.
Read texts on a variety of topics.
Read both academic and non-academic materials.
Read about subjects that interest you and about subjects that don't interest you.
Write basic questions to test your understanding of a text.
Write questions and answers about the first paragraph, then guess what might be discussed in the next paragraph.
Use your knowledge of grammar to understand difficult sections of a passage.
Think carefully about the relationship between independent and dependent clauses.
Look for words that refer back to some information given in a previous section of the text.
Look at pronouns and find the nouns that they refer to.
Look at relative pronouns (who, that, which, whom, whose) used in adjective clauses — for example, "The student whose classmates are taking the TOEFL® test …" and find the nouns they refer to.
Continually expand your vocabulary knowledge.
It is important to increase your vocabulary on many subjects, because you will have to read about various topics at university.
Review glossaries/lists of terms used in academic textbooks.
Make a plan for studying new words.
Write a new word on 1 side of a card and the definition on the back.
Write the sentence you saw the word in to help you learn correct usage.
Study the words often, and always mix up the cards.
Group the words by topic or meaning. Study the words as a list of related words.
Study vocabulary by making a list of opposites (words with different meanings) and synonyms (words with similar meanings).
opposites — relevant-irrelevant, abstract-concrete
synonyms — excellent, outstanding, superb
Review the new words on a regular basis so that you remember them.
Expand your vocabulary by analyzing the parts of a word.
This will help you understand some unknown words that you see.

Study roots — a part of a word that other parts are attached to
-spect- (look at)
-dict- (say)
Study prefixes — a part of a word attached to the beginning of the word
in- (into)
pre- (before)
Study suffixes — a part of a word attached at the end of the word
-tion (inspection)
-able (predictable)
Study word families — the noun, verb, adjective or adverb forms of related words
enjoyment (noun)
enjoy (verb)
enjoyable (adjective)
enjoyably (adverb)
Use the context to guess the meaning of unknown words.
Notice when difficult terms are defined in the text.
Look for examples with an explanation of the meaning of a word.
Look at the other words and structures around an unknown word to try to understand it.
Use resources to help you study vocabulary.
Use an English dictionary to learn correct meaning and word usage.
Get calendars that teach a new word each day, or look for websites that will send you an email with a new word each day.
Study the vocabulary you find on university websites that give information about the university and the faculty teaching at the school.
Practice correct usage by making sentences with new words. This will also help you remember both the meaning and the correct usage of the words.
Have a teacher check your sentences.
Review the new words on a regular basis so that you remember them.
Learn to recognize different organizational styles so you can understand the way an article or text is structured.
Read an entire passage from beginning to end.
Look for the main ideas of the article.
Look for the supporting details.
Pay attention to the relationship between the details and the main ideas.
Look for the common patterns of organization you find in articles.
Pay attention to connecting words so you can understand the pattern of organization.
Write a summary of a text, making sure that it incorporates the organizational pattern of the original.
Pay attention to the connecting words/transitions used for specific relationships.
steps — first, second, next, finally
reasons — because, since
results — as a result, so, therefore
examples — for example, such as
comparisons — in contrast, on the other hand
restatements of information — in other words, that is
conclusions — in conclusion, in summary
If the text argues 2 points of view, be sure both points of view are reflected in your summary and that appropriate transitional words are used.
Look at connections between sentences.
Look at how the end of 1 sentence relates to the beginning of the next sentence.
Think about the connection between the ideas of the 2 sentences.
Combine the sentences using appropriate transition words to show the relationship between ideas.

Tips to Improve Your Listening Skills
Learn how to improve your English listening skills with these tips to help you prepare for the TOEFL iBT® test and university study.

Practice listening to something in English every day, and gradually increase the amount of time that you listen.
Listen to different types of materials.
Listen actively. Try to answer the following questions,
who
what
when
where
why
how
Listen passively to get the general idea of what's being said.
Keep a listening log (a list of everything you listen to in English each day/week).
Write a 1-sentence summary to remember the main idea of what you heard.
Write down new expressions, idioms and vocabulary that you hear.
Use dictation and other exercises to help your listening ability.
Ask an English speaker to dictate an article to you. Good sources of material are podcasts, magazines or online articles or textbooks.
First, write down exactly what you hear.
Then, only take notes on the important points that you hear.
Do information gap exercises, using unfamiliar content and complex structures.
Use the resources in your community to practice listening to English.
Visit places where you can practice listening.
If possible, enroll in an English class.
Go to a museum and take an audio tour in English.
Follow a guided tour in English in your city.
Call or visit a hotel where tourists stay, and get information in English about room rates, hotel availability or hotel facilities.
Call and listen to information recorded in English, such as a movie schedule, a weather report or information about an airline flight.
Watch or listen to TV programs and podcasts recorded in English.
Some helpful TV channels to listen to are CNN®, Discovery Channel® and National Geographic®, as well as soap operas or situation comedies.
Do this with a friend and talk about the program together.
Watch movies or other videos online (turn off the captions!) or go to a movie in English.
Listen to an audiobook in English.
Listen to English-language recordings that come with a transcript. Listen to each recording at least 3 times,
The first time, take notes about the main ideas you hear.
The second time, read the transcript and listen for the ideas you wrote down.
The third time, write down any words and phrases that you didn't understand, and look them up.
Practice speaking English with others.
Exchange language lessons with an English speaker who wants to learn your language.
Begin to prepare for academic situations.
Visit academic classes conducted in English.
Record lectures or presentations, and replay them several times.
Listen to short sections several times, until you understand the main points and the flow of ideas.
Stop the recording in the middle, and predict what will come next.
Become familiar with the organization or structure of academic lectures.
Pay attention to the difference between main ideas and details presented.
Listen for the general (main) ideas.
Pay attention to details — facts, examples, opinions.
Pay attention to the structure.
Lecture or presentation — introduction, body and conclusion
Narrative story — beginning, middle and end
Learn to recognize different styles of organization.
Theory and evidence
Cause and effect
Steps of a process
Comparison of 2 things
Think carefully about the purpose of the lecture.
Try to answer the question, "What is the professor trying to accomplish in this lecture?"
Write down only the information that you hear. Be careful not to interpret information based on your personal understanding or knowledge of the topic.
Develop a note-taking strategy to help you organize information into the main points and supporting details.
Make sure your notes follow the organization of the lecture.
Listen for related ideas and relationships within a lecture, and make sure you summarize similar information together.
Use your notes to write a summary.
Listen for signals that will help you understand the organization of a talk, connections between ideas and the importance of ideas.
Listen for expressions and vocabulary that tell you the type of information being given. Think carefully about the type of information that these phrases show,
opinion — I think, It appears that, It is thought that
theory — in theory
inference — therefore, then
negatives — not, words that begin with "un-," "non-," "dis-" or "a-"
fillers — non-essential information — uh, er, um
Identify digressions — discussion of a different topic from the main topic — or jokes that are not important to the main lecture. It's OK not to understand these!
Listen for signal words or phrases that connect ideas in order to recognize the relationship between ideas. Think carefully about the connection between ideas that these words show,
reasons — because, since
results — as a result, so, therefore, thus, consequently
examples — for example, such as
comparisons — in contrast, than
an opposing idea — on the other hand, however
another idea — furthermore, moreover, besides
a similar idea — similarly, likewise
restatements of information — in other words, that is
conclusions — in conclusion, in summary
Pay attention to the connections between examples.
When you hear 2 details, identify the relationship between them.
Write a sentence connecting the examples, using the appropriate connecting word.
Pay attention to intonation and other ways that speakers indicate that information is important. Important key words are often,
repeated
paraphrased — repeated information but using different words
said louder and clearer
stressed
Pay attention to body language and intonation patterns used to express different emotions.
Emotions are often expressed through changes in intonation or stress.
Facial expressions or word choices can indicate excitement, anger, happiness or frustration.
Listen to how native English speakers divide long sentences into "thought groups" to make them easier to understand — a thought group is a spoken phrase or short sentence. Thought groups are separated by short pauses.
Listen to sets of thought groups to be sure you get the whole idea of the talk.
Listen for pauses between important points.
Listen for numbers you might hear in prices, times or addresses.
Listen for verbs and other expressions that show if an event is happening in the past, present or future.
During a lecture, pay attention to words that are written on the board.


Tips to Improve Your Speaking Skills
Learn how to improve your English speaking skills with these tips to help you prepare for the TOEFL iBT® test and university study.

Develop friendships with people who want to speak English with you.
If you can't find a native English speaker, find a friend who wants to practice speaking English, and promise to speak only English to each other for a certain period of time.

Record yourself speaking in English.
Read a paragraph from an academic course book, and practice summarizing the paragraph aloud.
Practice several times, and then record your summary.
Listen to your summary again a week later. Transcribe what you said, and review your mistakes.
Read a simple paragraph and record your voice. Ask a teacher to give you feedback on the recording.
Listen to something spoken by a native English speaker. Record yourself repeating the same information, and compare it to the native English speaker.
Practice speaking for a limited time on different topics without a lot of preparation.
Write down several questions about various topics. Then, select a question and answer it aloud. Try to talk for 1 minute.
family
hobbies
friends
school
cities
countries
places you are familiar with
Ask a friend to give you topics, and record yourself discussing them. Ask someone to listen with you and suggest ways for you to improve.
Think of a story that you are familiar with. Tell the story to several different people, and try to tell the story faster each time.
Give yourself about 20 seconds to think about what you did yesterday. After 20 seconds, begin to recount what you did. Try to talk for 1 minute.
Pay attention to your use of the past tense.
Try to use connecting words and phrases such as first, then, while I was.
Give yourself about 20 seconds to think about what you will probably do tomorrow. After 20 seconds, begin to talk about what you are planning to do. Try to talk for 1 minute.
Try to use different forms of the future tense.
Listen to audiobooks and podcasts.
Study pronunciation, stress and intonation.
Sign up for an audiobook subscription service or look for free audiobook samples online.
Practice speaking about everyday issues relevant to students' lives.
Read articles from campus newsletters.
Discuss the articles with a speaking partner or friend.
Practice summarizing the articles and expressing your opinions about them.
Concentrate on speaking clearly, with good pronunciation and intonation.
Speak with confidence and open your mouth more widely than you normally do.
It is difficult to understand you if you speak word by word. Try to speak in "thought groups."
Take a reading passage and mark the thought groups first. Then, read it aloud, paying close attention to these groups of words and ideas.
Get an audiobook or a transcript from a news report, podcast, interview or play.
Listen to the performance and mark the pauses, stress and intonation on the transcript.
Then, read the transcript and try to imitate the pauses, stress and intonation patterns.
Listen to the radio and watch TV and movies.
Pay attention to idiomatic usage of the language and different accents or speech patterns that are used.
Write down new expressions you hear. Use the expressions in your everyday English conversations.
Choose a character from a film or TV show. Repeat the character's words, following the intonation patterns, as he or she speaks. Include the gestures or other body language of the character you are imitating.
Listen to a college radio station in your area.
Make a list of the kinds of topics being discussed.
Use the list to generate discussion topics with your friend or speaking partner.
Practice pronunciation and intonation by reading aloud.
Record yourself so you can hear your accent. Pay attention to your mistakes.
Work on pronouncing word endings clearly.


Tips to Improve Your Writing Skills
Learn how to improve your English writing skills with these tips and practices to help you prepare for the TOEFL iBT® test and university study.

Read and listen to academic articles and other material in your own language.
Take notes on what you read and hear.

Start out taking notes in your own language, and then take notes in English.
Summarize the points in complete English sentences.
Ask your teacher to review your writing and help you correct your errors.
Gradually decrease the time it takes you to read the material and write these summaries.
Practice typing on a QWERTY (standard English) keyboard, if you don't already use one.
Listen to recorded lectures in English. Practice finding the main points and taking notes.
Stop the recording every 20–30 seconds and write down the main points.
Replay the recording to check your notes and add information you may have missed.
Use your notes to write out these ideas in fuller, more complex English sentences.
Learn important phrases that help you figure out what is happening.
Determine who the source of the information is,
the speaker
someone else the speaker is talking about
Find out how certain the information is — might be versus is
Listen for words that indicate the main ideas being discussed,
point
factor
issue
Practice writing grammatically correct sentences and use appropriate words to summarize information from text and lecture material.
Each week, focus on a different aspect of English grammar. Complete grammatical exercises that reinforce this aspect.
Record news broadcasts and informational programs in English from the radio or TV.
Practice listening and writing grammatical sentences about what you hear the newscaster say.
Ask your teacher or a friend to review your work.
Learn to pay attention to differing ideas about a topic, and to find the similarities and differences of opinion.
Look at different articles about the same topic (for example, editorials). Make a list of the similarities and differences of opinion about the topic.
Take a controversial cultural issue, and write about how your culture understands it. Then, compare your ideas with someone from another culture.
Study expressions that are used to compare and contrast ideas,
in contrast
on the other hand
however
but
although
similarly
like
Do another writing task in which you explain the ways in which these points are related, the ways they are different, or the ways in which one article supports the other or makes you look at the other in a different way.
Read 1 lengthy article in English from a magazine or a website each day.
Outline the article.
Write a summary of it in English as quickly as you feel comfortable writing.
Ask your teacher to review your summary to see if your sentences are grammatically correct, and if your sentences and vocabulary have accurately expressed the ideas from the original source.
If you are writing many short, simple sentences, try to combine related ideas into more lengthy, complex sentences.
Read short but interesting academic articles in magazines and on websites in your own language each day.
Translate them into complete, accurate sentences in English.
Ask your teacher to review your translations for accuracy of content, vocabulary, and grammar.
Learn to recognize common errors you make so you can correct these on your own.
Practice combining information you have heard and read into a written summary.
Read a text before listening to a talk on the same subject. Make a list of the similarities and differences of the information presented.
Read an editorial on a subject. Then talk to someone about it and listen to what they say about the issue. Then, write a summary of the different views.
Get a book that teaches the different types of connecting words.
These expressions show the relationship between sentences and paragraphs. Know expressions that show,

reasons — because, since
results — as a result, so, therefore
examples — for example, such as
comparisons — in contrast, on the other hand
a process or list — first, second, then
conclusions — in conclusion, in summary
Practice English writing and typing every day.
Keep a journal — write your opinions about things you experience or topics in which you are interested.
Start out writing in your own language — this will help you get used to journal writing and build your confidence in your writing ability.
When you begin to feel comfortable keeping a journal, write it in English.
Pay attention to your grammar and sentence structure.
Study the basics of English grammar and develop your vocabulary.
Practice writing correct sentences in English — begin by writing simple sentences.
Make sure each sentence has a subject and a verb, and that the subject agrees with the verb.
The student likes …; The students like …
Take 2 of your sentences and practice combining them.
Re-read what you wrote — look for and correct mistakes.
Study the organization of good paragraphs and essays.
A good paragraph discusses 1 main idea. This idea is usually included in the first sentence, which is called the topic sentence. Each paragraph should discuss 1 aspect of the main idea of the essay.

Write paragraphs in English that focus on 1 main idea and contain several complete sentences that explain or support that idea.
Ask your teacher to review your paragraphs for correctness.
Think about who will be reading your writing. In some situations, you need to write in a formal manner and your sentence structure, vocabulary use and general style should reflect that.
Read in English as much as you can — this will help you recognize good writing styles.
Pay attention to how ideas support a position.
Practice generating ideas to support a position.

Read articles and essays that express opinions about an issue — for example, a social, environmental or educational issue.
Identify the writer's opinion or opinions.
Notice how the writer addresses possible objections to the opinion, if they are present.
Outline the article and note the ways the writer supports the ideas.
Write a response in English to the article or essay, taking the opposite viewpoint.
Outline your response.
Note the methods you use to support your ideas.
Re-read what you have written.
Make sure your supporting ideas are clearly related to your main point.
Note what methods you use to develop each of your supporting points.
Make sure you have developed each of your points in detail. Is there anything more you could have said to strengthen your points?
Pay attention to how you organize ideas.
Think about how a reader who isn't familiar with your topic is going to be able to follow the information you want to present.

Spend time planning and thinking about how to organize your ideas. Your reader should be able to understand how your essay is organized.
Have a friend or teacher outline your essay so you can see if others can recognize how you present and explain your ideas.
Make sure you are using the right words to connect your ideas and supporting information in the way you want your reader to understand them.
Remember that your reader doesn't know what you know or what you intend. Is there any way your reader might misunderstand? If so, consider revising how you present and explain your ideas.
Ask your teacher to check your use of topic sentences, paragraphs, and connecting words, phrases and sentences. Did you use these correctly and effectively?
Continue improving your English writing ability.
Create your own dictionary of English words.
Use those words in your own writing.
Try writing longer and more complex sentences.
Focus on appropriate sentence formation and accurate word choice.

TOEFL iBT ® Listening Practice Questions
This document may contain some question types that would not appear on a test that has been adapted for various
accessibility purposes. On test day, you will receive an accessible assessment that is consistent with any
accommodations for which you have been approved.
Listening Practice Set 1
Directions, Read the script. Give yourself 10 minutes to answer the questions in this practice set.
Library Tour
Narrator Listen to a conversation between a male student and a female librarian.
Student Hi. I’m new here ... I, uh, couldn’t come to the student orientation—and I’m
wondering if you can give me a few quick pointers about the library? I’d really
appreciate it.
Librarian Sure. I’d be glad to. What’s your major area of study?
Student Latin American literature.
Librarian OK. Well, over here’s the section where we have language, literature, and the arts,
and if you go downstairs you’ll find the history section. Generally the students
who concentrate in Latin American literature find themselves researching in the
history section a lot.
Student Uh-huh. You’re right. I’m a transfer student. I’ve already done a year at another
university, so I know how the research can go—I’ve spent a lot of time in the
history section. So how long can I borrow books for?
Librarian Our loan period is a month. Oh, I should also mention that we have an interlibrary
loan service ... if you need to get hold of a book that’s not in our library. There’s
a truck that runs between our library and a few other public and university
libraries in this area. It comes around three times a week.
Student Hey, that’s great! At my last school, it could take a really long time to get the
materials I needed, so when I had a project, I had to make a plan way in advance.
This sounds much faster. Another thing I was wondering is ... is there a place
where I can bring my computer and hook it up?
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS)
in the United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxLibrarian Sure. There’s a whole area here on the main floor where you can bring a laptop
and plug it in for power. But on top of that we also have a connection for the
Internet at every seat.
Student Nice! So I can do all the research I need to do right here in the library. I’ll have all
the resources, all the books and information I need right here in one place!
Librarian Yup, that’s the idea! ... I’m sure you’ll need photocopiers, too. They’re down the
hallway to your left. We have a system where you have to use a copy card, so
you’ll need to buy a card from the front desk. You insert it into the machine and
you’re ready to make copies.
Student How much do you guys charge?
Librarian Seven cents a copy.
Student That’s not too bad. Thanks. Uh, where’s the collection of rare books?
Librarian Rare books are up on the second floor. They’re in a separate room where the
temperature is controlled to preserve the old paper in them. You need to get
special permission to access them, and then you’ll have to wear gloves to handle
them, ’cause the oils in our hands, you know, can destroy the paper, and gloves
prevent that, so we have a basket of gloves in the room.
Student OK, thanks ... I suppose that’s all I need to know. You’ve been very helpful,
thanks.
Librarian Any time. Bye.
Student Bye.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Answer the questions.
1. Why does the student come to the library?
A To learn about the library’s resources
B To ask about interlibrary loans
C To attend the new student orientation
D To start work on a research project
2. Why does the librarian point out the history section to the student?
A She wants to point out the closest area containing copy machines.
B She assumes that he will need to do research there.
C The student is looking for a book he used at his last school.
D Students sometimes mistakenly assume that the section contains literature books.
3. What does the student imply about the interlibrary loan service at his last school?
A He never used it.
B He came to appreciate it.
C It was inconvenient.
D It was expensive.
4. What does the student need to do before he can use any rare books? Choose 2 answers.
A Purchase a card
B Obtain permission
C Put on gloves
D Try interlibrary loan first
5. Part of the conversation is repeated below. Read it and answer the question.
Student
I’ll have all the resources, all the books and information I need right here in one place!
Librarian Yup, that’s the idea!
Which sentence best expresses what the librarian means when she says this,
Librarian Yup, that’s the idea!
A
B
C
D
I wish this were true.
That is not a very good idea.
Thanks for your suggestion.
That is what we intended.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 1 Answers
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
A
B
C
B, C
D
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 2
Directions, Read the script. Give yourself 10 minutes to answer the questions in this practice set.
Well-Made Play
Narrator Listen to part of a lecture in a class on theater history. The professor is discussing
the theater of nineteenth-century France.
Professor The nineteenth century was the time that saw what we call “realism” develop in
the European theater. Uh, to understand this, though, we first need to look at an
earlier form of drama known as the “well-made play,” which, basically, was a
pattern for constructing plays—plays that, um, beginning with some early
nineteenth-century comedies in France, proved very successful commercially. The
dramatic devices used here weren’t actually anything new—they’d been around
for centuries. But the formula for a well-made play required that certain of these
elements be included, in a particular order, and—most importantly—that
everything in the play be logically connected. In fact, some of these playwrights
would start by writing the end of a play and work backward toward the beginning,
just to make sure each event led logically from what had gone before.
OK, so what are the necessary elements of a well-made play? Well, uh, the first is
logical exposition.
Exposition is whatever background information you have to reveal to the
audience so they’ll understand what’s going on. Before this time, exposition
might have come from actors simply giving speeches. Uh, someone might walk
out on stage and say, “In fair Verona, where we lay our scene,” and then tell all
about the feuding families of Romeo and Juliet. But for the well-made play, even
the exposition had to be logical ... believable. So, for example, uh, you might
have two servants gossiping as they’re cleaning the house, and one says, “Oh,
what a shame the master’s son is still not married.” And the other might mention a
rumor about a mysterious gentleman who’s just moved into town with his
beautiful daughter. These comments are part of the play’s logical exposition.
The next key element of a well-made play is referred to as “the inciting incident.”
After we have the background information, we need a key moment that gets
things moving, that really makes the audience interested in what happens to the
characters we just heard about. So, for example, after the two servants reveal all
this background information, we meet the young man, just as he first lays eyes on
the beautiful young woman and immediately falls in love. This is the inciting
incident. It sets off the plot of the play.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxNow the plot of a well-made play is usually driven by secrets—uh, things that the
audience knows, but the characters often don’t know. So for example, the
audience learns through a letter or through someone else’s conversation who this
mysterious gentleman is and why he left the town many years before. But the
young man doesn’t know about this ... and the woman doesn’t understand the
ancient connection between her family and his.
And before the secrets are revealed to the main characters, the plot of the play
proceeds as a series of sort of up-and-down moments. For example, the woman
first appears not to even notice the young man, and it seems to him like the end of
the world. But then he learns that she actually wants to meet him too, so life is
wonderful. Then if he tries to talk with her, maybe her father gets furious, for no
apparent reason. So they can’t see each other. But just as the young man has
almost lost all hope, he finds out ... well, you get the idea—the reversals of
fortune continue, increasing the audience’s tension and excitement, making them
wonder if everything’s going to come out OK or not.
Next comes an element known as the obligatory scene.
It’s uh, it’s a scene, a moment in which all the secrets are revealed and generally
things turn out well for the hero and others we care about—a happy ending of
some sort. This became so popular that a playwright almost had to include it in
every play, which is why it’s called the obligatory scene.
And that’s followed by the final dramatic element ...
The denouement or the resolution, when all the loose ends have to be tied up in a
logical way. Remember, the obligatory scene gives the audience emotional
pleasure, but the denouement offers the audience a logical conclusion. That’s the
subtle distinction we need to try very hard to keep in mind.
So, as I said, the well-made play—this form of playwriting—became the basis for
realism in drama and for a lot of very popular nineteenth-century plays—and also
a pattern we find in the plots of many later plays and even movies that we see
today.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Answer the questions.
1. What is the lecture mainly about?
A The importance of creating believable characters in plays
B The influence of the literature of “realism” on French theater
C A successful standard formula for writing plays
D A famous example of a well-made play
2. According to the professor, why did some playwrights write the end of a play before the
beginning?
A To produce multiple scripts as quickly as possible
B To prevent the audience from using logic to guess the ending
C To avoid writing endings similar to those of other plays
D To ensure that the plot would develop in a logical manner
3. Why does the professor mention a conversation between two servants?
A To give examples of typical characters in a well-made play
B To show how background information might be revealed in a well-made play
C To explain why Romeo and Juliet can be considered a well-made play
D To explain how playwrights develop the obligatory scene of a well-made play
4. According to the professor, what dramatic elements are typically included in a well-
made play to help move the plot forward? Choose 2 answers.
A A series of major changes in the hero’s apparent chances of success
B The introduction of new characters midway through the play
C Information known to the audience but not to the main characters
D The movement of major characters from one setting to another
5. What does the professor imply about the obligatory scene and the denouement?
A The difference between them might be unclear to some people.
B Both are useful techniques for developing realistic characters.
C The denouement usually occurs within the obligatory scene.
D The obligatory scene is usually less exciting than the denouement.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx6. Part of the lecture is repeated below. Read it and answer the question.
Professor
This is the inciting incident. It sets off the plot of the play.
Why does the professor say this,
Professor
A
B
C
D
It sets off the plot of the play.
To help students understand the meaning of a new term
To indicate that his point is not related to the main topic of the lecture
To emphasize one element of a play over all others
To begin to summarize the main points of the lecture
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 2 Answers
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
C
D
B
A, C
A
A
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 3
Directions, Read the script. Give yourself 10 minutes to answer the questions in this practice set.
Health Club Library
Narrator Listen to a conversation between a student and a business professor.
Professor So, Richard ... what’s up?
Student Well, I know we have a test coming up on chapters ... uh ...
Professor Chapters 3 and 4 from your textbook ...
Student Right ... 3 and 4. Well, I, uh ... I didn’t get something you said in class Monday.
Professor Alright, do you remember what it was about?
Student Yeah, you were talking about a gym ... a health club, where people can go to
exercise ... that kind of thing.
Professor OK. But the health-club model is actually from chapter 5, so ...
Student Uh, chapter 5? Oh, so it’s not ... OK, but I guess I still want to try to understand
Professor Of course. Well, I was talking about an issue in strategic marketing. Um, the
health-club model, um ... I mean, with a health club, you might think they would
have trouble attracting customers, right?
Student Well, I know when I pass by a health club and I see all those people working out
... exercising ... I’d just as soon walk on by!
Professor Yeah, there’s that, plus ... lots of people have exercise equipment at home, or
they can play sports with their friends, right?
Student Sure.
Professor But nowadays, in spite of all that, and expensive membership fees, health clubs
are hugely popular. So, how come?
Student I guess that’s what I didn’t understand.
Professor OK. Basically, they have to offer things that most people can’t find anywhere
else— You know, quality. That means better exercise equipment, high-end stuff.
Um, and ... classes ... exercise classes, maybe aerobics ...
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxStudent I’m not sure if I ... oh, OK, I get it ... Yeah. And you know, another thing is, I
think people probably feel good about themselves when they’re at the gym. And
they can meet new people, socialize ...
Professor Right. So, health clubs offer high-quality facilities, and also, they sell an image ...
about people having more fun, relating better to others, and improving their own
lives, if they become members.
Student Sure. That makes sense.
Professor Well then, uh, can you think of another business or organization that could benefit
from doing this?
Student Um ...
Professor Think about an important building on campus here, something everyone uses ... a
major source of ... information.
Student You mean like, an administrative building?
Professor Well, that’s not what I had in mind ...
Student Oh! You mean the library?
Professor Exactly. Libraries. Imagine public libraries. ... They’re an information resource
for the whole community, right?
Student Well, they can be, but ... now, with the Internet, and big bookstores, you can
probably get what you need without going to a library.
Professor That’s true. So, if you were the director of a public library, what would you do
about that?
Student To get more people to stop in? Well, like you said, better equipment. Maybe a
super-fast Internet connection. And not just a good variety of books, but also, like,
nice, comfortable areas where people can read and do research. Things that make
them want to come to the library, and stay.
Professor Great.
Student Oh, and ... maybe have authors come and do some readings? Or, I don’t know ...
special presentations. Something people couldn’t get at home.
Professor Now you’re getting it.
Student Thanks, Professor Wilkins. I think so too ...
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Answer the questions.
1. What is the conversation mainly about?
A Preparing for a test
B A strategy for attracting customers
C Business opportunities in the field of health
D Differences between two business models
2. What does the professor imply about the upcoming test?
A It will not contain questions about the health-club model.
B It will ask about ways to improve the customer’s self-image.
C It will require students to discuss marketing strategies for libraries.
D It will not require students to give examples of successful businesses.
3. Based on the conversation, indicate whether each of the following is offered by health
clubs. Choose the correct boxes.
Yes
No
Low membership fees
High-quality facilities
Exercise classes
Positive self-image
Special presentations
4. What does the professor imply about public libraries?
A They tend to be more popular than health clubs.
B They cannot offer as many services as health clubs.
C They should not spend money on high-quality equipment.
D They need to give greater emphasis to strategic marketing.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx5. Part of the conversation is repeated below. Read it and answer the question.
Professor I mean, with a health club, you might think they would have trouble attracting
customers, right?
Student Well, I know when I pass by a health club and I see all those people working out
... exercising ... I’d just as soon walk on by!
Why does the student say this,
Student
A
B
C
D
Well, I know when I pass by a health club and I see all those people working out
exercising ... I’d just as soon walk on by!
To introduce a personal story about exercising
To point out a flaw in the health-club model
To give an example that supports the professor’s point
To explain why he disagrees with the professor
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 3 Answers
1. B
2. A
3.
Yes
Low membership fees
High-quality facilities
Exercise classes
Positive self-image
Special presentations
No
X
X
X
X
X
4. D
5. C
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 4
Directions, Read the script. Give yourself 10 minutes to answer the questions in this practice set.
Glacier Movement
Narrator Listen to part of a lecture in a geology class.
Professor Last time we started to talk about glaciers and how these masses of ice form from
crystallized snow. And some of you were amazed at how huge some of these
glaciers are. Now, even though it may be difficult to understand how a huge mass
of ice can move—or flow, it’s another word for it—it’s really no secret that
glaciers flow because of gravity. But how they flow, the way they flow needs
some explaining. Now, the first type of glacier flow is called basal slip.
Basal slip—or sliding, as it’s often called— basically refers to the slipping or
sliding of a glacier across bedrock—actually across a thin layer of water on top of
the bedrock.
Uh, so this process shouldn’t be too hard to imagine. What happens is that the ice
at the base of a glacier is under a great deal of pressure, the pressure comes from
the weight of the overlying ice. And you probably know that under pressure, the
melting temperature of water, uh, of the ice, I mean, is reduced. So ice at the base
of the glacier melts, even though it’s below zero degrees Celsius, and this results
in a thin layer of water between the glacier and the ground. This layer of water
reduces friction, it’s ... it’s like a lubricant, and it allows the glacier to slide or
slip over the bedrock. OK?
Now, the next type of movement we’ll talk about is called deformation.
You already know that ice is brittle—if you hit it with a hammer, it will shatter
like glass. But ice is also plastic—it can change shape without breaking. If you
leave, for example, a bar of ice supported only at one end, the end—the
unsupported end— will deform under its own weight—it’ll kind of flatten out at
one end, get distorted, deformed.
Think of deformation as a very slow oozing. Well, depending on the stresses on a
glacier, the ice crystals within it reorganize. During this ... uh, reorganization, uh,
the ice crystals realign in a way that allows them to slide past each other. And so
the glacier oozes downhill without any ice actually melting. Now there are a
couple of factors that affect the amount of deformation that takes place or the
speed of the, ah, glacier’s movement. For example, deformation is more likely to
occur the thicker the ice is—because of the gravity of the weight of the ice. And
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxtemperature also plays a part here, in that cold ice does not move as easily as ice
that is closer to the melting point—in fact, it’s not too different from, hmm, the
way oil is, uh, thicker, at low temperatures. So if you have a glacier in a slightly
warmer region, it will flow faster than a glacier in a cooler region.
OK, hmm, now I’d like to touch briefly on extension and compression. Your
textbook includes these as types—as a particular type—of glacial movement, but
you’ll see that there are as many textbooks that omit it as a type of movement as
include it. And I might not include it right now if it weren’t in your textbook. But,
hmm, basically, the upper parts of glaciers have less pressure on them, so they
don’t deform as easily, they tend to be more brittle. And crevasses can form in
these upper layers of the glaciers when the glacier comes into contact with
bedrock walls or, ah, is otherwise under some kind of stress but can’t deform
quickly enough. So the ice will expand or constrict, and that can cause big
fissures, big cracks to form in the surface layers of the ice. And that brittle surface
ice moving is sometimes considered a type of glacial movement, depending on
which source you’re consulting.
Now, as you probably know, glaciers generally move really slowly, but
sometimes they experience surges, and during these surges, in some places they
can move at speeds as high as 7,000 meters per year. Now speeds like that are
pretty unusual, hundreds of times faster than the regular movement of glaciers—
but you can actually see glaciers move during these surges, though it is rare.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Answer the questions.
1. What is the lecture mainly about?
A Explanations of how glaciers move
B Landscape changes caused by glacial movement
C Climate changes that influence glacial movement
D Causes of glacial formation
2. The professor discusses the process of basal slip. Put the steps in the correct order.
Answer Choices
A Friction between the glacier and bedrock is reduced.
B A liquid layer forms at the base of the glacier.
C The glacier begins to slide.
D Pressure is increased on the ice.
3. What factors are involved in the amount of deformation a glacier undergoes? Choose 2
answers.
A Thickness of glacial ice
B The hardness of glacial ice
C The amount of water beneath the glacial ice
D The temperature of the glacial ice
4. What does the professor say about the speed of glaciers?
A It affects the amount of glacial ice that forms.
B It can be fast enough for movement to be noticeable.
C It is reduced by cracks in the ice.
D It is unusually high in colder regions.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx5. What is the professor explaining when he says this,
Professor But ice is also plastic—it can change shape without breaking. If you leave, for
example, a bar of ice supported only at one end, the end—the unsupported end— will
deform under its own weight ...
A
B
C
D
A characteristic of ice that is related to glacial movement
How scientists first discovered that glaciers could move
That factors like temperature can affect the strength of ice
Why deformation is the most common type of glacial movement
6. Part of the lecture is repeated below. Read it and answer the question.
Professor Now I’d like to touch briefly on extension and compression. Your textbook includes
these as types—as a particular type—of glacial movement, but you’ll see that there
are as many textbooks that omit it as a type of movement as include it. And I might
not include it right now if it weren’t in your textbook.
What does the professor imply about compression and extension?
A
B
C
D
He believes it accounts for a great deal of glacial movement.
He thinks it is a slower type of glacial movement than basal slip.
He is not convinced that it is a type of glacial movement.
He does not agree that it causes fissure in glaciers.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 4 Answers
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
A
D, B, A, C
A, D
B
A
C
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 5
Directions, Read the script. Give yourself 10 minutes to answer the questions in this practice set.
Women Artists of Late Nineteenth-Century Paris
Narrator Listen to part of a lecture in an art history class.
Professor We’ve been talking about the art world of the late nineteenth century in Paris,
and today I’d like to look at the women who went to Paris at that time to
become artists. Now, um, from your reading, what do you know about Paris ...
about the art world of Paris during the late nineteenth century?
Male student People came there from all over the world to study.
Female student It had a lot of art schools and artists who taught painting. There were ... our
book mentions classes for women artists. And, uh, it was a good place to go
to study art.
Professor If you wanted to become an artist, Paris was not a good place to go—Paris was
the place to go. And women could find skilled instructors there. Um, before the
late nineteenth century, if they ... women who wanted to become artists had to
take private lessons or learn from family members. They had more limited
options than men did. But around 1870, some artists in Paris began to offer
classes for female students. These classes were for women only.
And by the end of the nineteenth century, it became much more common for
women and men to study together in the same classes. So ... so within a few
decades, things had changed significantly.
Uh, OK, let’s back up again and talk about the time period from the 1860s to
the 1880s, and talk more about what happened in women’s art classes. In 1868,
a private art academy opened in Paris—and for decades it was probably the
most famous private art school in the world. Its founder, Rodolphe Julian, was
a canny businessman and quickly established his school as a premiere
destination for women artists. What he did was, after an initial trial period of
mixed classes, he changed the school policy; he completely separated the men
and women students.
Female student Any reason why he did that?
Professor Well, like I said, Julian was a brilliant businessman with progressive ideas—he
saw that another small private art school where all the students were women
was very popular at that time, and that’s probably why he adopted the women-
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxonly classes. These classes were typically offered by, um ... by established
artists and were held in the studio, the ... the place where they painted. This
was a big deal because finally women could study art in a formal setting. And
there was another benefit to the group setting of these classes. The classes
included weekly criticism. And the teacher would rank the art of all the
students in the class, from best to worst. How would you like it if I did that in
this class?
Male student No way!
Female student But our textbook said that the competitive ... the competition was good for
women. It helped them see where they needed to improve.
Professor Isn’t that interesting? One woman artist, um, her name was Marie Bashkirtseff.
Uh, Bashkirtseff once wrote how she felt about a classmate’s work. She
thought her classmate’s art was much better than her own, and it gave her an
incentive to do better. Overall, the competition in the women’s art classes gave
women more confidence. Confidence that they could also compete in the art
world after their schooling. And even though Bashkirtseff couldn’t study in the
same classes as men, she was having an impact as an artist. Um, just look at the
Salon. What do you know about the Salon?
Female student It was a big exhibition, um, a big art show that they had in Paris every year.
The art had to be accepted by judges.
Male student It was a big deal. You could make a name for yourself.
Professor You could have a painting or sculpture in the Salon and go back to your home
country saying you’d been a success in Paris. Um, it was sort of a seal of
approval. It was a great encouragement for an artist’s career. And by the last
two decades of the nineteenth century, one fifth of the paintings in the Salon
were by women—much higher than in the past. In fact, Marie Bashkirtseff
herself had a painting in the Salon in 1881. Interestingly, this masterpiece,
called In the Studio, is a painting of the interior of Julian’s art school. Um, it’s
not in your textbook—I’ll show you the painting next week ... Uh, the painting
depicts an active, crowded studio with women drawing and painting a live
model. It was actually, Bashkirtseff actually followed Julian’s savvy
suggestion, and painted her fellow students in a class at the school with the
artist herself at the far right—a great advertisement for the school when the
painting eventually hung at the Salon, for a women’s studio had never been
painted before.
Directions, Answer the questions.
1. What is the lecture mainly about?
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxA
B
C
D
Why the Salon exhibitions became popular among women artists in Paris
Why French society did not approve of art schools for women
How opportunities for women artists in Paris improved
How women artists in Paris cooperated with one another
2. What point does the professor make about Julian when he mentions that Julian’s art
school offered some classes only for women?
A Julian’s school was the first art school in Paris to offer women-only classes.
B Julian wanted to encourage the distinctive style of women in Paris.
C Julian viewed himself as a social reformer.
D Julian possessed outstanding business skills.
3. What does the professor emphasize as one benefit of competition in women’s classes?
A Women gained more confidence in their artistic abilities.
B Women became instructors in private art studios.
C Women were able to sell their paintings for large amounts of money.
D Women created new styles of painting.
4. According to the professor, what were two ways that the situation of women artists had
changed by the end of the nineteenth century in Paris? Choose 2 answers.
A Women and men took art classes together.
B Women artists played a greater role in the Salon exhibitions.
C More schools were established by women artists.
D Fewer women artists were traveling to Paris.
5. What does the professor imply about Bashkirtseff’s painting In the Studio?
A It was one of many paintings that depicted a women’s studio.
B It did not bring Bashkirtseff recognition for her artistic ability.
C It was criticized for an unrealistic depiction of women artists.
D It was beneficial for both Bashkirtseff and the school where she studied.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx6. Part of the lecture is repeated below. Read it and answer the question.
Female student It had a lot of art schools and artists who taught painting. There were ... our
book mentions classes for women artists. And, uh, it was a good place to go to
study art.
Professor If you wanted to become an artist, Paris was not a good place to go—Paris was
the place to go.
What does the professor mean when he says this,
Professor
A
B
C
D
If you wanted to become an artist, Paris was not a good place to go—Paris was
the place to go.
Paris was a popular place to visit but not the best place to study art.
Paris was the most important place for an artist to study and work.
Living in Paris was difficult for women artists from other countries.
Studying in Paris was beneficial for some artists, but not for others.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 5 Answers
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
C
D
A
A, B
D
B
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 6
Directions, Read the script. Give yourself 10 minutes to answer the questions in this practice set.
Update from Basketball Coach
Narrator Listen to a conversation between a student and her basketball coach and then
answer the questions.
Male coach Hi, Elizabeth.
Female student Hey, Coach. I just thought I’d stop by to see what I missed while I was gone.
Male coach
Well, we’ve been working real hard on our plan for the next game . . . I’ve
asked Susan to go over it with you before practice this afternoon, so you’ll
know what we’re doing.
Female student Okay.
Male coach
By the way, how did your brother’s wedding go?
Female student Oh, it was beautiful. And the whole family was there. I saw aunts and uncles and
cousins I hadn’t seen in years.
Male coach
So it was worth the trip.
Female student Oh definitely. I’m sorry I had to miss practice, though. I feel bad about that.
Male coach
Family’s very important.
Female student Yep. Okay, I guess I’ll see you this afternoon at practice, then.
Male coach
Just a minute. There are a couple of other things I need to tell you.
Female student Oh, okay.
Male coach
Uh . . . First, everybody’s getting a new team jacket.
Female student Wow. How did that happen?
Male coach
A woman who played here about 20, 25 years ago came through town a few
weeks ago and saw a game, and said she wanted to do something for the team,
so . . .
Female student So she’s buying us new jackets?
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxMale coach
Yep.
Female student Wow, that’s really nice of her.
Male coach
Yes, it is. It’s great that former players still care so much about our school and
our basketball program . . . Anyway you need to fill out an order form. I’ll give
it to you now, and you can bring it back this afternoon. I’ve got the forms from
the other players, so as soon as I get yours we can order. Maybe we’ll have the
jackets by the next game.
Female student OK.
Male coach
Great. And the next thing is, you know Mary’s transferring to another college
next week, so we’ll need someone to take over her role as captain for the second
half of the season. And the other players unanimously picked you to take over
as captain when Mary leaves.
Female student Wow. I saw everybody this morning, and nobody said a word.
Male coach
They wanted me to tell you. So, do you accept?
Female student Of course! But Susan’s a much better player than I am. I’m really surprised they
didn’t pick her.
Male coach
They think you’re the right one. You’ll have to ask them their thoughts.
Female student Okay . . . I guess one of the first things I’ll have to do as captain is make sure we
get a thank-you card out to the lady who’s buying us the jackets.
Male coach
Good idea. I have her address here somewhere.
Female student And I’ll make sure the whole team signs it.
Male coach
Good. That’s all the news there is. I think that’s it for now. Oh, let me get you
that order form.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Answer the questions.
1. What are the speakers mainly discussing?
A How the woman should prepare for the next game
B The woman’s responsibilities as team captain
C Things that happened while the woman was away
D The style of the new team uniforms
2. Who is buying new jackets for the team?
A The coach
B The captain of the team
C A former player
D A group of basketball fans
3. Why is the woman surprised to learn that she has been chosen as the new team captain?
Choose 2 answers.
A She is not the best player on the team.
B Her teammates did not tell her about the decision.
C She does not have many friends on the team.
D She has missed a lot of practices.
4. Read part of the conversation again. Then answer the question.
Female student I’m sorry I had to miss practice, though. I feel bad about that.
Male coach
Family’s very important.
What does the coach mean when he says this,
Male coach
A
B
C
D
Family’s very important.
He hopes the woman’s family is doing well.
He would like to meet the woman’s family.
The woman should spend more time with her family.
The woman had a good reason for missing practice.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx5. Why does the coach say this,
Male coach
A
B
C
D
Good. That’s all the news there is. I think that’s it for now.
He wants to know if the woman understood his point.
He wants the woman to act immediately.
He is preparing to change the topic.
He is ready to end the conversation.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 6 Answers
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
C
C
A, B
D
D
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 7
Directions, Read the script. Give yourself 10 minutes to answer the questions in this practice set.
The Moonstone
Narrator
Listen to part of a lecture in a literature class.
Male professor Today I’d like to introduce you to a novel that some critics consider the finest
detective novel ever written. It was also the first. We’re talking about The
Moonstone by Wilkie Collins. Now, there are other detective stories that
preceded The Moonstone historically—Um, notably the work of Poe . . . Edgar
Allen Poe’s stories, such as “The Murders in the Rue Morgue” and . . . “The
Purloined Letter.” Now these were short stories that featured a detective . . . uh,
probably the first to do that. But The Moonstone, which follows them by about
twenty years—it was published in 1868—this is the first full-length detective
novel ever written.
Now, in The Moonstone—if you read it as . . . uh, come to it as a contemporary
reader—what’s interesting is that most of the features you find in almost any
detective novel are in fact already present. Uh, it’s hard at this juncture to read
this novel and realize that no one had ever done that before, because it all seems
so strikingly familiar. It’s, it’s really a wonderful novel and I recommend it, even
just as a fun book to read, if you’ve never read it. Um, so in The Moonstone, as I
said, Collins did much to establish the conventions of the detective genre. I’m
not gonna go into the plot at length, but, you know, the basic set­ up is . . .
there’s this diamond of great . . . of great value, a country house, the diamond
mysteriously disappears in the middle of the night, uh, the local police are
brought in, in an attempt to solve the crime, and they mess it up completely, and
then the true hero of the book arrives. That’s Sergeant Cuff.
Now, Cuff, this extraordinarily important character . . . well, let me try to give
you a sense of who Sergeant Cuff is, by first describing the regular police. And
this is the dynamic that you’re going to see throughout the history of the
detective novel, where you have the regular cops—who are well-meaning, but
officious and bumblingly inept—and they are countered by a figure who’s
eccentric, analytical, brilliant, and . . . and able to solve the crime. So, first the
regular police get called in to solve the mystery—Um, in this case, detective, uh,
Superintendent Seegrave. When Superintendent Seegrave comes in, he orders his
minions around, they bumble, and they actually make a mess of the
investigation, which you’ll see repeated—um, you’ll see this pattern repeated,
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxparticularly in the Sherlock Holmes stories of a few years later where, uh,
Inspector Lestrade, this well-meaning idiot, is always countered, uh, by Sherlock
Holmes, who’s a genius.
So, now Cuff arrives. Cuff is the man who’s coming to solve the mystery, and
again he has a lot of the characteristics that future detectives throughout the
history of this genre will have. He’s eccentric. He has a hobby that he’s
obsessive about—in this . . . in his case, it’s the love of roses. He’s a fanatic
about the breeding of roses; and here think of Nero Wolfe and his orchids,
Sherlock Holmes and his violin, a lot of those later classic detective heroes have
this kind of outside interest that they . . . they go to as a kind of antidote to the
evil and misery they encounter in their daily lives. At one point, Cuff says he
likes his roses because they offer solace, uh, an escape, from the world of crime
he typically operates in.
Now, these detective heroes . . . they have this characteristic of being smart,
incredibly smart, but of not appearing to be smart. And most importantly, from a
kind of existential point of view, these detectives see things that other people do
not see. And that’s why the detective is such an important figure, I think, in our
modern imagination. In the case of The Moonstone—I don’t want to say too
much here and spoil it for you—but the clue that’s key to . . . the solving of the
crime is a smeared bit of paint in a doorway. Of course, the regular police have
missed this paint smear or made some sort of unwarranted assumption about it.
Cuff sees this smear of paint—this paint, the place where the paint is smeared—
and realizes that from this one smear of paint you can actually deduce the whole
situation . . . the whole world. And that’s what the hero in a detective novel like
this . . . brings to it that the other characters don’t—it’s this ability to, uh, see
meaning where others see no meaning and to bring order . . . to where it seems
there is no order.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Answer the questions.
1. What is the lecture mainly about?
A A comparison of two types of detective novels
B Ways in which detective novels have changed over time
C The Moonstone as a model for later detective novels
D Flaws that can be found in the plot of The Moonstone
2. In what way is The Moonstone different from earlier works featuring a detective?
A In its unusual ending
B In its unique characters
C In its focus on a serious crime
D In its greater length
3. According to the professor, what do roses in The Moonstone represent?
A A key clue that leads to the solving of the mystery
B A relief and comfort to the detective
C Romance between the main characters
D Brilliant ideas that occur to the detective
4. Why does the professor mention a smeared bit of paint in a doorway in The Moonstone?
A To describe a mistake that Sergeant Cuff has made
B To show how realistically the author describes the crime scene
C To exemplify a pattern repeated in many other detective stories
D To illustrate the superior techniques used by the police
5. What can be inferred about the professor when he says this,
Male professor
A
B
C
D
Uh, it’s hard at this juncture to read this novel and realize that no one
had ever done that before, because it all seems so strikingly familiar.
He is impressed by the novel’s originality.
He is concerned that students may find the novel difficult to read.
He is bored by the novel’s descriptions of ordinary events.
He is eager to write a book about a less familiar subject.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxListening Practice Set 7 Answers
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
C
D
B
C
A
A
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx


TOEFL iBT ® Reading Practice Questions
This document may contain some question types that would not appear on a test that has been adapted for various
accessibility purposes. On test day, you will receive an accessible assessment that is consistent with any
accommodations for which you have been approved.
Reading Section Overview
The Reading section measures your ability to understand academic passages written in English.
You will read one passage and answer questions about it. In the actual TOEFL iBT® test, you
would have 20 minutes to read the passage and answer the questions. Test takers with disabilities
can request a time extension.
Reading Practice Set 1
Directions, Read the passage. Give yourself 20 minutes to complete this practice set.
The Rise of Teotihuacán
Paragraph
1 The city of Teotihuacán, which lay about 50 kilometers northeast of modern-day Mexico City,
began its growth by 200 –100 B.C. At its height, between about A.D. 150 and 700, it probably
had a population of more than 125,000 people and covered at least 20 square kilometers. It
had over 2,000 apartment complexes, a great market, a large number of industrial workshops,
an administrative center, a number of massive religious edifices, and a regular grid pattern of
streets and buildings. Clearly, much planning and central control were involved in the
expansion and ordering of this great metropolis. Moreover, the city had economic and perhaps
religious contacts with most parts of Mesoamerica (modern Central America and Mexico).
2 How did this tremendous development take place, and why did it happen in the Teotihuacán
Valley? Among the main factors are Teotihuacán’s geographic location on a natural trade
route to the south and east of the Valley of Mexico, the obsidian 1 resources in the Teotihuacán
Valley itself, and the valley’s potential for extensive irrigation. The exact role of other factors
is much more difficult to pinpoint —for instance, Teotihuacán’s religious significance as a
shrine, the historical situation in and around the Valley of Mexico toward the end of the first
millennium B.C., the ingenuity and foresightedness of Teotihuacán’s elite, and, finally, the
impact of natural disasters, such as the volcanic eruptions of the late first millennium B.C.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS)
in the United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx3 This last factor is at least circumstantially implicated in Teotihuacán’s rise. Prior to 200 B.C.,
a number of relatively small centers coexisted in and near the Valley of Mexico. Around this
time, the largest of these centers, Cuicuilco, was seriously affected by a volcanic eruption,
with much of its agricultural land covered by lava. With Cuicuilco eliminated as a potential
rival, any one of a number of relatively modest towns might have emerged as a leading
economic and political power in Central Mexico. The archaeological evidence clearly
indicates, though, that Teotihuacán was the center that did arise as the predominant force in
the area by the first century A.D.
4 It seems likely that Teotihuacán’s natural resources—along with the city elite’s ability to
recognize their potential—gave the city a competitive edge over its neighbors. The valley, like
many other places in Mexican and Guatemalan highlands, was rich in obsidian. The hard
volcanic stone was a resource that had been in great demand for many years, at least since the
rise of the Olmecs (a people who flourished between 1200 and 400 B.C.), and it apparently
had a secure market. Moreover, recent research on obsidian tools found at Olmec sites has
shown that some of the obsidian obtained by the Olmecs originated near Teotihuacán.
Teotihuacán obsidian must have been recognized as a valuable commodity for many centuries
before the great city arose.
5 Long-distance trade in obsidian probably gave the elite residents of Teotihuacán access to a
wide variety of exotic goods, as well as a relatively prosperous life. Such success may have
attracted immigrants to Teotihuacán. In addition, Teotihuacán’s elite may have consciously
attempted to attract new inhabitants. It is also probable that as early as 200 B.C. Teotihuacán
may have achieved some religious significance and its shrine (or shrines) may have served as
an additional population magnet. Finally, the growing population was probably fed by
increasing the number and size of irrigated fields.
6 The picture of Teotihuacán that emerges is a classic picture of positive feedback among
obsidian mining and working, trade, population growth, irrigation, and religious tourism. The
thriving obsidian operation, for example, would necessitate more miners, additional
manufacturers of obsidian tools, and additional traders to carry the goods to new markets. All
this led to increased wealth, which in turn would attract more immigrants to Teotihuacán. The
growing power of the elite, who controlled the economy, would give them the means to
physically coerce people to move to Teotihuacán and serve as additions to the labor force.
More irrigation works would have to be built to feed the growing population, and this resulted
in more power and wealth for the elite.
1
obsidian, a type of volcanic glasslike rock used for manufacturing tools and ceremonial objects
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Directions, Answer the questions.
1. In paragraph 1, each of the following is mentioned as a feature of the city of
Teotihuacán between A.D. 150 and 700 EXCEPT
A regularly arranged streets
B several administrative centers spread across the city
C many manufacturing workshops
D apartment complexes
2. The word “ingenuity” in paragraph 2 is closest in meaning to
A ambition
B sincerity
C faith
D cleverness
3. Which of the following is NOT mentioned in paragraph 2 as a main factor in the
development of Teotihuacán?
A The presence of obsidian in the Teotihuacán Valley
B The potential for extensive irrigation of Teotihuacán Valley lands
C A long period of volcanic inactivity in the Teotihuacán Valley
D Teotihuacán’s location on a natural trade route
4. What can be inferred from paragraph 3 about Cuicuilco prior to 200 B.C.?
A It was a fairly small city until that date.
B It was located outside the Valley of Mexico.
C It emerged rapidly as an economical and political center.
D Its economy relied heavily on agriculture.
5. Which of the following allowed Teotihuacán to have “a competitive edge over its
neighbors”?
A A well-exploited and readily available commodity
B The presence of a highly stable elite class
C Knowledge derived directly from the Olmecs about the art of toolmaking
D Scarce natural resources in nearby areas such as those located in what are now the
Guatemalan and Mexican highlands
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.6. According to paragraph 4, what has recent research on obsidian tools found at Olmec
sites shown?
A Obsidian’s value was understood only when Teotihuacán became an important city.
B The residents of Teotihuacán were sophisticated toolmakers.
C The residents of Teotihuacán traded obsidian with the Olmecs as early as 400 B.C.
D Some of the obsidian used by the Olmecs came from the area around Teotihuacán.
7. Select the TWO answer choices that are mentioned in paragraph 5 as being features of
Teotihuacán that may have attracted immigrants to the city. To receive credit, you must
select TWO answers.
A The prosperity of the elite
B Plenty of available housing
C Opportunities for well-paid agricultural employment
D The presence of one or more religious shrines
8. In paragraph 6, the author discusses “The thriving obsidian operation,” in order to
A explain why manufacturing was the main industry of Teotihuacán
B give an example of an industry that took very little time to develop in Teotihuacán
C illustrate how several factors influenced each other to make Teotihuacán a powerful and
wealthy city
D explain how a successful industry can be a source of wealth and a source of conflict at the
same time
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.9. In paragraph 1 of the passage, there is a missing sentence. The paragraph is repeated
below and shows four letters (A, B, C, and D) that indicate where the following sentence
could be added.
In fact, artifacts and pottery from Teotihuacán have been discovered in sites as far
away as the Mayan lowlands, the Guatemalan highlands, northern Mexico, and the
Gulf Coast of Mexico.
Where would the sentence best fit?
The city of Teotihuacán, which lay about 50 kilometers northeast of modern-day Mexico
City, began its growth by 200 –100 B.C. At its height, between about A.D. 150 and 700, it
probably had a population of more than 125,000 people and covered at least 20 square
kilometers. (A) It had over 2,000 apartment complexes, a great market, a large number of
industrial workshops, an administrative center, a number of massive religious edifices, and a
regular grid pattern of streets and buildings. (B) Clearly, much planning and central control
were involved in the expansion and ordering of this great metropolis. (C) Moreover, the city
had economic and perhaps religious contacts with most parts of Mesoamerica (modern
Central America and Mexico). (D)
A
B
C
D
Option A
Option B
Option C
Option D
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.10. Directions, An introductory sentence for a brief summary of the passage is provided
below. Complete the summary by selecting the THREE answer choices that express the
most important ideas in the passage. Some sentences do not belong in the summary
because they express ideas that are not presented in the passage or are minor ideas in
the passage. This question is worth 2 points.
Write your answer choices in the spaces where they belong. You can either write the letter of
your answer choice or you can copy the sentence.
Teotihuacán was a highly developed city in Mesoamerica that reached its peak between
about A.D. 150 and 700.



Answer Choices
A The number and sophistication of the architectural, administrative, commercial, and
religious features of Teotihuacán indicate the existence of centralized planning and
control.
B Teotihuacán may have developed its own specific local religion as a result of the cultural
advances made possible by the city’s great prosperity.
C Several factors may account for Teotihuacán’s extraordinary development, including its
location, rich natural resources, irrigation potential, intelligent elite, and the misfortune of
rival communities.
D As a result of its large number of religious shrines, by the first century A.D., Teotihuacán
became the most influential religious center in all of Mesoamerica.
E In many important areas, from the obsidian industry to religious tourism, Teotihuacán’s
success and prosperity typified the classic positive feedback cycle.
F Although many immigrants settled in Teotihuacán between A.D. 150 and 700, the
increasing threat of coerced labor discouraged further settlement and limited
Teotihuacán’s population growth.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Reading Practice Set 1 Answers
1. B
2. D
3. C
4. D
5. A
6. D
7. A, D
8. C
9. D
10. A, C, E
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Reading Practice Set 2
Directions, Read the passage. Give yourself 20 minutes to complete this practice set.
Extinction of the Dinosaurs
Paleozoic Era 334 to 248 million years ago
Mesozoic Era 245 to 65 million years ago
─Triassic Period
─Jurassic Period
─Cretaceous Period
Cenozoic Era 65 million years ago to the present
Paragraph
1 Paleontologists have argued for a long time that the demise of the dinosaurs was caused by
climatic alterations associated with slow changes in the positions of continents and seas
resulting from plate tectonics. Off and on throughout the Cretaceous (the last period of the
Mesozoic era, during which dinosaurs flourished), large shallow seas covered extensive areas
of the continents. Data from diverse sources, including geochemical evidence preserved in
seafloor sediments, indicate that the Late Cretaceous climate was milder than today’s. The
days were not too hot, nor the nights too cold. The summers were not too warm, nor the
winters too frigid. The shallow seas on the continents probably buffered the temperature of the
nearby air, keeping it relatively constant.
2 At the end of the Cretaceous, the geological record shows that these seaways retreated from
the continents back into the major ocean basins. No one knows why. Over a period of about
100,000 years, while the seas pulled back, climates around the world became dramatically
more extreme, warmer days, cooler nights; hotter summers, colder winters. Perhaps dinosaurs
could not tolerate these extreme temperature changes and became extinct.
3 If true, though, why did cold-blooded animals such as snakes, lizards, turtles, and crocodiles
survive the freezing winters and torrid summers? These animals are at the mercy of the
climate to maintain a livable body temperature. It’s hard to understand why they would not be
affected, whereas dinosaurs were left too crippled to cope, especially if, as some scientists
believe, dinosaurs were warm-blooded. Critics also point out that the shallow seaways had
retreated from and advanced on the continents numerous times during the Mesozoic, so why
did the dinosaurs survive the climatic changes associated with the earlier fluctuations but not
with this one? Although initially appealing, the hypothesis of a simple climatic change related
to sea levels is insufficient to explain all the data.
4 Dissatisfaction with conventional explanations for dinosaur extinctions led to a surprising
observation that, in turn, has suggested a new hypothesis. Many plants and animals disappear
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.abruptly from the fossil record as one moves from layers of rock documenting the end of the
Cretaceous up into rocks representing the beginning of the Cenozoic (the era after the
Mesozoic). Between the last layer of Cretaceous rock and the first layer of Cenozoic rock,
there is often a thin layer of clay. Scientists felt that they could get an idea of how long the
extinctions took by determining how long it took to deposit this one centimeter of clay and
they thought they could determine the time it took to deposit the clay by determining the
amount of the element iridium (Ir) it contained.
5 Ir has not been common at Earth’s surface since the very beginning of the planet’s history.
Because it usually exists in a metallic state, it was preferentially incorporated in Earth’s core
as the planet cooled and consolidated. Ir is found in high concentrations in some meteorites, in
which the solar system’s original chemical composition is preserved. Even today, microscopic
meteorites continually bombard Earth, falling on both land and sea. By measuring how many
of these meteorites fall to Earth over a given period of time, scientists can estimate how long
it might have taken to deposit the observed amount of Ir in the boundary clay. These
calculations suggest that a period of about one million years would have been required.
However, other reliable evidence suggests that the deposition of the boundary clay could not
have taken one million years. So the unusually high concentration of Ir seems to require a
special explanation.
6 In view of these facts, scientists hypothesized that a single large asteroid, about 10 to 15
kilometers across, collided with Earth, and the resulting fallout created the boundary clay.
Their calculations show that the impact kicked up a dust cloud that cut off sunlight for several
months, inhibiting photosynthesis in plants; decreased surface temperatures on continents to
below freezing; caused extreme episodes of acid rain; and significantly raised long-term
global temperatures through the greenhouse effect. This disruption of the food chain and
climate would have eradicated the dinosaurs and other organisms in less than fifty years.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Directions, Answer the questions.
1. According to paragraph 1, which of the following is true of the Late Cretaceous
climate?
A Summers were very warm and winters were very cold.
B Shallow seas on the continents caused frequent temperature changes.
C The climate was very similar to today’s climate.
D The climate did not change dramatically from season to season.
2. Why does the author mention the survival of “snakes, lizards, turtles, and crocodiles”
in paragraph 3?
A To argue that dinosaurs may have become extinct because they were not cold-blooded
animals
B To question the adequacy of the hypothesis that climatic change related to sea levels
caused the extinction of the dinosaurs
C To present examples of animals that could maintain a livable body temperature more
easily than dinosaurs
D To support a hypothesis that these animals were not as sensitive to climate changes in the
Cretaceous period as they are today
3.
According to paragraph 3, which of the following is true of changes in climate before
the Cretaceous period and the effect of these changes on dinosaurs?
A Climate changes associated with the movement of seaways before the Cretaceous period
did not cause dinosaurs to become extinct.
B Changes in climate before the Cretaceous period caused severe fluctuation in sea level,
resulting in the extinction of the dinosaurs.
C Frequent changes in climate before the Cretaceous period made dinosaurs better able to
maintain a livable body temperature.
D Before the Cretaceous period there were few changes in climate, and dinosaurs
flourished.
4. The word “fluctuations” in the passage is closest in meaning to
A extremes
B retreats
C periods
D variations
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Set 1
5. Which of the sentences below best expresses the essential information in the highlighted
sentence in paragraph 4? Incorrect choices change the meaning in important ways or
leave out essential information.
A The fossil record suggests that there was an abrupt extinction of many plants and animals
at the end of the Mesozoic era.
B Few fossils of the Mesozoic era have survived in the rocks that mark the end of the
Cretaceous.
C Fossils from the Cretaceous period of the Mesozoic up to the beginning of the Cenozoic
era have been removed from the layers of rock that surrounded them.
D Plants and animals from the Mesozoic era were unable to survive in the Cenozoic era.
6. In paragraph 4, all the following questions are answered EXCEPT,
A Why is there a layer of clay between the rocks of the Cretaceous and Cenozoic?
B Why were scientists interested in determining how long it took to deposit the layer of
clay at the end of the Cretaceous?
C What was the effect of the surprising observation scientists made?
D Why did scientists want more information about the dinosaur extinctions at the end of the
Cretaceous?
7. Paragraph 5 implies that a special explanation of the Ir in the boundary clay is needed
because
A the Ir in microscopic meteorites reaching Earth during the Cretaceous period would have
been incorporated into Earth’s core
B the Ir in the boundary clay was deposited much more than a million years ago
C the concentration of Ir in the boundary clay is higher than in microscopic meteorites
D the amount of Ir in the boundary clay is too great to have come from microscopic
meteorites during the time the boundary clay was deposited
8. The word “disruption” in the passage is closest in meaning to
A exhaustion
B disturbance
C modification
D disappearance
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.9. In paragraph 5 of the passage, there is a missing sentence. The paragraph is repeated
below and shows four letters (A, B, C, and D) that indicate where the following sentence
could be added.
Consequently, the idea that the Ir in the boundary clay came from microscopic
meteorites cannot be accepted.
Where would the sentence best fit?
Ir has not been common at Earth’s surface since the very beginning of the planet’s history.
Because it usually exists in a metallic state, it was preferentially incorporated in Earth’s core
as the planet cooled and consolidated. Ir is found in high concentrations in some meteorites,
in which the solar system’s original chemical composition is preserved. Even today,
microscopic meteorites continually bombard Earth, falling on both land and sea. By
measuring how many of these meteorites fall to Earth over a given period of time, scientists
can estimate how long it might have taken to deposit the observed amount of Ir in the
boundary clay. (A) These calculations suggest that a period of about one million years would
have been required. (B) However, other reliable evidence suggests that the deposition of the
boundary clay could not have taken one million years. (C) So the unusually high
concentration of Ir seems to require a special explanation. (D)
A
B
C
D
Option A
Option B
Option C
Option D
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.10. Directions, An introductory sentence for a brief summary of the passage is provided
below. Complete the summary by selecting the THREE answer choices that express the
most important ideas in the passage. Some sentences do not belong in the summary
because they express ideas that are not presented in the passage or are minor ideas in
the passage. This question is worth 2 points.
Write your answer choices in the spaces where they belong. You can either write the letter of
your answer choice or you can copy the sentence.
For a long time scientists have argued that the extinction of the dinosaurs was related
to climate change.



Answer Choices
A Extreme changes in daily and seasonal climates preceded the retreat of the seas back into
the major ocean basins.
B A simple climate change does not explain some important data related to the extinction of
the dinosaurs at the end of the Cretaceous.
C The retreat of the seaways at the end of the Cretaceous has not been fully explained.
D The abruptness of extinctions at the end of the Cretaceous and the high concentration of
Ir found in clay deposited at that time have fueled the development of a new hypothesis.
E Some scientists hypothesize that the extinction of the dinosaurs resulted from the effects
of an asteroid collision with Earth.
F Boundary clay layers like the one between the Mesozoic and Cenozoic are used by
scientists to determine the rate at which an extinct species declined.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Reading Practice Set 2 Answers
1. D
2. B
3. A
4. D
5. A
6. A
7. D
8. B
9. C
10. B, D, E
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Reading Practice Set 3
Directions, Read the passage. Give yourself 20 minutes to complete this practice set.
The Geologic History of the Mediterranean
Paragraph
1 In 1970 geologists Kenneth J. Hsu and William B. F. Ryan were collecting research data
while aboard the oceanographic research vessel Glomar Challenger. An objective of this
particular cruise was to investigate the floor of the Mediterranean and to resolve questions
about its geologic history. One question was related to evidence that the invertebrate fauna
(animals without spines) of the Mediterranean had changed abruptly about 6 million years
ago. Most of the older organisms were nearly wiped out, although a few hardy species
survived. A few managed to migrate into the Atlantic. Somewhat later, the migrants returned,
bringing new species with them. Why did the near extinction and migrations occur?
2 Another task for the Glomar Challenger’s scientists was to try to determine the origin of the
domelike masses buried deep beneath the Mediterranean seafloor. These structures had been
detected years earlier by echo-sounding instruments, but they had never been penetrated in the
course of drilling. Were they salt domes such as are common along the United States Gulf
Coast, and if so, why should there have been so much solid crystalline salt beneath the floor of
the Mediterranean?
3 With questions such as these clearly before them, the scientists aboard the Glomar Challenger
proceeded to the Mediterranean to search for the answers. On August 23, 1970, they
recovered a sample. The sample consisted of pebbles of hardened sediment that had once been
soft, deep-sea mud, as well as granules of gypsum 1 and fragments of volcanic rock. Not a
single pebble was found that might have indicated that the pebbles came from the nearby
continent. In the days following, samples of solid gypsum were repeatedly brought on deck as
drilling operations penetrated the seafloor. Furthermore, the gypsum was found to possess
peculiarities of composition and structure that suggested it had formed on desert flats.
Sediment above and below the gypsum layer contained tiny marine fossils, indicating open
ocean conditions. As they drilled into the central and deepest part of the Mediterranean basin,
the scientists took solid, shiny, crystalline salt from the core barrel. Interbedded with the salt
were thin layers of what appeared to be windblown silt.
4 The time had come to formulate a hypothesis. The investigators theorized that about 20
million years ago, the Mediterranean was a broad seaway linked to the Atlantic by two narrow
straits. Crustal movements closed the straits, and the landlocked Mediterranean began to
evaporate. Increasing salinity caused by the evaporation resulted in the extermination of
scores of invertebrate species. Only a few organisms especially tolerant of very salty
conditions remained. As evaporation continued, the remaining brine (salt water) became so
dense that the calcium sulfate of the hard layer was precipitated. In the central deeper part of
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.the basin, the last of the brine evaporated to precipitate more soluble sodium chloride (salt).
Later, under the weight of overlying sediments, this salt flowed plastically upward to form salt
domes. Before this happened, however, the Mediterranean was a vast desert 3,000 meters
deep. Then, about 5.5 million years ago came the deluge. As a result of crustal adjustments
and faulting, the Strait of Gibraltar, where the Mediterranean now connects to the Atlantic,
opened, and water cascaded spectacularly back into the Mediterranean. Turbulent waters tore
into the hardened salt flats, broke them up, and ground them into the pebbles observed in the
first sample taken by the Challenger. As the basin was refilled, normal marine organisms
returned. Soon layers of oceanic ooze began to accumulate above the old hard layer.
5 The salt and gypsum, the faunal changes, and the unusual gravel provided abundant evidence
that the Mediterranean was once a desert.
1
gypsum, a mineral made of calcium sulfate and water
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Directions, Answer the questions.
1. Which of the following is NOT mentioned in paragraph 1 as a change that occurred in
the fauna of the Mediterranean?
A Most invertebrate species disappeared during a wave of extinctions.
B A few hardy species wiped out many of the Mediterranean’s invertebrates.
C Some invertebrates migrated to the Atlantic Ocean.
D New species of fauna populated the Mediterranean when the old migrants returned.
2. What does the author imply by saying “Not a single pebble was found that might have
indicated that the pebbles came from the nearby continent”?
A The most obvious explanation for the origin of the pebbles was not supported by the
evidence.
B The geologists did not find as many pebbles as they expected.
C The geologists were looking for a particular kind of pebble.
D The different pebbles could not have come from only one source.
3. Select the TWO answer choices from paragraph 3 that identify materials discovered in
the deepest part of the Mediterranean basin. To receive credit, you must select TWO
answers.
A Volcanic rock fragments
B Thin silt layers
C Soft, deep-sea mud
D Crystalline salt
4. What is the main purpose of paragraph 3 ?
A To describe the physical evidence collected by Hsu and Ryan
B To explain why some of the questions posed earlier in the passage could not be answered
by the findings of the Glomar Challenger
C To evaluate techniques used by Hsu and Ryan to explore the sea floor
D To describe the most difficult problems faced by the Glomar Challenger expedition
5. According to paragraph 4, which of the following was responsible for the evaporation of
the Mediterranean’s waters?
A The movements of Earth’s crust
B The accumulation of sediment layers
C Changes in the water level of the Atlantic Ocean
D Changes in Earth’s temperature
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.6. The word “scores” in the passage is closest in meaning to
A members
B large numbers
C populations
D different types
7. According to paragraph 4, what caused most invertebrate species in the Mediterranean
to become extinct?
A The evaporation of chemicals necessary for their survival
B Crustal movements that connected the Mediterranean to the saltier Atlantic
C The migration of new species through the narrow straits
D Their inability to tolerate the increasing salt content of the Mediterranean
8. Which of the sentences below best expresses the essential information in the highlighted
sentence in paragraph 4? Incorrect choices change the meaning in important ways or
leave out essential information.
A The Strait of Gibraltar reopened when the Mediterranean and the Atlantic became
connected and the cascades of water from one sea to the other caused crustal adjustments
and faulting.
B The Mediterranean was dramatically refilled by water from the Atlantic when crustal
adjustments and faulting opened the Strait of Gibraltar, the place where the two seas are
joined.
C The cascades of water from the Atlantic to the Mediterranean were not as spectacular as
the crustal adjustments and faulting that occurred when the Strait of Gibraltar was
connected to those seas.
D As a result of crustal adjustments and faulting and the creation of the Strait of Gibraltar,
the Atlantic and Mediterranean were connected and became a single sea with spectacular
cascades of water between them.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.9. In paragraph 2 of the passage, there is a missing sentence. The paragraph is repeated
below and shows four letters (A, B, C, and D) that indicate where the following sentence
could be added.
Thus, scientists had information about the shape of the domes but not about their
chemical composition and origin.
Where would the sentence best fit?
(A) Another task for the Glomar Challenger’s scientists was to try to determine the origin of
the domelike masses buried deep beneath the Mediterranean seafloor. (B) These structures
had been detected years earlier by echo-sounding instruments, but they had never been
penetrated in the course of drilling. (C) Were they salt domes such as are common along the
United States Gulf Coast, and if so, why should there have been so much solid crystalline salt
beneath the floor of the Mediterranean? (D)
A
B
C
D
Option A
Option B
Option C
Option D
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.10. Directions, An introductory sentence for a brief summary of the passage is provided
below. Complete the summary by selecting the THREE answer choices that express the
most important ideas in the passage. Some sentences do not belong in the summary
because they express ideas that are not presented in the passage or are minor ideas in
the passage. This question is worth 2 points.
Write your answer choices in the spaces where they belong. You can either write the letter of
your answer choice or you can copy the sentence.
An expedition to the Mediterranean answered some long-standing questions about the
ocean’s history.



Answer Choices
A The Glomar Challenger expedition investigated changes in invertebrate fauna and some
unusual geologic features.
B Researchers collected fossils to determine which new species migrated from the Atlantic
with older species.
C Scientists aboard the Glomar Challenger were the first to discover the existence of
domelike masses underneath the seafloor.
D Samples recovered from the expedition revealed important differences in chemical
composition and fossil distribution among the sediment layers.
E Evidence collected by the Glomar Challenger supports geologists’ beliefs that the
Mediterranean had evaporated and become a desert, before it refilled with water.
F Mediterranean salt domes formed after crustal movements opened the straits between the
Mediterranean and the Atlantic, and the Mediterranean refilled with water.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.Reading Practice Set 3 Answers
1. B
2. A
3. B, D
4. A
5. A
6. B
7. D
8. B
9. C
10. A, D, E
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.

TOEFL iBT ® Speaking Practice Questions
This document may contain some question types that would not appear on a test that has been adapted for various
accessibility purposes. On test day, you will receive an accessible assessment that is consistent with any
accommodations for which you have been approved.
Speaking Practice Question 1,
Independent Speaking Practice (Explain a Choice), Question
Directions, You will now be asked to give your opinion about a familiar topic. Give yourself 15
seconds to prepare your response. Then record yourself speaking for 45 seconds.
Some people enjoy taking risks and trying new things. Others are not adventurous;
they are cautious and prefer to avoid danger. Which behavior do you think is better?
Explain why.
Preparation Time, 15 seconds
Response Time, 45 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS)
in the United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 1,
Independent Speaking Practice (Explain a Choice), Response Tips
To respond to this particular question, you should clearly state what your opinion is, Do you
think it is better to take risks or to be cautious? Then you should give reasons to support your
opinion. If you take the position that you think it is better to take risks and try new things, you
might give an example of a time when you or someone you know took a risk and was rewarded.
The example should have good details, and the relationship between the example and your
opinion should be clear. If you take the position that it is better to be cautious, you might give an
example of a situation where being cautious is beneficial. You might continue to develop the
response by contrasting what would happen in this situation if a risk were taken.
Keep in mind that there is no “correct” answer to this question. Either behavior can be supported
with examples. The important part of this task is to make sure that you state your opinion and
develop your response with good examples and relevant details.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and should be well developed and coherent. This task is scored
using the Independent Speaking Rubrics.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 2,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Campus-Related), Passage, Conversation,
and Question
Directions, The University is making a change in the courses it will offer. Read the article from
the university newspaper about the change. Give yourself 45 seconds to read the article.
Sculpture Courses to Be Discontinued
University administrators announced yesterday that the sculpture program, a division of the art
department, will be eliminated. “The main reason is a lack of student interest,” reported one
administrator. “Although the number of art students has increased, fewer and fewer art majors
are taking sculpture classes.” Furthermore, the department’s only sculpture professor is retiring
this year. “Given the art department’s limited budget,” the administrator explained, “it just
doesn’t make sense to hire a new full-time professor to teach sculpture for only a handful of
students.”
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Read the transcript.
Narrator Now listen to two students discussing the article.
Male student Everything alright?
Female student Yeah, I’m just upset about that article I showed you this morning ...
Male student
Why, what’s the big deal?
Female student Well, as an art major, I think it’s a big loss for the department. The university’s
got it all wrong.
Male student
What do you mean?
Female student Well, the low enrollment isn’t because art majors don’t want to take these
classes. Problem is, who has time to take them when there are so many other
requirements?
Male student
I don’t understand.
Female student See, the classes they’re eliminating are all optional. The required courses are
mostly painting and drawing, and they take up all our time. What we really need
are different requirements—then art majors could take a better variety of classes
... all the things we’re interested in.
Male student
That makes sense. But, the thing about the professor ...
Female student Well, that’s true. But still, they’re being drastic. If money’s the problem, they
could hire a part-time professor! Or, most of the professors in the department
have secondary fields ...
Male student
Really?
Female student Yeah! At least a few painting teachers are also great sculptors. I’m sure one of
them could teach a class.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Give yourself 30 seconds to prepare your response to the following question. Then
record yourself speaking for 60 seconds.
The woman expresses her opinion of the university’s plan. State her opinion and
explain the reasons she gives for holding that opinion.
Preparation Time, 30 seconds
Response Time, 60 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 2,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Campus-Related), Response Tips
To respond to this particular question, you should state the woman’s opinion of the university’s
plan to discontinue the sculpture courses. In this case, the woman disagrees with the university’s
plan and she believes that it is a “big loss for the department.”
After stating the woman’s opinion, you should convey the two main reasons she gives for
holding her opinion. You will need to connect information from the conversation to the reading
in order for the response to be complete. The woman argues that the reason for the low
enrollment is because students who are art majors do not have time to take the sculpture classes,
which are optional. A fully developed response might even point out that the reason for low
enrollment is not lack of student interest as the university claims in the reading. You could also
point out that students would probably take sculpture classes if the university changed the
requirements.
Your response should also convey the woman’s second reason for not agreeing with the
university’s plan, She believes that the university would not need to hire a full-time professor,
and that a part-time professor or other professor could teach the class. You might also mention
that the university’s claim in the reading that it cannot afford a full-time professor is therefore
unfounded. You could also point out that most of the professors have secondary fields and might
be available to teach sculpture classes.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and should be well developed and coherent. This task is scored
using the Integrated Speaking Rubrics.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 3,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Passage, Lecture, and Question
Directions, Read a passage about revealing coloration from a biology textbook. You have 45
seconds to read the passage. Begin reading now.
Revealing Coloration
Many animals use coloration to protect themselves from predators. One defensive strategy
involving the use of coloration is what is known as revealing coloration. Animals employing this
strategy have an area of bright color on some part of their body; this bright color is usually
hidden from predators’ view. When approached by a predator, the animal suddenly reveals the
area of bright color; this unexpected display of color startles or confuses the predator and
provides the would-be prey with an opportunity to escape.
Narrator Now listen to part of a lecture from a biology class.
Professor There’s a large tropical insect called the peanut bug—yes, like the peanuts that you
eat—uh, and the peanut bug’s front wings are colored so that they blend in with
their surroundings. But its back wings—which are usually closed and hidden—
have these bright, colorful spots on them. And when the peanut bug’s attacked, it
suddenly opens its back wings, and out pop these big, bright colors. And that
surprises the predator, and gives the peanut bug a chance to get away.
Um, and then you have a butterfly ... called the morpho butterfly. And parts of the
morpho butterfly’s wings are very shiny, they reflect a lot of sunlight; when this
butterfly is resting, this shiny part of its wings is hidden ... Now, morpho butterflies
are often attacked by birds ... So when a bird approaches, the morpho flies away ...
and when the morpho flap its wings, all the bird can see are flashes of light reflected
from the morpho’s wings. Those flashes of light make it very difficult for the bird
to follow the morpho, and the morpho is usually able to get away.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Give yourself 30 seconds to prepare your response to the following question. Then
record yourself speaking for 60 seconds.
Using the examples of the peanut bug and the morpho butterfly, explain the concept of
revealing coloration.
Preparation Time, 30 seconds
Response Time, 60 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 3,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Response Tips
To respond to this particular question you should explain the concept of revealing coloration as it
was presented in the reading. Revealing coloration is a defense strategy in which an animal
surprises or confuses predators by suddenly revealing bright-colored parts of its body.
You should use the two examples given by the professor to explain the concept. You should
convey the information that the peanut bug has bright colors on its wings and that when attacked,
the bug suddenly opens the wings to reveal the bright colors. This surprises the predator. You
could add that this allows the bug to escape. You should also explain how the morpho butterfly
uses revealing coloration. You should mention that the butterfly has wings that reflect sunlight;
when the butterfly flies away to escape from a bird, the butterfly’s wings look like a flashing
light, which is very difficult for birds to follow.
You do not need to repeat all of the details from the reading and the lecture, but instead integrate
points from both to answer the question completely.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and should be well developed and coherent. This task is scored
using the Integrated Speaking Rubric.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 4,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Lecture and Question
Directions, Read the transcript.
Narrator Now listen to part of a lecture in a business class.
Professor Today, we’ll talk about how companies determine the initial price for their
products, by that I mean, when they first introduce a product in the market. There
are different approaches, and today we’ll discuss two of them. They are quite
different ... each with their own advantages.
One approach or strategy sets the initial price of the product high, followed by a
lower price at a later stage. Why? Well, ... when introducing a new product,
companies want to build a high-quality image for it. Products that cost more are
believed to be of higher quality. So, during the early stages of the product life
cycle, companies can make very high profits from consumers willing to pay more
for a high quality product, and although consumers know that prices will
eventually go down, they’re also willing to pay more to get the product sooner.
This approach works very well with ... oh ... innovative, high-tech products, for
example. Now just think about when video recorders, or ... video cameras ... or
even cell phones ... first came out.
They were very expensive, but then they became much more accessible.
Another very common strategy sets an initial price low. Now this happens when
the market is already saturated with the product and the strategy is to undercut its
competitors. Say, there’s a newly starting computer maker trying to gain market
share. So what do they do? Well, they offer a computer at an affordable price,
lower than existing brands. By doing this, the company appeals to new consumers
who weren’t probably even interested in getting a computer and ... well, of course
... to existing consumers who might now be tempted to switch brands. Now, how
does this company make profits with its low-priced computer? Well, one thing
that’s often done is to encourage their customers to buy accessories also
manufactured by them, like printers, or software, for example.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Give yourself 20 seconds to prepare your response to the following question. Then
record yourself speaking for 60 seconds.
Using the points and examples from the lecture, explain the two pricing strategies
described by the professor.
Preparation Time, 20 seconds
Response Time, 60 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 4,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Response Tips
To respond to this particular question, you should explain the two pricing strategies described by
the professor. You should include relevant points and examples from the lecture (and not from
any other source). To begin your response, you could define what a pricing strategy is as
explained at the beginning of the lecture. You could briefly mention that companies need to
determine an initial price when they first bring their products to the market.
Then you would explain the first approach. You could say that one strategy sets prices high but
the prices become lower at a later stage. In your response, you would need to explain that
companies using this strategy make high profits at early stages of the product lifecycle (when the
product first comes out). You would then need to include the example mentioned in the lecture.
The initial high price approach works well with innovative high-tech products—for example,
when video cameras (or video recorders, or cell phones) first came out.
In your response, you would also need to explain the second pricing strategy mentioned in the
lecture. The other pricing strategy sets prices low to attract new customers and encourage
existing customers to switch brands. You might include the detail that this strategy is used when
the market is already saturated with a product. Then you would need to give the example of the
computer company from the lecture. A computer manufacturer offers computers at low prices. It
will make little profit from the computer itself but customers are encouraged to buy other related
products the same company manufactures like software or printers, and so the company makes a
profit.
You do not need to repeat all of the details from the lecture. You need to only give sufficient
details to explain the two strategies.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and should be well developed and coherent. This task is scored
using the Integrated Speaking Rubrics.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 5,
Independent Speaking Practice (Explain a Choice), Question
Directions, You will now be asked to give your opinion about a familiar topic. Give yourself 15
seconds to prepare your response. Then record yourself speaking for 45 seconds.
Some people think it is more fun to spend time with friends in restaurants or cafés.
Others think it is more fun to spend time with friends at home. Which do you think is
better? Explain why.
Preparation Time, 15 seconds
Response Time, 45 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 5,
Independent Speaking Practice (Explain a Choice), Response Tips
To respond to this particular question, you should clearly state what your opinion is, Do you
think it is more fun to spend time with friends in restaurants or cafés, or at home? Then you
should give reasons to support your opinion. If you take the position that it is more fun to spend
time with friends in restaurants or cafés, you might give an example of a time when you enjoyed
being with friends in a restaurant, and explain reasons why you enjoyed the experience or discuss
specific advantages of being in a restaurant.
The example should have good details, and the relationship between the example and your
opinion should be clear. If you take the position that it is more fun to spend time with friends at
home, you might give an example of a situation in which you enjoyed spending time with friends
at home, and explain reasons why you found it enjoyable or discuss specific advantages of being
at home. You might continue to develop your response by contrasting the experience of spending
time with friends at home with what it would be like to spend time together in a restaurant. You
could mention some disadvantages of being in a restaurant.
Keep in mind that there is no “correct” answer to this question. Either position can be supported
with examples. The important part of this task is to make sure that you state your opinion and
develop your response with good examples and relevant details.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and should be well developed and coherent. This task is scored
using the Independent Speaking Rubrics.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 6,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Campus-related), Passage, Conversation,
and Question
Directions, State University plans to build a new auditorium. Read an article about the plan in
the campus newspaper. You have 45 seconds to read the article. Begin reading now.
University to Build New Auditorium
The university has decided to demolish the old campus auditorium and replace it with a new one.
The auditorium is one of the oldest original buildings on campus, and administrators say it is
showing signs of its age, sagging floors, peeling paint, a drafty interior, and outdated decor. The
new auditorium, by contrast, will have a clean, modern appearance. Also, the old auditorium is
too small to accommodate the number of current students. The new auditorium will be bigger,
with a greater number of seats to accommodate a larger student body.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Read the transcript
Narrator Now listen to two students discussing the article.
Male student I wish they wouldn’t do this.
Female student Really? But the place is so old...
Male student
Yeah, but I like that. I think it’s a nice, historic-looking building.
Female student Hmm ... well, I guess it’s kinda pretty...
Male student
It’s an important part of the university’s history. It was one of the first things
built on campus...we should preserve that ... not get rid of it.
Female student That’s a good point. But what about the need for an expansion?
Male student
I don’t think it’s necessary.
Female student But it was built when the university was so much smaller.
Male student
That’s true, but think about it, have you ever seen the space completely full?
Female student Well ... uh, no, I guess not.
Male student
Me either. There are never any events when the entire student body is there. In
fact, there are usually just a small number of students in the audience for a play
or a concert.
Female student That’s true.
Male student
So why make it bigger, if it works as-is?
Female student I see what you mean.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Give yourself 30 seconds to prepare your response to the following question. Then
record yourself speaking for 60 seconds.
The man expresses his opinion of the university’s plan. State his opinion, and explain
the reasons he gives for holding that opinion.
Preparation Time, 30 seconds
Response Time, 60 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 6,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Campus-related), Response Tips
To respond to this particular question, you should state the man’s opinion of the university’s plan
to replace the old auditorium with a new auditorium. In this case, the man disagrees with the
university’s plan and thinks replacing the old building is unnecessary, and that it should be
preserved.
After stating the man’s opinion, you should convey the two main reasons he gives for holding his
opinion. You will need to connect information from the conversation to the reading in order for
the response to be complete. The man argues that the old building is “nice” and “historic-
looking,” and is an important part of the university’s history, so it should be preserved rather
than being replaced with a building that has a modern appearance. You might also mention that
the man points out that the old auditorium was one of the first buildings on campus.
Your response should also convey the man’s second reason for not agreeing with the university’s
plan, He does not think an auditorium with more seating to accommodate the larger number of
students is needed, because the auditorium is never completely full. You might add that he says
that no events at the auditorium are attended by the entire student body, and that usually only a
small number of students are there for a play or concert.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and should be well developed and coherent. This task is scored
using the Integrated Speaking Rubrics.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 7,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Passage, Lecture, and Question
Directions, Read a passage from a psychology textbook and the lecture that follows it. You have
45 seconds to read the passage.
Flow
In psychology, the feeling of complete and energized focus in an activity is called flow. People
who enter a state of flow lose their sense of time and have a feeling of great satisfaction. They
become completely involved in an activity for its own sake rather than for what may result from
the activity, such as money or prestige. Contrary to expectation, flow usually happens not during
relaxing moments of leisure and entertainment, but when we are actively involved in a difficult
enterprise, in a task that stretches our mental or physical abilities.
Directions, Read the transcript
Narrator
Listen to part of a talk in a psychology class.
Male professor I think this will help you get a picture of what your textbook is describing. I had a
friend who taught in the physics department, Professor Jones, he retired last year.
. . . Anyway, I remember . . . this was a few years ago . . . I remember passing by
a classroom early one morning just as he was leaving, and he looked terrible, his
clothes were all rumpled, and he looked like he hadn’t slept all night. And I
asked if he was OK. I was surprised when he said that he never felt better, that he
was totally happy. He had spent the entire night in the classroom working on a
mathematics puzzle. He didn’t stop to eat dinner; he didn’t stop to sleep . . . or
even rest. He was that involved in solving the puzzle. And it didn’t even have
anything to do with his teaching or research; he had just come across this puzzle
accidentally, I think in a mathematics journal, and it just really interested him, so
he worked furiously all night and covered the blackboards in the classroom with
equations and numbers and never realized that time was passing by.
Directions, Give yourself 30 seconds to prepare your response to the following question. Then
record yourself speaking for 60 seconds.
Explain flow and how the example used by the professor illustrates the concept.
Preparation Time, 30 seconds
Response Time, 60 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 7,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Response Tips
To respond to this p articular question, you should explain the concept of flow as it was
presented in the reading. Flow is a state or feeling of complete and energized focus in an
activity—usually one that stretches one’s physical or mental abilities.
You should use the example given by the professor to explain the concept. You should convey
the information that the professor’s friend experienced flow while working on a mathematics
puzzle, which is a mentally challenging activity. You should explain that since flow is
characterized by losing a sense of time, the friend stayed up late or did not stop for other
activities. You should also explain that he seemed happy or satisfied, which is another
characteristic of flow. And you could add that he was involved in the activity for its own sake,
and not because the puzzle was related to his teaching or research.
You do not need to repeat all of the details from the reading and the lecture, but instead integrate
points from both to answer the question completely.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and she be well developed and coherent. This task is scored using
the Integrated Speaking Rubric.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 8,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Lecture and Question
Directions, Read the transcript.
Narrator
Listen to part of a lecture in a biology course.
Female professor Human beings aren’t the only animals that use tools. It’s generally recognized
that other animals use tools as well . . . use them naturally, in the wild, without
any human instruction. But when can we say that an object is a tool? Well, it
depends on your definition of a tool. And in fact, there are two competing
definitions—a narrow definition and a broad one. The narrow definition says
that a tool is an object that’s used to perform a specific task . . . but not just
any object. To be a tool, according to the narrow definition, the object’s gotta
be purposefully changed or shaped by the animal, or human, so that it can be
used that way. It’s an object that’s made. Wild chimpanzees use sticks to dig
insects out of their nests . . . but most sticks lying around won’t do the job . . .
they might be too thick, for example. So the sticks have to be sharpened so
they’ll fit into the hole in an ant hill or the insect nest. The chimp pulls off the
leaves and chews the stick and trims it down that way until it’s the right size.
The chimp doesn’t just find the stick . . . it . . . you could say it makes it in a
way.
But the broad definition says an object doesn’t have to be modified to be
considered a tool. The broad definition says a tool is any object that’s used to
perform a specific task. For example, an elephant will sometimes use a stick
to scratch its back . . . it just picks up a stick from the ground and scratches its
back with it . . . It doesn’t modify the stick, it uses it just as it’s found. And it’s
a tool, under the broad definition, but under the narrow definition it’s not
because, well, the elephant doesn’t change it in any way.
Directions, Give yourself 20 seconds to prepare your response to the following question. Then
record yourself speaking for 60 seconds.
Using points and examples from the talk, describe the two different definitions of tools
given by the professor.
Preparation Time, 20 seconds
Response Time, 60 seconds
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxSpeaking Practice Question 8,
Integrated Speaking Practice (Academic), Response Tips
To respond to this particular question, you should explain the two definitions of tools given by
the professor. You should include relevant points and examples from the lecture (and not from
any other source). To begin your response, you could mention that animals use tools. Then you
could explain that there are two competing definitions of a tool.
Then you would explain the first definition. You could say that according to the narrow
definition, an object is a tool if it has been purposefully changed or shaped in order to be used for
a specific task. You would then need to include the example mentioned in the lecture. You could
explain that when chimpanzees use sticks to find insects, it fits the narrow definition of a tool
since the chimpanzees change the sticks to make them useful for the task. You might also
include specific details about how the chimpanzees remove leaves from the sticks and sharpen
them so that they fit into insect nests.
In your response, you would also need to explain the second definition of a tool. According to
this broad definition, the object must be used for a specific task, but it does not need to be
modified to be considered a tool. Then you would need to give the example of elephants using
sticks to scratch their backs. You could explain that this fits the broad definition of a tool since
the elephants use the sticks for a specific task, but do not change the sticks.
You do not need to repeat all of the details from the lecture. You need to only give sufficient
details to explain the two strategies.
As with all speaking tasks, your response should be intelligible, should demonstrate effective use
of grammar and vocabulary, and should be well developed and coherent. This task is scored
using the Integrated Speaking Rubrics.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_speaking_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx

TOEFL iBT ® Writing Practice Questions
This document may contain some question types that would not appear on a test that has been adapted for various
accessibility purposes. On test day, you will receive an accessible assessment that is consistent with any
accommodations for which you have been approved.
Writing Practice Set 1 (Integrated), Passage, Lecture, and Question
Directions, Give yourself 3 minutes to read the passage.
Reading Time, 3 minutes
In an effort to encourage ecologically sustainable forestry practices, an international organization
started issuing certifications to wood companies that meet high ecological standards by
conserving resources and recycling materials. Companies that receive this certification can
attract customers by advertising their products as “ecocertified.” Around the world, many wood
companies have adopted new, ecologically friendly practices in order to receive ecocertification.
However, it is unlikely that wood companies in the United States will do the same, for several
reasons.
First, American consumers are exposed to so much advertising that they would not value or even
pay attention to the ecocertification label. Because so many mediocre products are labeled “new”
or “improved,” American consumers do not place much trust in advertising claims in general.
Second, ecocertified wood will be more expensive than uncertified wood because in order to
earn ecocertification, a wood company must pay to have its business examined by a certification
agency. This additional cost gets passed on to consumers. American consumers tend to be
strongly motivated by price, and therefore they are likely to choose cheaper uncertified wood
products. Accordingly, American wood companies will prefer to keep their prices low rather
than obtain ecocertification.
Third, although some people claim that it always makes good business sense for American
companies to keep up with the developments in the rest of the world, this argument is not
convincing. Pursuing certification would make sense for American wood companies only if they
marketed most of their products abroad. But that is not the case—American wood businesses sell
most of their products in the United States, catering to a very large customer base that is satisfied
with the merchandise.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS)
in the United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Read the transcript
Narrator Now listen to part of a lecture on the topic you just read about.
Professor Well, despite what many people say, there’s good reason to think that many
American wood companies will eventually seek ecocertification for their wood
products. First off, consumers in the United States don’t treat all advertising the
same. They distinguish between advertising claims that companies make about
their own products and claims made by independent certification agencies.
Americans have a lot of confidence in independent consumer agencies. Thus,
ecologically minded Americans are likely to react very favorably to wood
products ecologically certified by an independent organization with an
international reputation for trustworthiness.
Second point—of course it’s true that American consumers care a lot about
price—who doesn’t? But studies of how consumers make decisions show that
price alone determines consumers’ decisions only when the price of one
competing product is much higher or lower than another. When the price
difference between two products is small—say, less than five percent, as is the
case with certified wood— Americans often do choose on factors other than price.
And Americans are becoming increasingly convinced of the value of preserving
and protecting the environment.
And third, U.S. wood companies should definitely pay attention to what’s going
on in the wood business internationally, not because of foreign consumers, but
because of foreign competition. As I just told you, there’s a good chance that
many American consumers will be interested in ecocertified products. And guess
what, if American companies are slow capturing those customers, you can be sure
that foreign companies will soon start crowding into the American market,
offering ecocertified wood that domestic companies don’t.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Give yourself 20 minutes to plan and write your response. Your response is judged
on the quality of the writing and on how well it presents the points in the lecture and their
relationship to the reading passage. Typically, an effective response will be 150 to 225 words.
You may view the reading passage while you respond.
Response time, 20 minutes
Question, Summarize the points made in the lecture, being sure to explain how they cast doubt
on specific points made in the reading passage.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxWriting Practice Set 1 (Integrated), Response Tips
What is important to understand from the lecture is that the professor disagrees with the points
made in the reading, namely that American consumers mistrust advertising, that they are
unwilling to pay extra for ecocertified products, and that American companies do not need to
compete in parts of the world where ecocertification is valued.
In your response, you should convey the reasons presented by the professor for why
ecocertification of wood should be adopted by U.S. companies. A high-scoring response will
include the following points made by the professor that cast doubt on the points made in the
reading,
Point made in the reading
Because American consumers have come
to distrust frequently used advertising
claims such as ‘new’ or ‘improved,’
they won’t pay attention to or trust the
ecocertified label. Counterpoint made in the lecture
American consumers do pay attention to
claims about products when those claims are
made by independent consumer agencies.
Since ecocertification adds to the cost of
a product, Americans would be unlikely to
buy ecocertified products and would choose
cheaper, uncertified products. This is true only if there is a big price
difference between two similar products; if
an ecocertified product costs only about five
percent more, American consumers would
accept this in order to buy the product that is
better for the environment.
Because American companies sell their
products mainly in the U.S., they do not need
to compete in the rest of the world where
ecocertification is desired by consumers. American companies must be ready to
compete with foreign companies that will
soon be selling ecocertified products in the
U.S. market.
This task is scored using the Integrated Writing Rubrics. A response that receives a score of 5
clearly conveys all three of the main points in the table using accurate sentence structure and
vocabulary.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_writing_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxWriting Practice Set 2 (Independent), Question
Directions, Read the question below. Give yourself 30 minutes to plan, write, and revise your
essay. Typically, an effective response will contain a minimum of 300 words.
Reading Time, 30 minutes
Question, Do you agree or disagree with the following statement?
Television advertising directed toward young children
(aged two to five) should not be allowed.
Use specific reasons and examples to support your answer.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxWriting Practice Set 2 (Independent), Response Tips
To earn a top score, you should develop a multi-paragraph essay that responds to the issue of
whether TV advertising directed at young children should be permitted. Typically an effective
response will contain a minimum of 300 words.
Among the kinds of support that might be developed in favor of banning such advertising might
be that young children do not have the ability to tell what is good for them and what is not. So
this may lead to children who will be excessively influenced by television advertising and form
bad eating habits or demand to have every toy that they have seen advertised.
Those who disagree with the statement often develop one of their supports along the lines that it
is the responsibility of the parents to decide what their children should watch on television and
that parents should monitor their children’s reactions to shows or advertisements. Thus, it is not
necessary for government or the television stations to ban advertisements directed at young
children.
Keep in mind that there is no “correct” answer to this question. Either side of the issue can be
supported with examples and reasons. The important part of this task is to make sure that you
state your opinion and develop your response. Try to cover the topic as well as you can within
your abilities. Development of your essay is judged by the amount and kinds of support (reasons,
examples, details) that you present, and a well-developed essay will contain clearly appropriate
reasons, examples, and details—ones that do a good job supporting or illustrating the points you
are making. Development is not simply the number of words you write.
Your response should be well organized. If your essay is well organized, a reader will be able to
read from beginning to end without becoming confused. You should be sure not to just repeat the
same information in different ways.
The quality and accuracy of the sentence structure and vocabulary you use to express your ideas
is also very important.
This task is scored using the Independent Writing Rubric.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_writing_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxWriting Practice Set 3 (Integrated), Passage, Lecture, and Question
Directions, Give yourself 3 minutes to read the passage.
Reading Time, 3 minutes
Critics say that current voting systems used in the United States are inefficient and often lead to
the inaccurate counting of votes. Miscounts can be especially damaging if an election is closely
contested. Those critics would like the traditional systems to be replaced with far more efficient
and trustworthy computerized voting systems.
In traditional voting, one major source of inaccuracy is that people accidentally vote for the
wrong candidate. Voters usually have to find the name of their candidate on a large sheet of
paper containing many names—the ballot—and make a small mark next to that name. People
with poor eyesight can easily mark the wrong name. The computerized voting machines have an
easy-to-use touch-screen technology, to cast a vote, a voter needs only to touch the candidate’s
name on the screen to record a vote for that candidate; voters can even have the computer
magnify the name for easier viewing.
Another major problem with old voting systems is that they rely heavily on people to count the
votes. Officials must often count up the votes one by one, going through every ballot and
recording the vote. Since they have to deal with thousands of ballots, it is almost inevitable that
they will make mistakes. If an error is detected, a long and expensive recount has to take place.
In contrast, computerized systems remove the possibility of human error, since all the vote
counting is done quickly and automatically by the computers.
Finally some people say it is too risky to implement complicated voting technology nationwide.
But without giving it a thought, governments and individuals alike trust other complex computer
technology every day to be perfectly accurate in banking transactions as well as in the
communication of highly sensitive information.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxDirections, Here is the transcript.
Narrator Now listen to part of a lecture on the topic you just read about.
Professor While traditional voting systems have some problems, it’s doubtful that
computerized voting will make the situation any better. Computerized voting may
seem easy for people who are used to computers. But what about people who
aren’t? People who can’t afford computers, people who don’t use them on a
regular basis—these people will have trouble using computerized voting
machines. These voters can easily cast the wrong vote or be discouraged from
voting altogether because of fear of technology. Furthermore, it’s true that
humans make mistakes when they count up ballots by hand. But are we sure that
computers will do a better job? After all, computers are programmed by humans,
so “human error” can show up in mistakes in their programs. And the errors
caused by these defective programs may be far more serious. The worst a human
official can do is miss a few ballots. But an error in a computer program can result
in thousands of votes being miscounted or even permanently removed from the
record. And in many voting systems, there is no physical record of the votes, so a
computer recount in the case of a suspected error is impossible! As for our trust of
computer technology for banking and communications, remember one thing,
these systems are used daily and they are used heavily. They didn’t work
flawlessly when they were first introduced. They had to be improved on and
improved on until they got as reliable as they are today. But voting happens only
once every two years nationally in the United States and not much more than
twice a year in many local areas. This is hardly sufficient for us to develop
confidence that computerized voting can be fully trusted.
Directions, Give yourself 20 minutes to plan and write your response. Your response is judged
on the quality of the writing and on how well it presents the points in the lecture and their
relationship to the reading passage. Typically, an effective response will be 150 to 225 words.
You may view the reading passage while you respond.
Response time, 20 minutes
Question, Summarize the points made in the lecture, being sure to explain how they cast doubt
on specific points made in the reading passage.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxWriting Practice Set 3 (Integrated), Sample Responses
Response A, Score of 5
The lecture explained why the computerized voting system can not replace the traditional voting
system. There are the following three reasons.
First of all, not everyoen one can use computers correctly. Some people do not have access to
computers, some people are not used of computers, and some people are even scared of this new
technology. If the voters do not know how to use a computer, how do you expect them to finish
the voting process through computers? This directly refutes the reading passage which states that
computerized voting is easier by just touchingthe screen.
Secondly, computers may make mistakes as the people do. As computers are programmed by the
human beings, thus erros are inevitable in the computer system. Problems caused by computer
voting systems may be more serious than those caused by people. A larger number of votes
might be miss counted or even removed from the system. Furthermore, it would take more
energy to recount the votes. Again this contradicts what is stated in the reading which stated that
only people will make mistakes in counting.
Thirdly, computerized voting system is not reliable because it has not reached a stable status.
People trust computers to conduct banking transactions because the computerized banking
system is being used daily and frecuently and has been stable. How ever, the voting does not
happen as often as banking thus the computerized voting system has not been proved to be
totally reliable.
All in all, not everyone can use a computer properly, computer cause mistakes and computerized
voting system is not reliable are the main reasons why computerized voting system can not
replace the traditional voting system.
Score explanation
This response is well organized, selects the important information from all three points made in
the lecture, and explains its relationship to the claims made in the reading passage about the
advantages of computerized voting over traditional voting methods.
First, it counters the argument that computerized voting is more user-friendly and prevents
distortion of the vote by saying that many voters find computers unfamiliar and some voters may
end up not voting at all.
Second, it challenges the argument that computerized voting will result in fewer miscounts by
pointing out that programming errors may result in large-scale miscounts and that some errors
may result in the loss of voting records.
Third, it rejects the comparison of computerized voting with computerized banking by pointing
out that the reliability of computerized banking (“reached a stable status”) has been achieved
though frequent use, which does not apply to voting.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxThere are occasional minor language errors, for example, “people not used of computers”; “miss
counted”; “computer cause mistakes”; and the poor syntax of the last sentence (“All in all . . . ”).
Some spelling errors are obviously typos, “everyoen.” The errors, however, are not at all
frequent and do not result in unclear or inaccurate representation of the content.
The response meets all the criteria for the score of 5.
Response B, Score of 4
The leture disgreed with the article's opinions. It's not a better solution to use the computerized
voting systems.
Firstly, it might be hard for the voters who don't use the computer so often, or the users who is
fear of the technology, even some of voters can not aford a computer. Touch screen may also be
hard to use for people who is not familiar with computers. Secondly, computer is programmed
by human beings, which means it can also have errors. Instead of human being's counting error,
which only results one or two counting error in number, an errror in the program code could
cause tramendous error in number. In case of the computer crash or disaster, it may lost all the
voting information. We can not even to make a re-count. Lastly, our daily banking or other
highly sensitive infomation system, is actually improved as time goes by. They were also
problematic at the beginning. As we use them so often, we have more chances to find problems,
and furturemore, to fix and improve them. However, for the voting system, we only use them
every 2 years nationally and some other rare events. We just don't use it often enough to find a
bug or test it thoroughly.
Score explanation
The response selects most of the important information from the lecture and indicates that it
challenges the main argument in the reading passage about the advantages of computerized
voting systems (“it’s not a better solution”).
First, the response explains that some people will not find computers to be user- friendly;
however, it fails to relate this clearly to the point made in the passage that computerized voting
will prevent distortion of the vote. That is clearly an omission, but it is minor.
Second, the response does a good job of pointing out how programming and errors can cause
greater problems than miscounts cause in the traditional voting system.
Third, the response provides a nice explanation of how the frequent use of systems like the
banking system has contributed to such systems’ reliability, and then it contrasts that with the
computerized voting system.
There are more frequent language errors throughout the response—for example, “users who is
fear”; “some of voters can not aford”; “people who is not familiar”; “it may lost”; and “can not
even to make.” Expressions chosen by the writer occasionally affect the clarity of the content
that is being conveyed, “results one or two counting error in number . . . an errror in the program
code could cause tramendous error in number” and “use them every 2 years nationally and some
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxother rare events.” However, it should be noted that in these cases, a reader can derive the
intended meaning from the context.
Due to the more frequent language errors that on occasion result in minor lapses of clarity and
due to minor content omission, especially in the coverage of the first lecture point, the response
cannot earn the score of 5. At the same time, since the language errors are generally minor and
mostly do not interfere with the clarity of the content and since most of the important
information from the lecture is covered by the writer, the response deserves a higher score than
3. It meets the criteria for the score of 4.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_writing_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxWriting Practice Set 4 (Independent), Question
Directions, Read the question below. Give yourself 30 minutes to plan, write, and revise your
essay. Typically, an effective response will contain a minimum of 300 words.
Reading Time, 30 minutes
Question, Do you agree or disagree with the following statement?
A teacher’s ability to relate well with students is more important than excellent knowledge
of the subject being taught.
Use specific reasons and examples to support your answer.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxWriting Practice Set 4 (Independent), Sample Response
Response A, Score of 5
I remember every teacher that has taught me since I was in Kindergarten. If a friend wants to
know who our first grade teacher was in elementary school, all they have to do is ask me. The
teachers all looked very kind and understanding in my eyes as a child. They had special
relationships with nearly each and every one of the students and were very nice to everyone.
That’s the reason I remember all of them.
A teacher’s primary goal is to teach students the best they can about the things that are in our
textbooks and more important, how to show respect for one another. They teach us how to live a
better life by getting along with everyone. In order to do that, the teachers themselves have to be
able to relate well with students.
My parents are teachers too. One teaches Plant Biology and one teaches English, but that’s not
the reason I’m calling them “teachers.” They are teachers beacuse they teach me how to act in
special situations and how to cooperate with others. I have a brother, and my parents use
different aproaches when teaching us. They might scold my brother for surfing the internet too
long because he doesn’t have much self-control and they need to restrain him. He almost never
studies on his own and is always either drawing, playing computer games, or reading. On the
other hand, they never tell me off for using the computer too long. I do my own work when I
want and need to because that brings me the best results and my parents understand that. They
know that I need leisure time of my own and that I’ll only play until needed. My parents’ ability
to relate well with my brother and I allows them to teach, not just the subject they teach but also
their excellent knowledge on life.
Knowlegde of the subject being taught is something taken for granted, but at the same time,
secondary. One must go through and pass a series of courses and tests in order to become a
teacher. Any teacher is able to have excellent knowledge of their subject but not all teachers can
have the ability to relate well with students.
A teacher’s primary goal is to teach students the best they can about how to show respect for one
another, so teachers use different approaches when teaching, and knowledge of the subjet being
taught is secondary. For these reasons, I claim with confidence that excellent knowledge of the
subject being taught is secondary to the teacher’s ability to relate well with their students.
Score explanation
This essay conveys the idea that as important as teaching knowledge is, it is as important if not
more important for teachers to possess other qualities, all of which the writer classifies as
necessary for being able to relate well with students. Those other qualities include having
“special relationships” with students; the teaching of respect (in the first two paragraphs); and
taking different approaches for different individuals. The writer develops the last idea primarily
by using a clearly appropriate extended and complex example of the writer’s own parents, who
are teachers but whose special qualities in raising the writer and the writer’s brother had to do
more with taking varied approaches. The writer then goes on to convey that knowledge is a
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxgiven—“something taken for granted”—because all teachers take course work and pass tests to
gain their jobs but not all have the qualities the writer considers more important.
This response very effectively addresses the topic and the task. It is true that this response is
different from most essays, the overall idea is stated explicitly but only at the end of the essay.
However, because of very good language structure and good conceptual transitions between
ideas, the reader is able to follow the writer’s development of ideas without becoming confused.
The response is thus seen to be well organized. Errors in language are almost nonexistent here.
This response meets all of the 5-level criteria from the Scoring Guide.
Response B, Score of 4
I disagree with the idea that the possessing the ability to relate well with student is more
important than excellent knowledge of the subject being taught for a teacher. There are several
reasons why I disagree with that idea.
First, teachers’ job is to educate their student with their knowledge. The ability to relate well
with their student is something a counselor should possess, not a teacher.
That’s why the board of education gives an award to a teacher with an excellent knowledge of
the subject they teach. Teachers who can get along with their students but have no knowledge
can be popular and be liked by his or her students, however I don’t consider a teacher with no
knowledge a good teacher.
Second, Students go to schools because they want to learn knowledge from their teachers not to
get along with their teachers. I knew a math teacher who was well known among other
mathematics teachers. Some students always complained how he never entertains his students
which made many of his students to fall asleep. Nevertheless, all of his classes were all full even
before the semester began because many students who were eager to learn already booked in. He
won the Apples prize (it’s given to a noticed teacher annually) a couple of times and that enabled
students to firmly believe in his way of teaching.
Thirdly, teachers are responsible for conceding their knowledge to their next generation.
Teachers already had an experience of getting advantaged education from college. Teachers
should not let that previlege become useless and workless. We all learn because we want to
become the better person that this world needs. Students will also eventually grow up to be
influencing other people and teachers should volunteerily be their students’ role models.
For conclusion, I think the most important quality a teacher must have is an excellent knowledge
of the subject they teach, not an ability to relate well with their students.
Score explanation
This essay conveys the idea that as important as teaching knowledge is, it is as important if not
more important for teachers to possess other qualities
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docxThis is a more traditional-looking essay that is organized with a point of view in the first
paragraph stating the writer’s disagreement with the writing prompt, followed by three pieces of
supporting reasons and examples.
The second paragraph makes the point that counselors are the ones who are supposed to relate to
students and that teachers with no knowledge are not worthwhile as teachers.
In the third paragraph the writer tries to describe the fact that knowledge is important by stating
that students wanted to take courses from a teacher who was known to possess special
knowledge even though they knew the teacher was not entertaining.
The fourth paragraph contains the very interesting idea that teachers have the obligation to pass
on what they have had the privilege of learning, but this paragraph in particular has a few
problems with somewhat unclear expression of concepts, (1) errors of word choice in the word
“conceding” (not clear exactly what word is intended here) and in the term “‘advantaged’
education” (advanced education or advantages of education?) and (2) a problem with unclear
connection of ideas (why is it said that “We all learn because we want to become the better
person that this world needs?”).
Overall, this essay is well organized, but the slightly unclear connection of ideas and the
language chosen, especially in the final paragraph, prevent this response from rising above the 4
level.
https,//www.ets.org/s/toefl/pdf/toefl_writing_rubrics.pdf
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS) in the
United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS.
4.M2.partB_handout_transcript-of-audio.docx




Performance Descriptors for the TOEFL iBT ® Test
Level
Advanced
Score range 24–30
CEFR Level C1
Reading Section
Test takers who receive a Reading section score at the Advanced level typically understand academic passages in
English at the introductory university level. These passages are dense with propositions and information and can
include difficult vocabulary; lengthy, complex sentences and paragraphs; and abstract or nuanced ideas that may be
presented in complex ways.
Test takers who score at the Advanced level typically can
■
■
■
■
■
High-Intermediate
Score range 18–23
CEFR Level B2
Test takers who receive a Reading section score at the High-Intermediate level typically understand the main
ideas and important details of academic passages in English at the introductory university level, but they may have
an incomplete or incorrect understanding of parts of passages that are especially dense with propositions and
information, or complex in their presentation of ideas and information.
Test takers who score at the High-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
■
■
Low-Intermediate
Score range 4–17
CEFR Level B1
Understand a range of academic and low-frequency vocabulary as well as less common meanings of words.
Understand explicit connections among pieces of information and make appropriate inferences, even when the
passage is conceptually dense and the language is complex.
Recognize the expository organization of a passage and the purpose that specific information serves within the larger
context, even when the purpose of the information is not marked, and the passage is conceptually dense.
Follow a paragraph-length argument involving speculation, qualifications, counter-evidence, and subtle
rhetorical shifts.
Synthesize information in passages that contain complex language and are conceptually dense.
Understand common academic vocabulary, but sometimes have difficulty with low-frequency words or less common
meanings of words.
Understand explicit connections among pieces of information and make appropriate inferences, but may have
difficulty in parts of a passage that contain low-frequency vocabulary or that are conceptually dense, rhetorically
complex, or abstract.
Distinguish important ideas from less important ones.
Often recognize the expository organization of a passage and the purpose of specific information within a passage,
even when such information is not explicitly marked.
Synthesize information in a passage, but may have difficulty doing so when the passage is conceptually dense,
rhetorically complex, or abstract.
Test takers who receive a Reading section score at the Low-Intermediate level typically understand some main ideas
and important information presented in academic passages in English, but their overall understanding is limited. They
are able to understand connections across two or more sentences when the relationships are clear and simple, such as
a claim followed by a supporting example. However, they have difficulty following denser or more complex parts of a
passage.
Test takers who score at the Low-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
■
■
Below Low-
Intermediate
Score range 0–3
Understand texts with basic grammar, but have inconsistent understanding of texts with complex
grammatical structures.
Understand high-frequency academic vocabulary, but often have difficulty with lower-frequency words.
Locate information in a passage by matching words or relying on high-frequency vocabulary, but their limited ability
to recognize paraphrases results in incomplete understanding of the connections among ideas and information.
Identify an author’s purpose when that purpose is explicitly stated or easy to infer from the context.
Recognize major ideas in a passage when the information is clearly presented, memorable, or illustrated by examples
but have difficulty doing so when the passage is more demanding.
Test takers with a Reading section score below 4 have not yet demonstrated proficiency at the Low-Intermediate level.Performance Descriptors for the TOEFL iBT Test
Listening Section
Level
Advanced
Score range 22–30
CEFR Level C1
Test takers who receive a Listening section score at the Advanced level typically understand conversations and lectures
that take place in academic settings. The conversations and lectures may include difficult vocabulary, abstract or complex
ideas, complex sentence structures, various uses of intonation, and a large amount of information, possibly organized in
complex ways.
Test takers who score at the Advanced level typically can
■
■
■
■
■
■
Understand main ideas and explicitly stated important details, even if not reinforced.
Distinguish important ideas from less important points.
Keep track of conceptually complex, sometimes conflicting, information over extended portions of a lecture.
Understand how information or examples are being used (for example, to provide evidence for or against a claim, to
make comparisons or draw contrasts, or to express an opinion or a value judgment) and how pieces of information are
connected (for example, in a cause-effect relationship).
Understand different ways that speakers use language for purposes other than to give information (for example, to
express an emotion, to emphasize a point, to convey agreement or disagreement, or to communicate an intention).
Synthesize information, even when it is not presented in sequence, and make appropriate inferences on the basis of
that information.
High-Intermediate Test takers who receive a Listening section score at the High-Intermediate level typically understand the main ideas
Score range 17–21
CEFR Level B2
and important details of conversations and lectures that take place in academic settings. The conversations and lectures
may include difficult vocabulary, abstract or complex ideas, complex sentence structures, various uses of intonation, and
information that must be tracked across sequences of utterances.
However, lectures and conversations that are dense with information may present difficulty if the information is not reinforced.
Test takers who score at the High-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
■
■
■
Low-Intermediate
Score range 9–16
CEFR Level B1
Understand main ideas and explicitly stated important details that are reinforced (by repetition, paraphrase, or
indirect reference).
Distinguish main ideas from other information.
Keep track of information over an extended portion of an information-rich lecture or conversation, and recognize
multiple, possibly conflicting, points of view.
Understand how information or examples are being used (for example, to provide support for a claim), and how pieces
of information are connected (for example, in a narrative explanation, a compare-and-contrast relationship, or a cause-
effect chain).
Understand, though perhaps not consistently, ways that speakers use language for purposes other than to give
information (for example, to emphasize a point, express agreement or disagreement, express opinions, or convey
intentions indirectly), especially when the purpose is supported by intonation.
Synthesize information from adjacent parts of a lecture or conversation, and make appropriate inferences on the basis of
that information, but may have difficulty synthesizing information from separate parts of a lecture or conversation.
Test takers who receive a Listening section score at the Low-Intermediate level typically understand the main idea
and some important details of conversations and lectures that take place in academic settings. These conversations
and lectures can include basic academic language, abstract or complex ideas that are significantly reinforced,
complex sentence structures, certain uses of intonation, and a large amount of information that is repeated or
significantly reinforced.
Test takers at the Low-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
■
Below Low-
Intermediate
Score range 0–8
Understand main ideas, even in complex discussions, when the ideas are repeatedly referred to, extensively elaborated
on, or illustrated with multiple examples.
Understand explicitly stated important details, but may have difficulty understanding details if they are not reinforced
(such as through repetition or with an example) or marked as important, or if they are conveyed over several exchanges
among different speakers.
Understand some ways that speakers use language to express an opinion or attitude (for example, agreement,
disagreement, surprise), especially when the opinion or attitude is related to a central theme, clearly marked as
important, or supported by intonation.
Understand connections between important ideas, particularly if the ideas are related to a central theme or are repeated,
and can make appropriate inferences from information expressed in one or two sentences, especially when that
information is reinforced.
Test takers with a Listening section score below 9 have not yet demonstrated proficiency at the Low-Intermediate level.Performance Descriptors for the TOEFL iBT Test
Speaking Section
Level
Advanced
Score range 25–30
CEFR Level C1
Test takers who receive a Speaking section score at the Advanced level are typically able to communicate fluently
and effectively on a wide range of topics with little difficulty.
Test takers who score at the Advanced level typically can
■
■
■
High-Intermediate
Speak clearly and use intonation to support meaning so that speech is generally easy to understand and follow; any
minor lapses do not obscure meaning.
Speak with relative ease on a range of general and academic topics, demonstrating control of an appropriate range of
grammatical structures and vocabulary; any minor errors may be noticeable, but do not obscure meaning.
Convey mostly well-supported summaries, explanations, and opinions, including both concrete and abstract
information, with generally well-controlled organization and cohesion; lapses may occur, but they rarely impact
overall comprehensibility.
Score range 20–24 Test takers who receive a Speaking section score at the High-Intermediate level are typically able to communicate
effectively on most general or familiar topics, and to make themselves understood when discussing more complex or
academic topics.
CEFR Level B2 Test takers who score at the High-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
Low-Intermediate
Score range 16–19
CEFR Level B1
Test takers who receive a Speaking section score at the Low-Intermediate level are typically able to talk about general
or familiar topics with relative ease.
Test takers who score at the Low-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
Basic
Score range 10–15
CEFR Level A2
Test takers who score at the Basic level typically can
■
■
Score range 0–9
Speak clearly with minor hesitancies about general or familiar topics; longer pauses are noticeable when speaking
about more complex or academic topics, and mispronunciations may obscure meaning at times.
Produce short stretches of speech consisting of basic grammatical structures connected with “and”, “because” and
“so”; attempts at longer utterances requiring more complex grammatical structures may be marked by errors and
pauses for grammatical planning or repair; use vocabulary that is sufficient to discuss general or familiar topics, but
limitations in range of vocabulary sometimes result in vague or unclear expression of ideas.
Convey some main points and other relevant information but summaries, explanations, and opinions are sometimes
incomplete, inaccurate, and/or lack detail; long or complex explanations may lack coherence.
Test takers who receive a Speaking section score at the Basic level are typically able to communicate limited
information about familiar, everyday topics.
■
Below Basic
Speak clearly and without hesitancy on general or familiar topics, with overall good intelligibility; pauses and
hesitations (to recall or plan information) are sometimes noticeable when more demanding content is produced, and
any mispronunciations or intonation errors only occasionally cause problems for the listener.
Produce stretches of speech that demonstrate control of some complex structures and a range of vocabulary,
although occasional lapses in precision and accuracy may obscure meaning at times.
Convey sufficient information to produce mostly complete summaries, explanations, and opinions, but some ideas
may not be fully developed or may lack elaboration; any lapses in completeness and cohesion may at times affect the
otherwise clear progression of ideas.
Speak slowly and carefully so that they make themselves understood, but pronunciation may be strongly
influenced by the speaker’s first language and at times be unintelligible; speech may be marked by frequent pauses,
reformulations, and false starts.
Produce mostly short utterances, connecting phrases with simple linking words (such as “and”) to make themselves
understood; grammar and vocabulary are limited, and frequent pauses may occur while searching for words.
Convey some limited information about familiar topics; supporting points and/or details are generally missing, and
main ideas may be absent, unclear, or not well connected.
Test takers with a Speaking section score below 10 have not yet demonstrated proficiency at the Basic level.Performance Descriptors for the TOEFL iBT Test
Level
Advanced
Score range 24–30
CEFR Level C1
Writing Section
Test takers who receive a Writing section score at the Advanced level are typically able to write in English on a wide
range of academic and nonacademic topics with confidence and clarity.
Test takers who score at the Advanced level typically can
■
■
■
High-Intermediate
Produce clear, well-developed, and well-organized text; ungrammatical, unclear, or unidiomatic use of English is rare.
Express an opinion on a controversial issue, and support that opinion with appropriate details and explanations in
writing, demonstrating variety and range of vocabulary and grammatical structures.
Select important information from multiple sources, integrate it, and present it coherently and clearly in writing, with
only occasional minor imprecision in the summary of the source information.
Score range 17–23 Test takers who receive a Writing section score at the High-Intermediate level are typically able to write in English well
on general or familiar topics. When writing about complex ideas or ideas on academic topics, they can convey most of
the main ideas.
CEFR Level B2 Test takers who score at the High-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
Low-Intermediate
Score range 13–16
CEFR Level B1
Test takers who receive a Writing section score at the Low-Intermediate level are typically able to produce simple
written texts in English on general or familiar topics.
Test takers who score at the Low-Intermediate level typically can
■
■
■
Basic
Score range 7–12
CEFR Level A2
Score range 0–6
Produce a simple text that expresses some ideas on an issue, but the development of ideas is limited because of
insufficient or inappropriate details and explanations.
Summarize some relevant information from multiple sources, but important ideas from the sources are omitted or
significantly misrepresented, especially ideas that require unfamiliar vocabulary or are complex.
Write with limited facility, with language errors obscuring connections or meaning at key junctures between ideas in
the text.
Test takers who receive a Writing section score at the Basic level are typically able to communicate very basic
information in written English.
Test takers who score at the Basic level typically can
■
■
Below Basic
Produce summaries of multiple sources that include most of the main ideas; some important ideas from the sources
may be missing, unclear, or inaccurate.
Express an opinion on an issue clearly; some ideas and explanations may not be fully developed and lapses in
cohesion may at times affect a clear progression of ideas.
Write with some degree of facility; grammatical mistakes or vague/incorrect uses of words may make the writing
difficult to follow in some places.
Produce some text that is related to the topic, but with little detail and/or lack of organization.
Convey some information from the sources or some ideas on an issue, but grammatical errors, unclear expressions,
and/or poor sentence structure make their writing difficult to comprehend.
Test takers with a Writing section score below 7 have not yet demonstrated proficiency at the Basic level.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS)
in the United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS. 417327289

TOEFL iBT ® Test
Independent Speaking Rubrics
SCORE
GENERAL
DESCRIPTION
DELIVERY
LANGUAGE USE
TOPIC
DEVELOPMENT
4 The response fulfills the
demands of the task, with
at most minor lapses in
completeness. It is highly
intelligible and exhibits
sustained, coherent discourse.
A response at this level is
characterized by all of
the following, Generally well-paced flow
(fluid expression). Speech is
clear. It may include minor
lapses, or minor difficulties with
pronunciation or intonation
patterns, which do not affect
overall intelligibility. The response demonstrates
effective use of grammar and
vocabulary. It exhibits a fairly
high degree of automaticity
with good control of basic
and complex structures (as
appropriate). Some minor (or
systematic) errors are noticeable
but do not obscure meaning. Response is sustained and
sufficient to the task. It is
generally well developed and
coherent; relationships
between ideas are clear (or
clear progression of ideas).
3 The response addresses the
task appropriately but may fall
short of being fully developed.
It is generally intelligible and
coherent, with some fluidity of
expression, though it exhibits
some noticeable lapses in the
expression of ideas. A response
at this level is characterized by
at least two of the following, Speech is generally clear, with
some fluidity of expression,
though minor difficulties with
pronunciation, intonation, or
pacing are noticeable and may
require listener effort at times
(though overall intelligibility is
not significantly affected). The response demonstrates
fairly automatic and effective
use of grammar and vocabulary,
and fairly coherent expression
of relevant ideas. Response
may exhibit some imprecise or
inaccurate use of vocabulary or
grammatical structures or be
somewhat limited in the range
of structures used. This may
affect overall fluency, but it does
not seriously interfere with the
communication of the message. Response is mostly coherent
and sustained and conveys
relevant ideas/information.
Overall development is some-
what limited, usually lacks
elaboration or specificity.
Relationships between
ideas may at times not be
immediately clear.
2 The response addresses the
task, but development of the
topic is limited. It contains
intelligible speech, although
problems with delivery and/
or overall coherence occur;
meaning may be obscured in
places. A response at this level
is characterized by at least two
of the following, Speech is basically intelligible,
though listener effort is needed
because of unclear articulation,
awkward intonation, or choppy
rhythm/pace; meaning may be
obscured in places. The response demonstrates
limited range and control of
grammar and vocabulary. These
limitations often prevent full
expression of ideas. For the
most part, only basic sentence
structures are used successfully
and spoken with fluidity.
Structures and vocabulary may
express mainly simple (short)
and/or general propositions,
with simple or unclear
connections made among them
(serial listing, conjunction,
juxtaposition). The response is connected to
the task, though the number
of ideas presented or the
development of ideas is limited.
Mostly basic ideas are expressed
with limited elaboration (details
and support). At times relevant
substance may be vaguely
expressed or repetitious.
Connections of ideas may be
unclear.
1 The response is very limited in
content and/or coherence or
is only minimally connected
to the task, or speech is largely
unintelligible. A response at
this level is characterized by at
least two of the following, Consistent pronunciation, stress
and intonation difficulties cause
considerable listener effort;
delivery is choppy, fragmented,
or telegraphic; frequent pauses
and hesitations. Range and control of grammar
and vocabulary severely limit
or prevent expression of ideas
and connections among ideas.
Some low-level responses may
rely heavily on practiced or
formulaic expressions. Limited relevant content
is expressed. The response
generally lacks substance
beyond expression of very basic
ideas. Speaker may be unable
to sustain speech to complete
the task and may rely heavily on
repetition of the prompt.
0
Speaker makes no attempt to respond OR response is unrelated to the topic.TOEFL iBT ® Test
Integrated Speaking Rubrics
GENERAL DESCRIPTION DELIVERY 4 The response fulfills the
demands of the task, with
at most minor lapses in
completeness. It is highly
intelligible and exhibits
sustained, coherent discourse.
A response at this level is
characterized by all of the
following, Speech is generally clear,
fluid, and sustained. It may
include minor lapses or minor
difficulties with pronunciation
or intonation. Pace may vary at
times as the speaker attempts
to recall information. Overall
intelligibility remains high. The response demonstrates
good control of basic and
complex grammatical structures
that allow for coherent,
efficient (automatic) expression
of relevant ideas. Contains
generally effective word
choice. Though some minor (or
systematic) errors or imprecise
use may be noticeable, they do
not require listener effort (or
obscure meaning). The response presents a
clear progression of ideas
and conveys the relevant
information required by the task.
It includes appropriate detail,
though it may have minor errors
or minor omissions.
3 The response addresses the
task appropriately, but may fall
short of being fully developed.
It is generally intelligible and
coherent, with some fluidity of
expression, though it exhibits
some noticeable lapses in the
expression of ideas. A response
at this level is characterized by
at least two of the following, Speech is generally clear, with
some fluidity of expression, but
it exhibits minor difficulties with
pronunciation, intonation, or
pacing and may require some
listener effort at times. Overall
intelligibility remains good,
however. The response demonstrates
fairly automatic and effective
use of grammar and vocabulary,
and fairly coherent expression
of relevant ideas. Response
may exhibit some imprecise or
inaccurate use of vocabulary
or grammatical structures
or be somewhat limited in
the range of structures used.
Such limitations do not
seriously interfere with the
communication of the message. The response is sustained and
conveys relevant information
required by the task. However,
it exhibits some incompleteness,
inaccuracy, lack of specificity
with respect to content, or
choppiness in the progression
of ideas.
2 The response is connected
to the task, though it may
be missing some relevant
information or contain
inaccuracies. It contains some
intelligible speech, but at times
problems with intelligibility
and/or overall coherence may
obscure meaning. A response at
this level is characterized by at
least two of the following, Speech is clear at times, though
it exhibits problems with
pronunciation, intonation, or
pacing and so may require
significant listener effort.
Speech may not be sustained at
a consistent level throughout.
Problems with intelligibility
may obscure meaning in places
(but not throughout). The response is limited in the
range and control of vocabulary
and grammar demonstrated
(some complex structures
may be used, but typically
contain errors). This results in
limited or vague expression of
relevant ideas and imprecise
or inaccurate connections.
Automaticity of expression
may only be evident at the
phrasal level. The response conveys some
relevant information but is
clearly incomplete or inaccurate.
It is incomplete if it omits key
ideas, makes vague reference
to key ideas, or demonstrates
limited development of
important information. An
inaccurate response demonstrates
misunderstanding of key ideas
from the stimulus. Typically,
ideas expressed may not be
well connected or cohesive so
that familiarity with the stimulus
is necessary to follow what is
being discussed.
1 The response is very limited
in content or coherence or is
only minimally connected to
the task. Speech may be largely
unintelligible. A response at this
level is characterized by at least
two of the following, Consistent pronunciation and
intonation problems cause
considerable listener effort and
frequently obscure meaning.
Delivery is choppy, fragmented,
or telegraphic. Speech
contains frequent pauses and
hesitations. Range and control of grammar
and vocabulary severely limit (or
prevent) expression of ideas and
connections among ideas. Some
very low-level responses may
rely on isolated words or short
utterances to communicate
ideas. The response fails to provide
much relevant content. Ideas
that are expressed are often
inaccurate, limited to vague
utterances, or repetitions
(including repetition of prompt).
0
LANGUAGE USE
TOPIC
DEVELOPMENT
SCORE
Speaker makes no attempt to respond OR response is unrelated to the topic.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS)
in the United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS. 417321919

TOEFL iBT ® Test
Independent Writing Rubrics
SCORE
5
TASK DESCRIPTION
An essay at this level largely accomplishes all of the following,
■
■
■
■
4
An essay at this level largely accomplishes all of the following,
■
■
■
■
3
■
■
■
■
■
■
■
Limited development in response to the topic and task
Inadequate organization or connection of ideas
Inappropriate or insufficient exemplifications, explanations or details to support or illustrate generalizations in
response to the task
A noticeably inappropriate choice of words or word forms
An accumulation of errors in sentence structure and/or usage
An essay at this level is seriously flawed by one or more of the following weaknesses,
■
■
■
0
Addresses the topic and task using somewhat developed explanations, exemplifications and/or details
Displays unity, progression and coherence, though connection of ideas may be occasionally obscured
May demonstrate inconsistent facility in sentence formation and word choice that may result in lack of clarity and
occasionally obscure meaning
May display accurate but limited range of syntactic structures and vocabulary
An essay at this level may reveal one or more of the following weaknesses,
■
1
Addresses the topic and task well, though some points may not be fully elaborated
Is generally well organized and well developed, using appropriate and sufficient explanations, exemplifications
and/or details
Displays unity, progression and coherence, though it may contain occasional redundancy, digression, or
unclear connections
Displays facility in the use of language, demonstrating syntactic variety and range of vocabulary, though it will
probably have occasional noticeable minor errors in structure, word form or use of idiomatic language that do
not interfere with meaning
An essay at this level is marked by one or more of the following,
■
2
Effectively addresses the topic and task
Is well organized and well developed, using clearly appropriate explanations, exemplifications and/or details
Displays unity, progression and coherence
Displays consistent facility in the use of language, demonstrating syntactic variety, appropriate word choice and
idiomaticity, though it may have minor lexical or grammatical errors
Serious disorganization or underdevelopment
Little or no detail, or irrelevant specifics, or questionable responsiveness to the task
Serious and frequent errors in sentence structure or usage
An essay at this level merely copies words from the topic, rejects the topic, or is otherwise not connected to the
topic, is written in a foreign language, consists of keystroke characters, or is blank.TOEFL iBT ® Test
Integrated Writing Rubrics
SCORE
TASK DESCRIPTION
5 A response at this level successfully selects the important information from the lecture and coherently and accurately
4 A response at this level is generally good in selecting the important information from the lecture and in coherently
3 A response at this level contains some important information from the lecture and conveys some
relevant connection to the reading, but it is marked by one or more of the following,
presents this information in relation to the relevant information presented in the reading. The response is well
organized, and occasional language errors that are present do not result in inaccurate or imprecise presentation
of content or connections.
and accurately presenting this information in relation to the relevant information in the reading, but it may have minor
omission, inaccuracy, vagueness, or imprecision of some content from the lecture or in connection to points made in
the reading. A response is also scored at this level if it has more frequent or noticeable minor language errors, as long
as such usage and grammatical structures do not result in anything more than an occasional lapse of clarity or in the
connection of ideas.
■
■
■
■
2
A response at this level contains some relevant information from the lecture, but is marked by significant
language difficulties or by significant omission or inaccuracy of important ideas from the lecture or in
the connections between the lecture and the reading; a response at this level is marked by one or more
of the following,
■
■
■
1
The response significantly misrepresents or completely omits the overall connection between the lecture and
the reading.
The response significantly omits or significantly misrepresents important points made in the lecture.
The response contains language errors or expressions that largely obscure connections or meaning at key junctures
or that would likely obscure understanding of key ideas for a reader not already familiar with the reading and
the lecture.
A response at this level is marked by one or more of the following,
■
■
0
Although the overall response is definitely oriented to the task, it conveys only vague, global, unclear, or somewhat
imprecise connection of the points made in the lecture to points made in the reading.
The response may omit one major key point made in the lecture.
Some key points made in the lecture or the reading, or connections between the two, may be incomplete, inaccurate,
or imprecise.
Errors of usage and/or grammar may be more frequent or may result in noticeably vague expressions or obscured
meanings in conveying ideas and connections.
The response provides little or no meaningful or relevant coherent content from the lecture.
The language level of the response is so low that it is difficult to derive meaning.
A response at this level merely copies sentences from the reading, rejects the topic or is otherwise not
connected to the topic, is written in a foreign language, consists of keystroke characters, or is blank.
Copyright © 2019 by Educational Testing Service. All rights reserved. ETS, the ETS logo, TOEFL and TOEFL iBT are registered trademarks of Educational Testing Service (ETS)
in the United States and other countries. IN ENGLISH WITH CONFIDENCE is a trademark of ETS. 417324313


















